GoDaddy Legal Agreements and Policies
This page contains links to current corporate policies, agreements for the products and services available through GoDaddy, and notices for employees, candidates, and applicants. To view any of the documents presented on this page, click on the policy/agreement.
GoDaddy - UNIVERSAL TERMS OF SERVICE AGREEMENT
Last Revised: 19/03/2025
PLEASE READ THIS UNIVERSAL TERMS OF SERVICE AGREEMENT CAREFULLY, AS IT CONTAINS IMPORTANT INFORMATION REGARDING YOUR LEGAL RIGHTS AND REMEDIES.
1. OVERVIEW
This Universal Terms of Service Agreement (this “
Agreement
”) is entered into by and between GoDaddy.com, LLC, GoDaddy Payments, LLC (for any payment services) and Poynt, LLC (for any hardware services) ("
GoDaddy
") and you and is made effective as of the date of your use of this website ("
Site
") or the date of electronic acceptance.  This Agreement sets forth the general terms and conditions of your use of the Site and the products and services purchased or accessed through this Site (individually and collectively, the “
Services
”). Any agreements, arrangements and/or additional policies that apply to certain Services ("
Services Agreements
") and are in addition to (not in lieu of) this Agreement.  In the event of a conflict between the provisions of a Services Agreement and the provisions of this Agreement, the provisions of the applicable Services Agreement shall control.
The terms “we”, “us” or “our” shall refer to GoDaddy. The terms “you”, “your”, “User” or “customer” shall refer to any individual or entity who accepts this Agreement, has access to your account or uses the Site or the Services.  Nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed to confer any third-party rights or benefits.
2. MODIFICATION OF AGREEMENT, SITE OR SERVICES
GoDaddy may, in its sole and absolute discretion, change or modify this Agreement, and any policies or agreements which are incorporated herein, at any time, and such changes or modifications shall be effective immediately upon posting to this Site. Your use of this Site or the Services after such changes or modifications have been made shall constitute your acceptance of this Agreement as last revised. If you do not agree to be bound by this Agreement as last revised, do not use (or continue to use) this Site or the Services. In addition, GoDaddy may occasionally notify you of changes or modifications to this Agreement by email. It is therefore very important that you keep your shopper account (“
Account
”) information current.  GoDaddy assumes no liability or responsibility for your failure to receive an email notification if such failure results from an inaccurate email address.  In addition, GoDaddy may terminate Your use of Services for any violation or breach of any of the terms of this Agreement by You.
GoDaddy RESERVES THE RIGHT TO MODIFY, CHANGE, OR DISCONTINUE ANY ASPECT OF THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION PRICES AND FEES FOR THE SAME, AT ANY TIME.
3. ELIGIBILITY; AUTHORITY
This Site and the Services are available only to individuals or entities (“
Users
”) who can form legally binding contracts under applicable law.  By using this Site or the Services, you represent and warrant that you are (i) at least eighteen (18) years of age, (ii) otherwise recognized as being able to form legally binding contracts under applicable law, and/or (iii) are not a person barred from purchasing or receiving the Services found under the laws of the United States or other applicable jurisdiction.
If you are entering into this Agreement on behalf of a corporate entity, you represent and warrant that you have the legal authority to bind such corporate entity to the terms and conditions contained in this Agreement, in which case the terms "you", "your", "User" or "customer" shall refer to such corporate entity.  If, after your electronic acceptance of this Agreement, GoDaddy finds that you do not have the legal authority to bind such corporate entity, you will be personally responsible for the obligations contained in this Agreement, including, but not limited to, the payment obligations. GoDaddy shall not be liable for any loss or damage resulting from GoDaddy’s reliance on any instruction, notice, document or communication reasonably believed by GoDaddy to be genuine and originating from an authorized representative of your corporate entity. If there is reasonable doubt about the authenticity of any such instruction, notice, document or communication, GoDaddy reserves the right (but undertakes no duty) to require additional authentication from you.  You further agree to be bound by the terms of this Agreement for transactions entered into by you, anyone acting as your agent and anyone who uses your account or the Services, whether or not authorized by you.
4. YOUR ACCOUNT
In order to access some of the features of this Site or use some of the Services, you will have to create an Account. You represent and warrant to GoDaddy that all information you submit when you create your Account is accurate, current and complete, and that you will keep your Account information accurate, current and complete.  If GoDaddy has reason to believe that your Account information is untrue, inaccurate, out-of-date or incomplete, GoDaddy reserves the right, in its sole and absolute discretion, to suspend or terminate your Account.  You are solely responsible for the activity that occurs on your Account, whether authorized by you or not, and you must keep your Account information secure, including without limitation your customer number/login, password, Payment Method(s) (as defined below), and shopper PIN.  For security purposes, GoDaddy recommends that you change your password and shopper PIN at least once every six (6) months for each Account.  You must notify GoDaddy immediately of any breach of security or unauthorized use of your Account. GoDaddy will not be liable for any loss you incur due to any unauthorized use of your Account. You, however, may be liable for any loss GoDaddy or others incur caused by your Account, whether caused by you, or by an authorized person, or by an unauthorized person.
5. GENERAL RULES OF CONDUCT
You acknowledge and agree that:
Your use of this Site and the Services, including any content you submit, will comply with this Agreement, any applicable Services Agreement or policy that may apply to your Services and all applicable local, state, national and international laws, rules and regulations.
You will not collect or harvest (or permit anyone else to collect or harvest) any User Content (as defined below) or any non-public or personally identifiable information about another User or any other person or entity without their express prior written consent.
You will not use this Site or the Services in a manner (as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion) that:
Is illegal or harmful, or promotes or encourages illegal or harmful activity;
Promotes, encourages or engages in the exploitation of children, or any activity related to the proliferation of child sexual abuse material (CSAM);
Promotes or encourages self-harm or suicide;
Promotes, encourages or engages in terrorism,  or violence against people, animals, or property;
Promotes, encourages or engages in any spam or other unsolicited bulk email, or computer or network hacking or cracking;
Violates the Ryan Haight Online Pharmacy Consumer Protection Act of 2008 or similar legislation, or promotes, encourages or engages in the sale or distribution of prescription medication without a valid prescription;
Violates the Fight Online Sex Trafficking Act of 2017 or similar legislation, or promotes or facilitates prostitution and/or sex trafficking;
Infringes on the intellectual property rights of another User or any other person or entity;
Violates the privacy or publicity rights of another User or any other person or entity, or breaches any duty of confidentiality that you owe to another User or any other person or entity;
Interferes with the operation of this Site or the Services found at this Site;
Contains or installs any viruses, worms, bugs, Trojan horses or other code, files or programs designed to, or capable of, disrupting, damaging or limiting the functionality of any software or hardware; or
Contains false or deceptive language, or unsubstantiated or comparative claims, regarding GoDaddy or GoDaddy’s Services.
You will not perform any false, abusive or fraudulent activity. You will not perform any action that imposes, or may impose, in our discretion, an unreasonable or disproportionately large load on our infrastructure;
You will not copy or distribute in any medium any part of this Site or the Services , except where expressly authorized by GoDaddy.
You will not modify or alter any part of this Site or the Services found at this Site or any of its related technologies.
You will not access GoDaddy Content (as defined below) or User Content through any technology or means other than through this Site itself, or as GoDaddy may designate.
You agree to back-up all of your User Content so that you can access and use it when needed. GoDaddy does not warrant that it backs-up any Account or User Content, and you agree to accept as a risk the loss of any and all of your User Content.
You will not re-sell or provide the Services for a commercial purpose, including any of GoDaddy's related technologies, without GoDaddy's express prior written consent.
You will not circumvent, disable or otherwise interfere with the security-related features of this Site or the Services found at this Site (including without limitation those features that prevent or restrict use or copying of any GoDaddy Content or User Content) or enforce limitations on the use of this Site or the Services found at this Site, the GoDaddy Content or the User Content therein.
You agree to provide government-issued photo identification and/or government-issued business identification as required for verification of identity when requested.
You are aware that GoDaddy may from time-to-time call you about your account, and that, for the purposes of any and all such call(s), you may be subject to call recording and hereby consent to the same, subject to any applicable laws and our restrictions and obligations thereunder, including, where permissible, to record the entirety of such calls regardless of whether GoDaddy asks you on any particular call for consent to record such call.  You further acknowledge and agree that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, any such recording(s) may be submitted as evidence in any legal proceeding in which GoDaddy is a party. Further, by providing your telephone or mobile number, you consent to receive marketing telephone calls from or on behalf of GoDaddy that may be initiated by an automatic telephone dialing system and/or use an artificial or prerecorded voice. You understand that providing consent is not a condition of purchasing any good or service from GoDaddy.  Similarly, by providing your mobile number, you consent to receive marketing text messages from or on behalf of GoDaddy that may be sent by an automatic telephone dialing system. You understand that providing consent is not a condition of purchasing any good or service from GoDaddy. Message and data rates may apply.
Without limiting any of the rights set forth elsewhere in this Agreement, GoDaddy expressly reserves the right to deny, cancel, terminate, suspend, or limit future access to this Site or any Services (including but not limited to the right to cancel or transfer any domain name registration) to any User (i) whose Account or Services were previously terminated or suspended, whether due to breach of this or any other Agreement or any GoDaddy policy, or (ii) who otherwise engages or has engaged in inappropriate or unlawful activity while utilizing the Site or Services (as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion).
If your purchase or account activity shows signs of fraud, abuse or suspicious activity, GoDaddy may cancel any service associated with your name, email address or account and close any associated GoDaddy accounts. If GoDaddy, in its sole discretion, determines that any conducted activity is fraudulent, GoDaddy reserves the right to take any necessary legal action and you may be liable for monetary losses to GoDaddy including litigation costs and damages. To contest cancellation of Services or freezing or closure of an account, please contact GoDaddy Care.
6. PROTECTION OF YOUR PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION
GoDaddy may process personally identifiable information (“PII”) about you, your customers, and/or any individual using any services provided to you under this Agreement including any website You host with GoDaddy.  To the extent GoDaddy processes PII for its purposes in providing the Services, GoDaddy acts as the Data Controller and GoDaddy’s Global Privacy Notice applies to such processing.  To the extent GoDaddy processes PII on your behalf as part of the Services, GoDaddy acts as the Data Processor and the Data Processing Addendum applicable to the Services applies to such processing.
7. USER CONTENT
Some of the features of this Site or the Services, including those Services that are hosted with GoDaddy, may allow Users to view, post, publish, share, store, or manage (a) ideas, opinions, recommendations, or advice via forum posts, content submitted in connection with a contest, product reviews or recommendations, or photos to be incorporated into a social media event or activity (“
User Submissions
”), (b) literary, artistic, musical, or other content, including but not limited to photos and videos, or (c) other information about their business or customers (together with User Submissions, (“
User Content
”). All content submitted through your Account or processed on your behalf is considered User Content.
You must not post any User Content that is not compatible with or violates this Agreement (including without limitation this Section 7 and Sections 5 and 17 of this Agreement) or any applicable local, state, national and international laws, rules and regulations (“Prohibited Content”)
By posting, publishing, or processing User Content to this Site or to or via the Services, you represent and warrant to GoDaddy that (i) you have all necessary rights to process and distribute User Content via this Site or via the Services, either because you are the author of the User Content and have the right to distribute the same, or because you have the appropriate distribution rights, licenses, consents, and/or permissions to use, in writing, from the copyright or other owner of the User Content,  (ii) the User Content does not contain any Prohibited Content and does not violate the rights of any third party. You shall be solely responsible for any and all of your User Content or User Content that is submitted through your Account, and the consequences of, and requirements for, distributing it.
User Submissions.
You acknowledge and agree that your User Submissions are entirely voluntary, do not establish a confidential relationship or obligate GoDaddy to treat your User Submissions as confidential or secret, that GoDaddy has no obligation, either express or implied, to develop or use your User Submissions, and no compensation is due to you or to anyone else for any intentional or unintentional use of your User Submissions, and that GoDaddy may be working on the same or similar content, it may already know of such content from other sources, it may simply wish to develop this (or similar) content on its own, or it may have taken / will take some other action.
GoDaddy shall own exclusive rights (including all intellectual property and other proprietary rights) to any User Submissions posted to this Site, and shall be entitled to the unrestricted use and dissemination of any User Submissions posted to this Site for any purpose, commercial or otherwise, without acknowledgment or compensation to you or to anyone else.
User Content Other Than User Submissions.
By posting or publishing User Content to this Site or through the Services, you authorize GoDaddy to use the intellectual property and other proprietary rights in and to your User Content to enable inclusion and use of the User Content in the manner contemplated by this Site, this Agreement, and any Services Agreements applicable to the User Content.  You hereby grant GoDaddy a worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free, sublicensable (through multiple tiers), and transferable license to use, reproduce, distribute, prepare derivative works of, combine with other works, display, and perform your User Content in connection with this Site, the Services and GoDaddy's (and GoDaddy’s affiliates’) business(es), including without limitation for promoting and redistributing all or part of this Site in any media formats and through any media channels without restrictions of any kind and without payment or other consideration of any kind, or permission or notification, to you or any third party. You also hereby grant each User of this Site a non-exclusive license to access your User Content (with the exception of User Content that you designate “private” or “password protected”) through this Site, and to use, reproduce, distribute, prepare derivative works of, combine with other works, display, and perform your User Content as permitted through the functionality of this Site and under this Agreement. The above licenses granted by you in your User Content terminate within a commercially reasonable time after you remove or delete your User Content from this Site. You understand and agree, however, that GoDaddy may retain (but not distribute, display, or perform) server copies of your User Content that have been removed or deleted. The above licenses granted by you in your User Content are perpetual and irrevocable.  You also understand and agree that GoDaddy may retain and use any User Content that has been incorporated into any derivative works as allowed pursuant to any Services Agreements. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, GoDaddy shall not use any User Content that has been designated “private” or “password protected” by you for the purpose of promoting this Site or GoDaddy’s (or GoDaddy’s affiliates’) business(es). If you have a website or other content hosted by GoDaddy, you shall retain all of your ownership or licensed rights in User Content.
GoDaddy Data.  For the avoidance of doubt, User Content does not include “GoDaddy Data,” which means (a) all information relating to GoDaddy’s business and delivery of the Services, including but not limited to PII concerning You and (where applicable) your employees or representatives, (b) other data concerning or relating to Your account, transaction history, use of the Services and identity verification, and (c) subject to any restrictions under any applicable Data Protection Laws, any PII that has been aggregated, pseudonymized, or anonymized (collectively, “De-identified”) pursuant to the terms of any Services Agreement. You acknowledge and agree that you have no rights to GoDaddy Data under this or any Services Agreement.
8. AVAILABILITY OF WEBSITE/SERVICES
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and our other policies and procedures, we shall use commercially reasonable efforts to attempt to provide this Site and the Services on a twenty-four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week basis. You acknowledge and agree that from time to time this Site may be inaccessible or inoperable for any reason including, but not limited to, equipment malfunctions; periodic maintenance, repairs or replacements that we undertake from time to time; or causes beyond our reasonable control or that are not reasonably foreseeable including, but not limited to, interruption or failure of telecommunication or digital transmission links, hostile network attacks, network congestion or other failures. You acknowledge and agree that we have no control over the availability of this Site or the Service on a continuous or uninterrupted basis, and that we assume no liability to you or any other party with regard thereto.
9. PRODUCT CREDITS
In the event you are provided with a product credit (“
Credit
”), whether for redemption of the purchase of a specific product or for free with the purchase of another product (“
Purchased Product
”), you acknowledge and agree that such Credit is only valid for one (1) year and is only available with a valid purchase and may be terminated in the event the product purchased is deleted, cancelled, transferred or not renewed. The Credit will expire one (1) year from date of purchase of the Purchased Product if the Credit has not been redeemed.  In the event that the Credit is redeemed, after the initial subscription period, the product will automatically renew at the then-current renewal price until cancelled. If you wish to cancel the automatic renewal of the product, you may do so by visiting your Account or by contacting customer service.  In the event your Purchased Product includes a free domain name, if you cancel the Purchased Product, the list price for the domain name will be deducted from the refund amount. The list price is the price of the domain name listed on GoDaddy's website and is not subject to any promotion, discount, or other reduction in price. For Credits issued for free with another Purchased Product, you acknowledge and agree that we may swap your Credit for a similar product, in our sole discretion.
10. MONITORING AND MODERATION OF CONTENT; RESTRICTIONS POLICY
When using this Site and/or any Service, you will not provide, post, publish, share or otherwise make available or accessible any Prohibited Content.
GoDaddy generally does not pre-screen User Content (whether posted to a website hosted by GoDaddy or posted to this Site).  However, and subject to applicable laws, GoDaddy reserves the right (but undertakes no duty) to do so and decide whether any item of User Content is appropriate and/or complies with this Agreement. By way of example, GoDaddy may for instance voluntarily screen or pre-screen material for potential child sexual abuse material and act against any such material.
GoDaddy may remove any item of User Content (whether posted to a website hosted by GoDaddy or posted to this Site) and/or suspend or terminate a User’s access to this Site or the Services found at this Site for posting or publishing any Prohibited Content, or for otherwise violating this Agreement (as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion), at any time and without prior notice. GoDaddy may also suspend or terminate a User’s access to this Site or the Services found at this Site if GoDaddy has reason to believe the User is a repeat offender.
If GoDaddy terminates your access to this Site or the Services found at this Site, GoDaddy may, in its sole and absolute discretion, remove and destroy any data and files stored by you on its servers.
GoDaddy also reserves the right, but undertakes no duty, to review use of the Services and account activity for any activity that may pose a risk to GoDaddy and/or GoDaddy’s systems.  GoDaddy also may review, adjust the configurations of, and/or change the settings of any Services, including the settings of any hosted environment, that GoDaddy believes, in its sole and absolute discretion, may pose a risk to GoDaddy, GoDaddy’s systems, or any of its environments.
11. EUROPEAN UNION DIGITAL SERVICES ACT (“
DSA
”) SUPPLEMENTAL TERMS OF SERVICE
This section 11 applies as from February 17, 2024, which is the date of entry into effect of the EU Digital Services Act.
11.1	This Section 11 sets out provisions, processes and disclosures that supplement the rest of this Agreement, as required under the DSA, which regulates the provision of certain digital intermediary services provided in the European Union (“
EU
”) and notably sets out rules on the role of providers and imposes content moderation requirements and transparency obligations. These provisions only apply to you if you are in the EU and / or if you are using the Site or Services falling within the scope of the DSA. In the event of any conflict between the terms set out in this Section 11 and the other provisions of this Agreement, the terms of Section 11 shall prevail.
11.2	Rules of conduct. Users are prohibited from providing, publishing or transmitting Prohibited Content on this Site or in their use of the Services specifically including any User Content that is incompatible with or violates any applicable laws in the EU or any EU country.
11.3	Content moderation overview. GoDaddy may voluntarily take action against any Prohibited Content, in accordance with Section 10 above. In addition, GoDaddy may receive notices through the Notice and Action Mechanism (described below) and orders from EU authorities reporting the presence of alleged illegal content on (or transmitted through) this Site or any Service (including without limitation any website hosted by GoDaddy). GoDaddy will process these orders and notices, and take action based on the information provided. These actions may entail the restrictions mentioned in Section 11.5 below, or any other restrictions required by the relevant authority.
11.4	Notifying alleged illegal content – Notice and Action Mechanism. You may report to GoDaddy the presence, on this Site or on any Service, of content that you consider to be illegal in the EU or any EU country through the mechanism accessible in our
Support Center
(“
Notice and Action Mechanism
”). Depending on the nature of the Service concerned by the notice, the way GoDaddy processes and addresses such notice may differ.
11.5	Restrictions. GoDaddy may, at any time and in some cases, without prior notice, remove any Prohibited Content provided on (or through) this Site or any Service or suspend or terminate access to a whole Service (e.g., disabling a website hosted by GoDaddy).  In addition, with respect to “repeat offenders”, namely users frequently providing manifestly Prohibited Content, GoDaddy may suspend or terminate their access to this Site or to the Services found at this Site. GoDaddy will generally issue a prior warning before any suspension, other than in exceptional cases, or where GoDaddy is otherwise legally required to take immediate action. When deciding on and applying such restrictions, GoDaddy will act in a timely, diligent, non-arbitrary, objective and proportionate manner.
11.6	Unfounded Notices. If any user frequently provides manifestly unfounded notices through the Notice and Action Mechanism, GoDaddy may suspend the processing of its notices. GoDaddy will generally issue a prior warning before any suspension, save for exceptional cases (as determined by GoDaddy in its reasonable discretion) or where GoDaddy is legally required to take immediate action.
11.7	Measures and tools for review. Notices and orders are generally subject to human review. GoDaddy may also use a machine learning model that helps process certain claims and detect phishing on websites hosted by GoDaddy. Actions taken in response to notices and/or orders which relate to the provision of content by users of the Service or visitors of the Site, if any, are generally subject to human review.
11.8	Right to terminate the use of the Services. You have the right to terminate the use of the Services in accordance with Sections 9 and 15 of this Agreement.
11.9	Content Moderation Decisions.
This Section may apply to you if:
Your issue relates to a GoDaddy online platform in the EU (meaning either a Service involving the sale and purchase of aftermarket domain names, or GoDaddy Community to the extent provided in the EU); and
Your issue concerns: (y) a decision taken by GoDaddy further to a notice you submitted to GoDaddy regarding the presence of information considered to be illegal content on a GoDaddy EU online platform; and/or (z) a decision taken by GoDaddy to remove (or to not remove) content or to suspend, restrict or terminate (or to not suspend, restrict or terminate) access to a GoDaddy EU online platform on the ground that you or any user of the Service provided Prohibited Content,
(a “
Content Moderation Decision
”).
If you disagree with a Content Moderation Decision, you may lodge a complaint against it with GoDaddy. The complaint must be lodged within six (6) months from the date on which you are informed of the Content Moderation Decision. To lodge your complaint, you will need to respond to the email informing you of the Content Moderation Decision and provide any additional context or information for GoDaddy to reassess the Content Moderation Decision. GoDaddy will review your complaint and respond through its internal complaint-handling system (the “Internal Complaint-Handling System”).
If a user frequently provides manifestly unfounded complaints through the Internal Complaint-Handling System, GoDaddy may suspend the processing of its complaints, after a prior warning.
If you disagree with a Content Moderation Decision and/or the outcome of the Internal Complaint-Handling System, you may also engage with any out-of-court dispute settlement body certified by the relevant EU authority. For your information, decisions taken by these bodies are not binding. Also, GoDaddy may refuse to engage in such a procedure if the issue has already been resolved concerning the same content and the same grounds. The list of these certified bodies (if any) is expected to be published by the EU Commission shortly. We will update the terms of this Agreement once the relevant information becomes available.
In any case, you may also initiate judicial proceedings before a competent court, according to the applicable law, at any stage.
11.10	For the purposes of Sections 11.6 and 11.9, “frequently” means the submission of 2 or more unfounded notices or complaints (as relevant) over a period of 12 months. For the purposes of Sections 11.5, 11.6 and 11.9, when determining whether a specific behavior requires such a suspension or termination and the duration of the suspension or termination, GoDaddy takes into account the relevant facts and circumstances, which may include such things as the volume of manifestly unfounded notices or complaints submitted within the period referred to above, the seriousness and/or the impact of the behavior. A notice may for instance be considered as manifestly unfounded if it is evident that it does not relate to alleged illegal content and instead refers solely to personal and/or subjective considerations. Specifically as regards the provision of illegal content, these criteria also include the volume of illegal content provided, the extent of its impact and/or the gravity of the behavior (e.g., as regards the nature of the content concerned and its consequences) and the frequency of the behavior.
11.11	Search Engine: Recommender Systems Disclosure.
Our Site and certain of our Services include a search engine that enables you to search for domain name registrations based on your query, account search history, and location.
The search engine generates a list of results based on generic matching between the keywords or character sequences searched and the domain names available for purchase. If the exact domain name you searched for is unavailable, the search engine will display results for domain names that match your keywords and characters, potentially including alternative top-level domain names, which may take into account your location. For example, if you are located in Germany, the search engine may prioritize “.de” top-level domain names in order to present you more tailored results. Additionally, the search may feature partnerships labeled “Promoted” in the search results.
The keywords or sequences of characters that you searched are the most significant parameters used to determine the results, whereas search history and location are secondary parameters used to further refine the list of results. As currently designed, the search engine does not allow you to change these parameters.
11.12	DSA Point of Contact.
If you have any questions or queries about this Section 11 or any other DSA-related matters, you can contact us by email at
dsainquiries@godaddy.com.
12. ONLINE SAFETY ACT 2023 (“
OSA
”) SUPPLEMENTAL TERMS OF SERVICE FOR ONLINE CONTENT IN THE UK
12.1. This Section 12 sets out provisions, processes and disclosures that supplement the rest of this Agreement, as required under the OSA, which prohibits the uploading, sharing or making available of illegal or harmful content online in the UK. These provisions only apply to you if you are a UK User and you are using the Site or Services falling within the scope of the OSA. In the event of any conflict between the terms set out in this Section 12 and the other provisions of this Agreement, the terms of Section 12 shall prevail.
12.2 Rules of conduct. UK Users are prohibited from using, providing, publishing or transmitting Prohibited Content on this Site or in their use of the Services (specifically including any User Content that is incompatible with or violates the OSA). Further details regarding Prohibited Content and how GoDaddy implements measures to protect UK Users from accessing  Prohibited Content can be found in its OSA Policy which can be found here: GoDaddy OSA Policy.
12.3 Content moderation overview. GoDaddy may take action against any UK User Content, in accordance with Section 10 above. In addition, GoDaddy may receive notices through its OSA Reporting and Complaints Procedure (as described below), or regulatory orders requiring the suspension or termination of Services or User Content in breach of the OSA. GoDaddy will review, and may take action in accordance with its obligations under the OSA. These actions may entail the restrictions mentioned in this Section 12 below, or any other restrictions in accordance with this Agreement.
12.4 Notifying alleged illegal content and complaints. You may report to GoDaddy the presence on this Site of content that you consider to be illegal or prohibited under the OSA, or raise a complaint in relation to GoDaddy’s compliance with the OSA, through the mechanism accessible on our Support Center. GoDaddy’s processing and address of such complaints is dependent on the nature of the content concerned by the complaint.
12.5 Restrictions. GoDaddy may at any time, and without any liability or right to provide compensation, and in some cases without prior notice, remove any Prohibited Content provided on (or through) this Site or any Service, or suspend or terminate a Service (e.g., taking down a website hosted by GoDaddy), where required under the OSA or any regulatory orders, or where a User is otherwise in breach of this Agreement.
12.6 Rights. Under the OSA, UK Users  may have the right to bring a claim for breach of contract under this Agreement if: (a) regulated user-generated content which the UK User generates, uploads or shares is taken down, or access to it is restricted, by GoDaddy in breach of this Agreement, or (b) a UK User is suspended or banned from using the Services in breach of this Agreement. If a UK User considers that GoDaddy has breached this Section 12.6, then the UK User may make a complaint via the procedure outlined in Section 12.4.
12.7 OSA Point of Contact. If you have any questions or queries about this Section 12 or any other OSA-related matters, you can contact us by email at
osainquiries@godaddy.com
.
13. DISCONTINUED SERVICES; END OF LIFE POLICY
GoDaddy reserves the right to cease offering or providing any of the (i) Services or (ii) individual features, functionalities, or aspects of the Services at any time, for any or no reason, and without prior notice. Although GoDaddy makes great effort to maximize the lifespan of all its Services and features, functionalities, or aspects of the Services, there are times when a Service or specific feature, functionality, or aspect of a Service that we offer will be discontinued or reach its End-of-Life ("
EOL
"). If that is the case, those Services, or the specific feature, functionality, or aspect of that Service, will no longer be supported by GoDaddy, in any way, effective on the EOL date.
Notice and Migration.
In the event that any Service we offer has reached or will reach EOL, we will attempt to notify you thirty or more days in advance of the EOL date. It is your responsibility to take all necessary steps to replace the Service by migrating to a new Service before the EOL date, or by entirely ceasing reliance on said Service before the EOL date. In either case, GoDaddy will either offer a comparable Service for you to migrate to for the remainder of the term of your purchase, a prorated in-store credit, or a prorated refund, to be determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion. GoDaddy may, with or without notice to you, migrate you to the most up-to-date version of the Service, if available. You agree to take full responsibility for any and all loss or damage arising from any such migration. In the event that a feature, functionality, or aspect of any Service we offer has reached or will reach EOL, then we will attempt to notify you thirty or more days in advance of the EOL date.  However, if the Service maintains a least reasonably equivalent functionality without such feature, functionality, or aspect, as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion, GoDaddy will not be required to offer a comparable feature or functionality for the Service or a refund.
No Liability.
GoDaddy will not be liable to you or any third party for any modification, suspension, or discontinuance of any of the (i) Services or (ii) individual features, functionalities, or aspects of the Services we may offer, provide or facilitate access to.
14. BETA SERVICES
From time to time, GoDaddy may offer new Services (limited preview services or new features to existing Services) in a pre-release version. New Services, new features to existing Services or limited preview services shall be known, individually and collectively, as “
Beta Services
”. If you elect to use any Beta Services, then your use of the Beta Services is subject to the following terms and conditions: (i) You acknowledge and agree that the Beta Services are pre-release versions and may not work properly; (ii) You acknowledge and agree that your use of the Beta Services may expose you to unusual risks of operational failures; (iii) The Beta Services are provided as-is, so we do not recommend using them in production or mission critical environments; (iv) GoDaddy reserves the right to modify, change, or discontinue any aspect of the Beta Services at any time; (v) Commercially released versions of the Beta Services may change substantially, and programs that use or run with the Beta Services may not work with the commercially released versions or subsequent releases; (vi) GoDaddy may limit availability of customer service support time dedicated to support of the Beta Services; (vii) You acknowledge and agree to provide prompt feedback regarding your experience with the Beta Services in a form reasonably requested by us, including information necessary to enable us to duplicate errors or problems you experience; (viii) You acknowledge and agree that GoDaddy  may track your browsing behavior, links clicked, items purchased, your device type, and to collect various data, including analytics, about how you use and interact with our Beta Services; (ix) You acknowledge and agree that all information regarding your use of the Beta Services, including your experience with and opinions regarding the Beta Services, is confidential, and may not be disclosed to a third party or used for any purpose other than providing feedback to GoDaddy; (x) The Beta Services are provided “as is”, “as available”, and “with all faults”.
You acknowledge and agree that we may use your feedback for any purpose, including product development purposes. At our request you will provide us with comments that we may use publicly for press materials and marketing collateral. Any intellectual property inherent in your feedback or arising from your use of the Beta Services shall be owned exclusively by GoDaddy. To the fullest extent permitted by law, GoDaddy disclaims any and all warranties, statutory, express or implied, with respect to the Beta Services including, but not limited to, any implied warranties of title, merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose and non-infringement.
15. FEES AND PAYMENTS
You agree that your Payment Method may be charged by one of our affiliated entities. If, during your purchase, your payment was identified as being processed in the United States, your transaction will be processed by GoDaddy.com, LLC; if your payment was identified as being processed in Canada, your transaction will be processed by GoDaddy Domains Canada, Inc.; if your payment was identified as being processed in the United Kingdom, your transaction will be processed by GoDaddy Europe, Ltd.; if your payment was identified as being processed in India, your transaction will be processed by GoDaddy India Domains and Hosting Services India Pvt Ltd; if your payment was identified as being processed in Australia, your transaction will be process by GoDaddy Online Services Australia PTY Limited. If your payment was identified as being processed in the Netherlands, your transaction will be processed by GoDaddy Online Services Netherlands B.V. If, during your purchase, your payment was identified as being processed in a country or region that is not listed above, your transaction may be processed by an entity within the disclosed country that is affiliated with our local payment service provider, and subject to the provisions of our Privacy Policy.
(A) GENERAL TERMS, INCLUDING AUTOMATIC RENEWAL TERMS
Payment Due at Time of Order; Non-Refundable.
You agree to pay all amounts due for Services at the time you order them.  All amounts are non-refundable unless otherwise noted in the
Refund Policy
.
Price Changes.
GoDaddy reserves the right to change its prices and fees at any time, and such changes shall either be posted online at this Site and effective immediately without need for further notice to you or notice shall be provided to you by email. If you have purchased or obtained Services for a period of months or years, changes in prices and fees shall be effective when the Services in question come up for renewal as further described below.
Payment Types.
Except as prohibited in any product-specific agreement, you may pay for Services by using any of the following “
Payment Methods
”: (i)  valid credit card; (ii) “Good As Gold Prepaid Services” (defined below); (iii) electronic payment from your personal or business checking account, as appropriate (and as defined below); (iv) PayPal; (v) International Payment Option (as defined below); (vi) via In-Store Credit balances, if applicable (and as defined below); or (vii) any other method you use to pay for Services as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion, each a “Payment Method”. You acknowledge and agree that we may store your successful Payment Methods, as determined by us, used to pay for a Service as a Payment Method that we may use for payment for future purchases or renewals, including where a renewal is executed for a different subscription term and/or price as described herein. You can manage your stored Payment Methods and view or change your automatic renewal settings at any time by logging into your GoDaddy account.  The “Express Checkout” feature automatically places an order for the applicable Service and charges the designated Express Checkout Payment Method for your Account. Confirmation of that order will be sent to the email address on file for your Account. Your Payment Method on file must be kept valid if you have any active Services in your Account. In addition, you agree that the location for the processing of your payments may change for any reason, including the type of Payment Method chosen, the currency selected, or changes or updates made to your Payment Method.
Refunds Issued.
You agree that where refunds are issued to your Payment Method, GoDaddy's issuance of a refund receipt is only confirmation that GoDaddy has submitted your refund to the Payment Method charged at the time of the original sale, and that GoDaddy has no control over when the refund will be applied towards your Payment Method’s available balance. You further acknowledge and agree that the payment provider and/or individual issuing bank associated with your Payment Method establish and regulate the time frames for posting your refund, and that such refund posting time frames may range from five (5) business days to a full billing cycle, or longer.
In the event a refund is issued to your Payment Method and the payment provider, payment processor or individual issuing bank associated with your Payment Method imposes any limitations on refunds, including but not limited to, limitations as to the timing of the refund or the number of refunds allowed, then GoDaddy, in its sole and absolute discretion, reserves the right to issue the refund either (i) in the form of an In-Store Credit; (ii) via issuance of a GoDaddy check, which will be sent to the mailing address on file for your Account; or (iii) in some jurisdictions, as a bank transfer, when the payment processor cannot refund back to the Payment Method.  GoDaddy also has the right to offer an In-Store Credit for customers seeking refunds, even if there are no limitations on refunds imposed by the Payment Method.
Monthly Billing Date.
If you are being billed on a monthly basis, your monthly billing date will be based on the date of the month you purchased the Services, unless that date falls after the 28th of the month, in which case your billing date will be the 28th of each month.
Auto-Renewal Terms.
Other than as required by applicable law, GoDaddy does not retain hard copies or electronic versions of mandate, standing order or standing instruction forms and/or any signed consents relating to your usage of our automatic renewal services, and we are therefore unable to provide any such document upon request. You may view or change your automatic renewal settings at any time by logging into your GoDaddy account.
IN ORDER TO ENSURE THAT YOU DO NOT EXPERIENCE ANY INTERRUPTION OR LOSS OF SERVICES, ALL SERVICES ARE OFFERED ON AUTOMATIC RENEWAL UNLESS OTHERWISE SPECIFIED ON THIS SITE
(AND SUBJECT TO ANY OPT-OUT OR TERMINATION RIGHT YOU MAY INVOKE)
.
EXCEPT FOR REASONS DESCRIBED BELOW IN THIS SECTION (SEE SECTION TITLED “REDUCED TERM PAYMENT ATTEMPTS”), SERVICES SHALL AUTOMATICALLY RENEW AT THE END OF EACH SERVICE PERIOD FOR A SUBSEQUENT SERVICE PERIOD OF EQUAL LENGTH (EXCEPT FOR DOMAIN NAMES WHICH MAY RENEW FOR THE ORIGINAL SERVICE PERIOD). FOR EXAMPLE, IF YOUR LAST SERVICE PERIOD IS FOR ONE YEAR, YOUR RENEWAL PERIOD WILL TYPICALLY BE FOR ONE YEAR.
UNLESS YOU DISABLE THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OPTION, GoDaddy WILL AUTOMATICALLY RENEW THE APPLICABLE SERVICE WHEN IT COMES UP FOR RENEWAL AND WILL, SUBJECT TO SECTION 14(F) BELOW, ATTEMPT TO TAKE PAYMENT FIRST FROM THE PAYMENT METHOD ASSOCIATED WITH THE SERVICE(S) IN YOUR ACCOUNT ("PRIMARY PAYMENT METHOD"). IF THE PRIMARY PAYMENT METHOD FAILS, WE MAY ATTEMPT PAYMENT FROM YOUR DESIGNATED BACKUP PAYMENT METHOD(S) ON FILE WITH GoDaddy ("DESIGNATED BACKUP PAYMENT METHODS”). IF THERE IS NO PRIMARY PAYMENT METHOD OR A DESIGNATED BACKUP PAYMENT METHOD ASSOCIATED WITH A SERVICE, OR A DESIGNATED BACKUP PAYMENT METHOD FAILS, YOU AGREE THAT WE MAY ATTEMPT TO CHARGE ANY OTHER PAYMENT METHODS ON FILE IN YOUR ACCOUNT ("ALTERNATE PAYMENT METHODS"). RENEWALS WILL BE CHARGED AT GoDaddy’S THEN CURRENT RATES, WHICH YOU ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE MAY BE HIGHER OR LOWER THAN THE RATES FOR THE ORIGINAL SERVICE PERIOD. YOU MAY ALSO MANUALLY RENEW A SERVICE FOR AN ALTERNATIVE SERVICE PERIOD, WHICH SHALL THEREAFTER BECOME THE DEFAULT SERVICE PERIOD FOR ALL SUBSEQUENT RENEWALS (UNLESS YOU EXPRESSLY OPT OTHERWISE). IN ORDER TO SEE THE RENEWAL SETTINGS APPLICABLE TO YOU AND YOUR SERVICES, SIMPLY LOG INTO YOUR ACCOUNT MANAGER FROM THIS SITE AND FOLLOW THE STEPS FOUND
HERE
.
REDUCED TERM PAYMENT ATTEMPTS
: IN THE EVENT RENEWAL WITH THE PRIMARY PAYMENT METHOD, DESIGNATED BACKUP PAYMENT METHOD(S) AND ALTERNATE PAYMENT METHOD(S) ALL FAIL, GoDaddy SHALL BE ENTITLED TO ATTEMPT TO RENEW THE APPLICABLE SERVICE FOR THE SHORTEST SERVICE PERIOD THE APPLICABLE SERVICE IS CURRENTLY BEING MADE AVAILABLE FOR PURCHASE . SUCH RENEWALS SHALL BE CHARGED AT OUR THEN CURRENT RATE, DETAILS OF WHICH WILL BE AVAILABLE ON OUR WEBSITE (AND SUCH RATES MAY BE HIGHER OR LOWER THAN THE RATE FOR YOUR ORIGINAL PURCHASE).  IF RENEWAL OF THE APPLICABLE SERVICE IS SUCCESSFUL FOR THE SHORTER SERVICE PERIOD, THIS SHORTER SERVICE PERIOD SHALL BECOME YOUR DEFAULT SERVICE PERIOD FOR THE PURPOSES OF ALL FUTURE RENEWALS (UNLESS WE AGREE OR INFORM YOU OTHERWISE). FOR EXAMPLE, IF YOUR CURRENT SERVICE PERIOD IS TWO YEARS, BUT ALL PAYMENT ATTEMPTS FOR A FURTHER TWO-YEAR SERVICE PERIOD FAIL, YOUR SERVICE MAY BE RENEWED FOR ONE YEAR INSTEAD, AND ALL FUTURE RENEWALS WILL THEN IN TURN CONTINUE TO BE ONE YEAR (UNLESS WE AGREE OR INFORM YOU OTHERWISE).
IF YOU DO NOT WISH FOR ANY SERVICE TO AUTOMATICALLY RENEW, YOU MAY ELECT TO CANCEL YOUR RENEWAL, IN WHICH CASE, YOUR SERVICE WILL TERMINATE UPON EXPIRATION OF THE THEN CURRENT TERM, UNLESS YOU MANUALLY RENEW YOUR SERVICE PRIOR TO THAT DATE. IN OTHER WORDS, SHOULD YOU ELECT TO CANCEL YOUR AUTOMATIC RENEWAL AND FAIL TO MANUALLY RENEW IT BEFORE IT EXPIRES, YOU MAY EXPERIENCE AN INTERRUPTION OR LOSS OF SERVICE, AND GoDaddy SHALL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU OR ANY THIRD PARTY REGARDING THE SAME.
IN ADDITION, GoDaddy MAY PARTICIPATE IN “RECURRING BILLING PROGRAMS” OR “ACCOUNT UPDATER SERVICES” SUPPORTED BY YOUR CREDIT CARD PROVIDER (AND ULTIMATELY DEPENDENT ON YOUR BANK’S PARTICIPATION).  IF WE ARE UNABLE TO SUCCESSFULLY CHARGE YOUR EXISTING PAYMENT METHOD, YOUR CREDIT CARD PROVIDER (OR YOUR BANK) MAY NOTIFY US OF UPDATES TO YOUR CREDIT CARD NUMBER AND/OR EXPIRATION DATE, OR THEY MAY AUTOMATICALLY CHARGE YOUR NEW CREDIT CARD ON OUR BEHALF WITHOUT NOTIFICATION TO US.  IN ACCORDANCE WITH RECURRING BILLING PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS, IN THE EVENT THAT WE ARE NOTIFIED OF AN UPDATE TO YOUR CREDIT CARD NUMBER AND/OR EXPIRATION DATE, GoDaddy WILL AUTOMATICALLY UPDATE YOUR PAYMENT PROFILE ON YOUR BEHALF. GoDaddy MAKES NO GUARANTEES THAT WE WILL REQUEST OR RECEIVE UPDATED CREDIT CARD INFORMATION. YOU ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT IT IS YOUR SOLE RESPONSIBILITY TO MODIFY AND MAINTAIN YOUR ACCOUNT SETTINGS, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO (I) CANCELLING PRODUCTS AND (II) ENSURING YOUR ASSOCIATED PAYMENT METHOD(S) ARE CURRENT AND VALID.  FURTHER, YOU ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT YOUR FAILURE TO DO SO, MAY RESULT IN THE INTERRUPTION OR LOSS OF SERVICES, AND GoDaddy SHALL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU OR ANY THIRD PARTY REGARDING THE SAME.
If for any reason GoDaddy is unable to charge your Payment Method for the full amount owed, or if GoDaddy receives notification of a chargeback, reversal, payment dispute, or is charged a penalty for any fee it previously charged to your Payment Method, you agree that GoDaddy may pursue all available lawful remedies in order to obtain payment, including but not limited to, immediate cancellation, without notice to you, of any domain names or Services registered or renewed on your behalf.  GoDaddy also reserves the right to charge you reasonable “
administrative fees
" for (i) tasks GoDaddy may perform outside the normal scope of its Services, (ii) additional time and/or costs GoDaddy may incur in providing its Services, and/or (iii) your noncompliance with this Agreement (as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion). Typical administrative or processing fee scenarios include, but are not limited to (i) customer service issues that require additional personal time or attention; (ii) UDRP actions(s) in connection with your domain name(s) and/or disputes that require accounting or legal services, whether performed by GoDaddy staff or by outside firms retained by GoDaddy; (iii) recouping any and all costs and fees, including the cost of Services, incurred by GoDaddy as the results of chargebacks or other payment disputes brought by you, your bank or Payment Method processor. These administrative fees or processing fees will be billed to the Payment Method you have on file with GoDaddy.
GoDaddy may offer product-level pricing in various currencies. The transaction will be processed in the selected currency and the pricing displayed during the checkout process will be the actual amount submitted for payment.  For certain Payment Methods, the issuer of your Payment Method may charge you a foreign transaction fee or other charge, which may be added to the final amount that appears on your bank statement or post as a separate amount. Please check with the issuer of your Payment Method for details. In addition, regardless of the selected currency, you acknowledge and agree that you may be charged Value Added Tax ("
VAT
"), Goods and Services Tax ("
GST
"), or other localized fees and/or taxes, based on your bank and/or the country indicated in your billing address section.
(B) REFUND POLICY
Products and Services available for refunds are described in our
Refund Policy
.
(C) GOOD AS GOLD PREPAID SERVICES
Service Details. By using Good As Gold Prepaid Services, you may transfer funds to GoDaddy to fund your Good As Gold Prepaid Services account (“
Good As Gold Account
”). You may then use your Good As Gold Account to purchase any Services. You may fund your Good As Gold Account by wire transfer.
You acknowledge that funds transferred to your Good As Gold Account will be held by GoDaddy and will not accrue or pay interest for your benefit. To the extent any interest may accrue, you agree that GoDaddy shall be entitled to receive and keep any such amounts to cover costs associated with Good As Gold Prepaid Services.
You agree that all transactions using Good As Gold Prepaid Services will be conducted in U.S. dollars.
Your Good As Gold Account must be funded on an initial basis with no less than funds equivalent to $1,000.00 U.S. dollars.
All payments must be for the full amount required at purchase.
Wire Transfer Details.
Wire transfers may be initiated in foreign currency to fund your Good As Gold Account, however the natural currency of the GoDaddy bank account is U.S. Dollars. Foreign currency wires will be automatically converted and deposited in U.S. Dollars. Please note that exchange rate fees may apply.
You are responsible for all wire transfer fees, both incoming and outgoing, associated with your Good As Gold Account. Any non-U.S. wire transfers may be subject to fees by your bank, intermediary banks, or GoDaddy’s bank, which may reduce the amount of the money received by GoDaddy’s bank and subsequently funded into your Good As Gold Account. You hereby expressly authorize GoDaddy (i) to reduce your Good As Gold Account by the amount of wire transfer fees GoDaddy incurs in order to receive your funds; and/or (ii) to charge a twenty-dollar ($20.00) service fee (“
Service Fee
”) in connection with the termination of your Good As Gold Account.  All fees are subject to change at any time, and such changes shall be posted online and effective immediately without need for further notice to you.
You can verify the remaining funds in your Good As Gold Account at any time through your  Account or the shopping cart. Should you decide to terminate your Good As Gold Account (or should GoDaddy opt to terminate your Good As Gold Account because you have breached an obligation under the Good As Gold Service Agreement), then the balance in your Good As Gold Account will be refunded, net the Service Fee.
Additional funds may be added to your Good As Gold Account at any time.
Your Use of Good As Gold Prepaid Services.
Use of funds in your Good As Gold Account can only be made through the GoDaddy purchase process at GoDaddy’s website. Purchases may not be made unless there are sufficient, available funds in your Good As Gold Account at the time of purchase to cover the entire purchase amount, including any related fees as set forth herein or in other relevant agreements.
(D) PAY BY CHECK (ELECTRONIC PAYMENT)
By using GoDaddy’s pay by check option (“
Pay By Check
”), you can purchase GoDaddy Services using an electronic payment (from your personal or business checking account (“
Checking Account
”), as appropriate). In connection, you agree to allow a third-party check services provider, Certegy Check Services, Inc., (“
Check Services Provider
”) to debit the full amount of your purchase from your Checking Account, which is non-refundable. Check Services Provider will create an electronic funds transfer (“
EFT
”) or bank draft, which will be presented to your bank or financial institution for payment from your Checking Account. The Checking Account must be at a financial institution in the United States, and payment must be in U.S. Dollars.
It is your responsibility to keep your Checking Account current and funded. You agree that (i) Check Services Provider or GoDaddy reserve the right to decline a transaction for any reason (including, but not limited to, payments that fail to go through as a result of your Checking Account no longer existing or not holding available/sufficient funds) and (ii) in such event, neither Check Services Provider nor GoDaddy shall be liable to you or any third party regarding the same. If for any reason Check Services Provider is unable to withdraw the full amount owed for the Services provided, you agree that Check Services Provider and GoDaddy may pursue all available lawful remedies in order to obtain payment (plus any applicable fees).  GoDaddy is not responsible for the actions of Check Services Provider. You agree that if the EFT or bank draft is returned unpaid, you will pay a service charge in accordance with the fees permitted by law for each U.S. State. A help article describing the Check Services Provider and outlining the service charges referenced above can be found
here
. These fees may be debited from your Checking Account using an EFT or bank draft. All fees are in U.S. Dollars.
GoDaddy and its service providers, including but not limited to Check Services Provider  and Complete Payment Recovery Services, Inc., may provide you with notices, including by email, regular mail, SMS, MMS, text message, postings on the services, or other reasonable means now known or hereafter developed. Such notices may not be received if you violate these terms of service by accessing the services in an unauthorized manner. Your agreement to these terms of service constitutes your agreement that you are deemed to have received any and all notices that would have been delivered had you accessed the services in an authorized manner. Failure to receive such notices for any reason shall not excuse any payment or other obligation to GoDaddy and Check Services Provider. You further expressly authorize GoDaddy and its service providers, including but not limited to Check Services Provider and Complete Payment Recovery Services, Inc., and their affiliates to contact you, via auto-dialer, pre-recorded messages, or any other method, on any of your mobile phone numbers or emails. You further acknowledge that email addresses you provide are not shared, accessed by others and are not employer-related email addresses.
(E) INTERNATIONAL PAYMENT OPTIONS
GoDaddy offers a variety of alternative international payment options through a variety of International Payment Providers (“
IPP
”). In the event you select an IPP, you represent that you have already agreed to any and all of the IPP’s applicable customer service agreements in advance of completing your transaction at GoDaddy.  You also agree to allow the IPP to debit the full amount of your purchase from the selected account or payment method, collectively “Funding Sources”. In addition, you agree to allow the selected IPP to debit, if applicable, an “Exchange Rate Conversion Fee”, as well as any other fees or charges applicable to your agreement with the IPP (collectively, the “
IPP Fees
”), from your Funding Sources. You understand and agree that IPP Fees are subject to change at any time by the IPP without notice to you by GoDaddy.
It is your responsibility to keep your Funding Sources current and funded. You agree that (i) the IPP or GoDaddy reserve the right to decline a transaction for any reason and (ii) neither the IPP nor GoDaddy shall be liable to you or any third party regarding the same. You acknowledge that GoDaddy will not attempt to fulfill the Services purchased by you until GoDaddy receives confirmation of payment from the IPP through its associated payment processor. You acknowledge there may be a gap of several hours or days between the time you place an order and the time the IPP confirms payment through its associated payment processor. If GoDaddy does not receive confirmation of payment from the IPP through its associated payment processor within thirty (30) days from when the order is placed, your order may be cancelled, at which time you will need to commence the purchase process again. In the event that you would like to cancel payment for a pending transaction, you may cancel the order through your GoDaddy account. Payments received on previously cancelled orders will be automatically refunded to the original Payment Method when possible.
If, at the time GoDaddy receives confirmation of payment from the IPP (through its associated payment processor), either (i) the Services (including domain names) are no longer available for purchase; or (ii) a pending order has been cancelled in our systems; or (iii) the confirmation of payment does not match the dollar amount of the pending order, and as a result your purchase is either over-funded or under-funded, GoDaddy may automatically issue a partial refund (in the case of over-funding) or a full refund (in the case of under-funding) to your Funding Source. If the IPP (or its associated payment processor) imposes refund limitations of any kind, GoDaddy reserves the right to issue refunds to an In-Store Credit balance or as a bank transfer, when the payment processor cannot refund back to the Payment Method.  If you receive a full refund, you will need to begin the purchase process again. You agree that the IPP reserves the right not to refund IPP Fees associated with a refunded transaction. Accordingly, any refunds issued by GoDaddy will be net of the IPP Fees unless otherwise specified.
(F) IN-STORE CREDIT BALANCES
In the event that your Account contains a credit issued by us, it may only be applied to the purchase of a Service (each an "
In-Store-Credit
") subject to the following terms: (1) you may apply any available In-Store Credit to any future purchase of Services in your Account; and (2)  you authorize GoDaddy to apply any available In-Store Credits to any upcoming product renewals, outstanding administrative fees, chargebacks, or other fees related to your Account, including partial payments. Regardless of the amount of In-Store Credit available in your account, GoDaddy is not responsible for the loss of products resulting from an inability to collect funds from your Payment Methods or the In-Store Credit. In-Store Credits will be applied based on the currency selected in the shopping cart at the time of purchase (or renewal). If you have more than one In-Store Credit, then the credits will be processed according to the age of the credit, with the oldest In-Store Credit being applied first. If additional funds are required to complete the purchase or renewal, In-Store Credits held in a non-selected currency will be converted using GoDaddy’s daily exchange rate based on the age of the In-Store Credit (oldest to newest) until (i) enough funds are allocated to complete the transaction, or (ii) there is no available balance left in your account. You understand and agree that at the time of conversion, GoDaddy may also impose an additional administrative fee.
You acknowledge that In-Store Credits are non-transferable, may only be used in the Account in which they were acquired and may expire in accordance with applicable law. Complimentary In-Store Credits will expire two years after issuance or within any other time period GoDaddy may specify in your Account. Log into your account to view your In-Store Credit balance and any applicable expiration dates. In the event that GoDaddy terminates your Account, you acknowledge and agree that any remaining available In-Store Credits will be forfeited.
You also acknowledge that funds associated with your In-Store Credits will be held by GoDaddy and will not accrue or pay interest for your behalf. To the extent any interest may accrue, you agree that GoDaddy is entitled to receive and keep any such amounts to cover costs associated with supporting the In-Store Credits functionality.
(G) EXPIRED DOMAIN NAME PURCHASES
For expired domain names purchased through your account, you agree that you are responsible for payment within forty-eight (48) hours of auction close for the successful bid amount plus the one (1) year renewal or transfer fee (from the end of the domain name’s previous registration period), plus ICANN fee, if applicable, or any valid payment method associated with the account, will be charged on the third day following the auction close. If we are unable to collect payment, you may lose the rights to purchase the domain name.
(H) ROUND UP FOR CHARITY
If you participate in Round Up for Charity, you hereby authorize GoDaddy to either 1) donate an amount selected by you, or 2) round up your transaction to the nearest dollar and donate 100% of the difference, to a small business relief fund (“
Donation
*”). GoDaddy will take reasonable steps to ensure your Donation is properly disbursed, in our sole discretion, to qualifying small businesses negatively impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic and will not withhold any Donation made by you through Round Up For Charity. You understand your Donation is not eligible for a refund or in-store credit.
(I) BUY NOW PAY LATER OPTIONS
Use of a “
buy now pay later
” option such as an installment payment or financing is subject to the following terms and conditions. You acknowledge and agree that GoDaddy shall not be liable to you or any third party regarding any interest, late fee, other amount, collection effort, or change in credit score that arises out of or relates to the buy now pay later option. You further agree that repayment of a buy now pay later option may be governed by your agreement with a third party. Any representation that GoDaddy makes regarding a repayment term related to a buy now pay later option is for convenience only. A repayment term such as a required down payment, late fee, or interest might vary or be subject to change, and is in the control of a third party. Notwithstanding the foregoing, GoDaddy shall not be responsible or otherwise liable to you or any third party for disclosing or failing to disclose any repayment term, which you are responsible for determining.
Certain installment payment options will only apply to a selected Service term, which may auto-renew for the full amount unless you manually renew the Service term with a subsequent installment payment.
(J) GENERAL TERMS REGARDING PAYOUTS FROM
GoDaddy
GoDaddy will make any payment(s) owed to you to the payment method of your choice, subject to the terms below (“
Payout(s)
”). In order to receive a Payout from GoDaddy, you will need to set up a payee, assign it to your account, and provide GoDaddy with all information and documentation require by us to set up a Payout account. We may delay, withhold, or suspend Payout(s) to comply with applicable laws, court orders, or request from government authorities (including but not limited to tax-related compliance) or in cases where you have not provided, or provided incomplete, required information.
Set up a Payee Account
Fees. A list of supported payment methods, applicable fees, and minimum payment thresholds are published here:
Payee Account Information
If for any reason GoDaddy is unable to process your Payout for the full amount owed, or if GoDaddy receives notification of a reversal or payment dispute, or is charged a penalty for any Payout, you agree that GoDaddy may pursue all available lawful remedies regarding such fees. Typical administrative or processing fee scenarios include, but are not limited to recouping any and all costs and fees, including the cost of Services, incurred by GoDaddy as the result of failed Payouts or other payment disputes brought by you, your bank or Payout processor. These administrative fees or processing fees will be deducted from any amounts due or directly debited from your Payout account.
Fee Changes. GoDaddy reserves the right to change its prices and fees at any time, and such changes shall be posted online at this Site and effective immediately without need for further notice to you.
(K) GENERAL TERMS REGARDING SUBSCRIPTIONS
For subscription bundles purchased through your account, you agree to a 12-month commitment on your monthly subscription. Cancellations within the first 180 days of each 12- month commitment for your monthly subscription are subject to an
early cancellation fee
and you are responsible for the applicable early cancellation fee.
16. ADDITIONAL RESERVATION OF RIGHTS
GoDaddy expressly reserves the right to access any Account and any data hosted by You through the services, as well as the right to deny, cancel, terminate, suspend, lock, or modify access to (or control of) any Account or Services (including the right to cancel or transfer any domain name registration) for any reason (as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion), including but not limited to the following: (i) to correct mistakes made by GoDaddy in offering or delivering any Services (including any domain name registration), (ii) to protect the integrity and stability of, and correct mistakes made by, any domain name registry or registrar, (iii) to assist with our fraud and abuse detection and prevention efforts, (iv) to comply with court orders against you and/or your domain name or website and applicable local, state, national and international laws, rules and regulations, (v) to comply with requests of law enforcement, including subpoena requests, (vi) to comply with any dispute resolution process, (vii) to defend any legal action or threatened legal action without consideration for whether such legal action or threatened legal action is eventually determined to be with or without merit, (viii) to avoid any civil or criminal liability on the part of GoDaddy, its officers, directors, employees and agents, as well as GoDaddy's affiliates, including, but not limited to, instances where you have sued or threatened to sue GoDaddy, or (ix) to respond to an excessive amount of complaints related in any way to your Account, domain name(s), or content on your website that could result in damage to GoDaddy’s business, operations, reputation or shareholders.
GoDaddy expressly reserves the right to review every Account for excessive space and bandwidth utilization, and to terminate or apply additional fees to those Accounts that exceed allowed levels.
GoDaddy expressly reserves the right to terminate, without notice to you, any and all Services where, in GoDaddy's sole discretion, you are harassing or threatening GoDaddy and/or any of GoDaddy's employees.
GoDaddy Content.
Except for User Content, the content on this Site and within the Services, including without limitation GoDaddy data and the text, software, scripts, source code, API, graphics, photos, sounds, music, videos and interactive features and the trademarks, service marks, logos contained on this Site and within the Services (“
GoDaddy Content
”), are owned by or licensed to GoDaddy in perpetuity, and are subject to copyright, trademark, and/or patent protection in the United States and foreign countries, and other intellectual property rights under United States and foreign laws. GoDaddy Content is provided to you “as is”, “as available” and “with all faults” for your information and personal, non-commercial use only and may not be downloaded, copied, reproduced, distributed, transmitted, broadcast, displayed, sold, licensed, or otherwise exploited for any purposes whatsoever without the express prior written consent of GoDaddy. No right or license under any copyright, trademark, patent, or other proprietary right or license is granted by this Agreement. GoDaddy reserves all rights not expressly granted in and to the GoDaddy Content, this Site and the Services, and this Agreement does not transfer ownership of any of these rights.
17. NO SPAM; LIQUIDATED DAMAGES
No Spam.
We do not tolerate the transmission of spam. We monitor all traffic to and from our web servers for indications of spamming and maintain a spam abuse complaint center to register allegations of spam abuse.
We define spam as the sending of Unsolicited Commercial Email (UCE), Unsolicited Bulk Email (UBE) or Unsolicited Facsimiles (Fax), which is email or facsimile sent to recipients as an advertisement or otherwise, without first obtaining prior confirmed consent to receive these communications. This can include, but is not limited to, the following:
Email Messages
Newsgroup postings
Windows system messages
Pop-up messages (aka "adware" or "spyware" messages)
Instant messages (using AOL, MSN, Yahoo or other instant messenger programs)
Online chat room advertisements
Guestbook or Website Forum postings
Facsimile Solicitations
Text/SMS Messages
We will not allow our servers and services to be used for the purposes described above. In order to use our products and services, you must abide by all applicable laws and regulations in the geographic regions in which you use and or direct the use of the Site and Services, which include but are not limited to the CAN-SPAM Act of 2003 and the Telephone Consumer Protection Act in the United States. You must also abide by this no spam policy.
Commercial advertising and/or bulk emails or faxes may only be sent to recipients who have "opted-in" to receive messages. They must include a legitimate return address and reply-to address, the sender's physical address, and an opt-out method in the footer of the email or fax. Upon request by us, conclusive proof of opt-in may be required for an email address or fax number.
If we determine the account, products, or services in question are being used in association with spam, we may re-direct, suspend, or cancel any account, web site hosting, domain registration, email boxes, or other applicable products or services. In such event, at our election, we may require you to respond by email to us stating that you will cease to send spam and/or have spam sent on your behalf and to require a non-refundable reactivation fee to be paid before the site, email boxes, and/or services are reactivated.
We encourage all customers and recipients of email generated from our products and services to report suspected spam. Suspected abuse can be reported by email or through our
Spam Abuse Complaint Center
.
Liquidated Damages.
You agree that we may immediately terminate any Account which we believe, in our sole and absolute discretion, is transmitting or is otherwise connected with any spam or other unsolicited bulk email. In addition, if actual damages cannot be reasonably calculated then you agree to pay us liquidated damages in the amount of $1.00 for each piece of spam or unsolicited bulk email transmitted from or otherwise connected with your Account.
18. TRADEMARK AND/OR COPYRIGHT CLAIMS
GoDaddy supports the protection of intellectual property.  If you would like to submit (i) a trademark claim for violation of a mark on which you hold a valid, registered trademark or service mark, or (ii) a copyright claim for material on which you hold a bona fide copyright, please refer to GoDaddy’s
Trademark and/or Copyright Infringement Policy
referenced above.
19. LINKS TO THIRD-PARTY WEBSITES
This Site and the Services found at this Site may contain links to third-party websites that are not owned or controlled by GoDaddy. GoDaddy assumes no responsibility for the content, terms and conditions, privacy policies, or practices of any third-party websites. In addition, GoDaddy does not censor or edit the content of any third-party websites. By using this Site or the Services found at this Site, you expressly release GoDaddy from any and all liability arising from your use of any third-party website. Accordingly, GoDaddy encourages you to be aware when you leave this Site or the Services found at this Site and to review the terms and conditions, privacy policies, and other governing documents of each other website that you may visit.
20. DISCLAIMER OF REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES
YOU SPECIFICALLY ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT YOUR USE OF THIS SITE AND THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE SHALL BE AT YOUR OWN RISK AND THAT THIS SITE AND THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE ARE PROVIDED “AS IS”, “AS AVAILABLE” AND “WITH ALL FAULTS”. GoDaddy, ITS OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, EMPLOYEES, AGENTS, AND ALL THIRD PARTY SERVICE PROVIDERS DISCLAIM ALL WARRANTIES, STATUTORY, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, ANY IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF TITLE, MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NON-INFRINGEMENT. GoDaddy, ITS OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, EMPLOYEES, AND AGENTS MAKE NO REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES ABOUT (I) THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS, OR CONTENT OF THIS SITE, (II) THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS, OR CONTENT OF ANY SITES LINKED (THROUGH HYPERLINKS, BANNER ADVERTISING OR OTHERWISE) TO THIS SITE, (III) THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE OR ANY SITES LINKED (THROUGH HYPERLINKS, BANNER ADVERTISING OR OTHERWISE) TO THIS SITE, AND/OR (IV) ANY ACTION OR FAILURE TO ACT BY GoDaddy CONSISTENT WITH THE TERMS OF THIS AGREEMENT, AND GoDaddy ASSUMES NO LIABILITY OR RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE SAME.
IN ADDITION, YOU SPECIFICALLY ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT AUTO-GENERATED OUTPUTS INCLUDING TEXT, LOGOS, NAMES, SLOGANS, ETC. HAVE NOT BEEN REVIEWED FOR ACCURACY OR INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY CLEARANCE. GoDaddy MAKES NO REPRESENTATION, WARRANTY OR GUARANTEE AS TO THE ACCURACY, RELIABILITY, WHETHER OUTPUTS MAY INFRINGE ON THIRD-PARTY INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS, ETC. YOU SHOULD SEEK INDEPENDENT PROFESSIONAL LEGAL ADVICE BEFORE YOU RELY ON ANY AUTO-GENERATE OUTPUT.
YOU SPECIFICALLY ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT NO ORAL OR WRITTEN INFORMATION OR ADVICE PROVIDED BY GoDaddy, ITS OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, EMPLOYEES, OR AGENTS (INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION ITS CALL CENTER OR CUSTOMER SERVICE REPRESENTATIVES), AND THIRD PARTY SERVICE PROVIDERS  WILL (I) CONSTITUTE LEGAL OR FINANCIAL ADVICE OR (II) CREATE A WARRANTY OF ANY KIND WITH RESPECT TO THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE, AND USERS SHOULD NOT RELY ON ANY SUCH INFORMATION OR ADVICE.
THE FOREGOING DISCLAIMER OF REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES SHALL APPLY TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, AND SHALL SURVIVE ANY TERMINATION OR EXPIRATION OF THIS AGREEMENT OR YOUR USE OF THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE.
21. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
IN NO EVENT SHALL GoDaddy, ITS OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, EMPLOYEES,  AGENTS, AND ALL THIRD PARTY SERVICE PROVIDERS, BE LIABLE TO YOU OR ANY OTHER PERSON OR ENTITY FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES WHATSOEVER, INCLUDING ANY THAT MAY RESULT FROM (I) THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS, OR CONTENT OF THIS SITE, (II) THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS, OR CONTENT OF ANY SITES LINKED (THROUGH HYPERLINKS, BANNER ADVERTISING OR OTHERWISE) TO THIS SITE, (III) THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE OR ANY SITES LINKED (THROUGH HYPERLINKS, BANNER ADVERTISING OR OTHERWISE) TO THIS SITE, (IV) PERSONAL INJURY OR PROPERTY DAMAGE OF ANY NATURE WHATSOEVER, (V) THIRD-PARTY CONDUCT OF ANY NATURE WHATSOEVER, (VI) ANY UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO OR USE OF OUR SERVERS AND/OR ANY AND ALL CONTENT, PERSONAL INFORMATION, FINANCIAL INFORMATION OR OTHER INFORMATION AND DATA STORED THEREIN, (VII) ANY INTERRUPTION OR CESSATION OF SERVICES TO OR FROM THIS SITE OR ANY SITES LINKED (THROUGH HYPERLINKS, BANNER ADVERTISING OR OTHERWISE) TO THIS SITE, (VIII) ANY VIRUSES, WORMS, BUGS, TROJAN HORSES, OR THE LIKE, WHICH MAY BE TRANSMITTED TO, FROM, OR THROUGH, THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES (INCLUDING ANY SITES OR SERVICES LINKED TO THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES (WHETHER THROUGH HYPERLINKS, BANNER ADVERTISING OR OTHERWISE) AND/OR ANY REMOVAL OR ATTEMPTED REMOVAL THEREOF, (IX) ANY REVIEW, SCANNING, ACCESS TO, AND/OR MODIFICATION OF THE SERVICES USED BY YOU, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO ANY HOSTED ENVIRONMENT, (X) ANY USER CONTENT OR CONTENT THAT IS DEFAMATORY, HARASSING, ABUSIVE, HARMFUL TO MINORS OR ANY PROTECTED CLASS, PORNOGRAPHIC, “X-RATED”, OBSCENE OR OTHERWISE OBJECTIONABLE, (XI) ANY LOSS OR DAMAGE OF ANY KIND INCURRED AS A RESULT OF YOUR USE OF THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE, WHETHER BASED ON WARRANTY, CONTRACT, TORT, OR ANY OTHER LEGAL OR EQUITABLE THEORY, AND WHETHER OR NOT GoDaddy IS ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES,  AND/OR (XII) ANY AUTO-GENERATED OUTPUTS CREATED USING THE SERVICES.
IN ADDITION, YOU SPECIFICALLY ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT IN NO EVENT SHALL GoDaddy’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY EXCEED $10,000.00 U.S. DOLLARS.
THE FOREGOING LIMITATION OF LIABILITY SHALL APPLY TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, AND SHALL SURVIVE ANY TERMINATION OR EXPIRATION OF THIS AGREEMENT OR YOUR USE OF THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE.
22. INDEMNITY
You agree to protect, defend, indemnify and hold harmless GoDaddy and its officers, directors, employees, agents, and third party service providers from and against any and all claims, demands, costs, expenses, losses, liabilities and damages of every kind and nature (including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys’ fees) imposed upon or incurred by GoDaddy directly or indirectly arising from (i) your use of and access to this Site or the Services found at this Site; (ii) your violation of any provision of this Agreement or the policies or agreements which are incorporated herein; and/or (iii) your violation of any third-party right, including without limitation any intellectual property or other proprietary right.  The indemnification obligations under this section shall survive any termination or expiration of this Agreement or your use of this Site or the Services found at this Site.
23. COMPLIANCE WITH LOCAL LAWS
GoDaddy makes no representation or warranty that the content available on this Site or the Services found at this Site are appropriate in every country or jurisdiction, and access to this Site or the Services found at this Site from countries or jurisdictions where its content is illegal is prohibited.  Users who choose to access this Site or the Services found at this Site are responsible for compliance with all local laws, rules and regulations.
24. DISPUTES, BINDING INDIVIDUAL ARBITRATION AND WAIVER OF CLASS ACTIONS AND CLASS ARBITRATIONS
PLEASE READ THIS SECTION CAREFULLY.  FOLLOW THE INSTRUCTIONS BELOW IF YOU WISH TO OPT OUT OF THE PROVISIONS REQUIRING YOU TO RESOLVE DISPUTES THROUGH INDIVIDUAL ARBITRATION.
(A)
Disputes.
The terms of this Section shall apply to all Disputes between you and GoDaddy, except for disputes governed by the
Uniform Domain Name Dispute Resolution Policy
referenced above.  For the purposes of this Section, “Dispute” shall mean any dispute, claim, or action between you and GoDaddy arising under or relating to any GoDaddy Services or Products, GoDaddy’s websites, this Agreement, or any other transaction involving you and GoDaddy, whether in contract, warranty, misrepresentation, fraud, tort, intentional tort, statute, regulation, ordinance, or any other legal or equitable basis, and shall be interpreted to be given the broadest meaning allowable under law.
YOU AND GoDaddy AGREE THAT “DISPUTE” AS DEFINED IN THIS AGREEMENT SHALL NOT INCLUDE ANY CLAIM OR CAUSE OF ACTION BY YOU OR GoDaddy FOR (i) TRADE SECRET MISAPPROPRIATION, (ii) PATENT INFRINGEMENT, (iii) COPYRIGHT INFRINGEMENT OR MISUSE, AND (iv) TRADEMARK INFRINGEMENT OR DILUTION.
Moreover, notwithstanding anything else in this Agreement, you agree that a court, not the arbitrator, may decide if a claim falls within one of these four exceptions.
(B)
Binding Arbitration.
You and GoDaddy further agree: (i) to arbitrate all Disputes between the parties pursuant to the provisions in this Agreement; (ii) this Agreement memorializes a transaction in interstate commerce; (iii) the Federal Arbitration Act (9 U.S.C. §1, et seq.) governs the interpretation and enforcement of this Section; and (iv) this Section shall survive termination of this Agreement. ARBITRATION MEANS THAT YOU WAIVE YOUR RIGHT TO A JUDGE OR JURY IN A COURT PROCEEDING AND YOUR GROUNDS FOR APPEAL ARE LIMITED. The arbitrator may award you the same damages as a court sitting in proper jurisdiction, as limited by the Limitation of Liability set forth in Section 21 of this Agreement and may award declaratory or injunctive relief only in favor of the individual party seeking relief and only to the extent necessary to provide relief warranted by that party’s individual claim. In addition, in some instances, the costs of arbitration could exceed the costs of litigation and the right to discovery may be more limited in arbitration than in court. The decision of the arbitrator shall be final and enforceable by any court with jurisdiction over the parties.
(C)
Small Claims Court.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, you may bring an individual action in the small claims court of your state or municipality if the action is within that court’s jurisdiction and is pending only in that court.
(D)
Dispute Notice.
In the event of a Dispute, you or GoDaddy must first send to the other party a notice of the Dispute that shall include a written statement that sets forth the name, address and contact information of the party giving it, the facts giving rise to the Dispute, and the relief requested (the “
Dispute Notice
”). The Dispute Notice to GoDaddy must be addressed to: GoDaddy, 100 S. Mill Ave, Tempe, AZ 85281, Attn.: Legal Department (the “
GoDaddy Notice Address
”). The Dispute Notice to you will be sent by certified mail to the most recent address we have on file or otherwise in our records for you.  If GoDaddy and you do not reach an agreement to resolve the Dispute within sixty (60) days after the Dispute Notice is received, you or GoDaddy may commence an arbitration proceeding pursuant to this Section. Following submission and receipt of the Dispute Notice, each of us agrees to act in good faith to seek to resolve the Dispute before commencing arbitration.
(E)
WAIVER OF CLASS ACTIONS AND CLASS ARBITRATIONS.
YOU AND GoDaddy AGREE THAT EACH PARTY MAY BRING DISPUTES AGAINST THE OTHER PARTY ONLY IN AN INDIVIDUAL CAPACITY, AND NOT AS A PLAINTIFF OR CLASS MEMBER IN ANY PURPORTED CLASS OR REPRESENTATIVE PROCEEDING, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION FEDERAL OR STATE CLASS ACTIONS, OR CLASS ARBITRATIONS.  NEITHER YOU NOR GoDaddy WILL SEEK TO HAVE ANY DISPUTE HEARD AS A CLASS ACTION, PRIVATE ATTORNEY GENERAL ACTION, OR IN ANY OTHER PROCEEDING IN WHICH EITHER PARTY ACTS OR PROPOSES TO ACT IN A REPRESENTATIVE CAPACITY.  NO ARBITRATION OR OTHER PROCEEDING WILL BE COMBINED WITH ANOTHER WITHOUT THE PRIOR WRITTEN CONSENT OF ALL PARTIES TO ALL AFFECTED ARBITRATIONS OR PROCEEDINGS.
(F)
Arbitration Procedure.
If a party elects to commence arbitration, the arbitration will be administered by the American Arbitration Association (“
AAA
”) and governed by the Consumer Arbitration Rules of the AAA (“
AAA Rules
”) in conjunction with the rules set forth in this Agreement, except that AAA may not administer any multiple claimant or class arbitration, as the parties agree that the arbitration shall be limited to the resolution only of individual claims.  The AAA Rules are at
www.adr.org
or by calling 1-800-778-7879. If there is a conflict between the AAA Rules and the rules set forth in this Agreement, the rules set forth in this Agreement shall govern. You may, in arbitration, seek any and all remedies otherwise available to you pursuant to federal, state, or local laws, as limited by the Limitation of Liability set forth in Section 21 of this Agreement. All Disputes shall be resolved by a single neutral arbitrator, and both parties shall have a reasonable opportunity to participate in the selection of the arbitrator. The arbitrator is bound by this Agreement. The arbitrator, and not any federal, state or local court or agency, shall have exclusive authority to resolve all disputes arising out of or relating to the interpretation, applicability, enforceability or formation of this Agreement, including, but not limited to, any claim that all or any part of this Agreement is void or voidable.  The arbitrator shall also have exclusive authority to rule on his or her own jurisdiction, including any objections with respect to the existence, scope, or validity of the arbitration agreement or to the arbitrability of any claim or counterclaim.  Notwithstanding this broad delegation of authority to the arbitrator, a court may determine the limited question of whether a claim or cause of action is for (i) trade secret misappropriation, (ii) patent infringement, (iii) copyright infringement or misuse, or (iv) trademark infringement or dilution, which are excluded from the definition of “Disputes” as stated above. The arbitrator shall be empowered to grant whatever relief would be available in a court under law or in equity. The arbitrator’s award shall be binding on the parties and may be entered as a judgment in any court of competent jurisdiction. You may choose to engage in arbitration hearings by telephone. Arbitration hearings not conducted by telephone shall take place in a location reasonably accessible from your primary residence (or principal place of business if you are a small business), or in Maricopa County, Arizona, at your option.
(G)
Initiation of Arbitration Proceeding.
If either you or GoDaddy decide to arbitrate a Dispute, we agree to the following procedure:
Write a Demand for Arbitration. The demand must include a description of the Dispute and the amount of damages sought to be recovered. You can find a copy of a Demand for Arbitration at
www.adr.org
(“Demand for Arbitration: Consumer Arbitration Rules”).
Send one copy of the Demand for Arbitration to AAA by mail at American Arbitration Association Case Filing Services 1101 Laurel Oak Road, Suite 100 Voorhees, NJ 08043.
Send one copy of the Demand for Arbitration to the other party at the same address as the Dispute Notice, or as otherwise agreed to by the parties.
(H)
Hearing Format.
In all hearing formats, the arbitrator shall issue a written decision that explains the essential findings and conclusions on which an award, if any, is based. During the arbitration, the amount of any settlement offer made by GoDaddy or you shall not be disclosed to the arbitrator until after the arbitrator determines the amount, if any, to which you or GoDaddy is entitled. The discovery or exchange of non-privileged information relevant to the Dispute may be allowed during the arbitration.
(I)
Arbitration Fees and Payments.
Disputes involving $75,000.00 or less. GoDaddy will promptly reimburse your filing fees and pay the AAA’s and arbitrator’s fees and expenses. If you reject GoDaddy’s last written settlement offer made before the arbitrator was appointed (“GoDaddy’s last written offer”), your dispute goes all the way to an arbitrator’s decision (called an “award”), and the arbitrator awards you more than GoDaddy’s last written offer, GoDaddy will: (i) pay the greater of the award or $1,000.00; (ii) pay twice your reasonable attorney’s fees, if any; and (iii) reimburse any expenses (including expert witness fees and costs) that your attorney reasonably accrues for investigating, preparing, and pursuing your claim in arbitration. The arbitrator will determine the amount of fees, costs, and expenses unless you and GoDaddy agree on them.
Disputes involving more than $75,000.00. The AAA rules will govern payment of filing fees and the AAA’s and arbitrator’s fees and expenses.
Disputes involving any amount. In any arbitration you commence, GoDaddy will seek its AAA or arbitrator’s fees and expenses, or your filing fees it reimbursed, only if the arbitrator finds the arbitration frivolous or brought for an improper purpose. In any arbitration GoDaddy commences, GoDaddy will pay all filing, AAA, and arbitrator’s fees and expenses.  GoDaddy will not seek its attorney’s fees or expenses from you in any arbitration.  Fees and expenses are not included in determining the amount in dispute.
(J)
Claims or Disputes Must be Filed Within One Year.
To the extent permitted by law, any claim or dispute to which this Section applies must be filed within one year in small claims or in arbitration. The one-year period begins when the claim or Notice of Dispute first could be filed.  If not filed within one year, the claim or dispute will be permanently barred.
(K)
30-Day Opt-out Period.
IF YOU DO NOT WISH TO BE BOUND BY THE ARBITRATION PROVISION IN THIS DISPUTES SECTION, YOU MUST NOTIFY GoDaddy BY E-MAILING LEGALOPTOUT@GODADDY.COM WITHIN 30 DAYS OF THE DATE THAT YOU ACCEPT THE TERMS OF THIS AGREEMENT (UNLESS A LONGER PERIOD IS REQUIRED BY APPLICABLE LAW).
In the e-mail, you must provide your (a) first name, (b) last name, (c) address, (d) phone number, and (e) account number(s) and state the following: “I wish to opt out of the arbitration provision contained in GoDaddy’s Universal Terms of Service Agreement.” By providing your information in the method above, you are opting out of the agreement to arbitrate contained in GoDaddy's Universal Terms of Service. Your opt-out request will only be valid if made within thirty (30) days of first accepting the Universal Terms of Service. In the event that you opt-out consistent with the procedure set forth above, all other terms contained herein shall continue to apply, including those related to the applicable governing law and the court(s) in which legal disputes may be brought.
(L)
Amendments to this Section.
Notwithstanding any provision in this Agreement to the contrary, you and GoDaddy agree that if GoDaddy makes any future amendments to the dispute resolution procedure and class action waiver provisions (other than a change to GoDaddy’s address) in this Agreement, GoDaddy will notify you and you will have thirty (30) days from the date of notice to affirmatively opt-out of any such amendments.  If you affirmatively opt-out of any future amendments, you are agreeing that you will arbitrate any Dispute between us in accordance with the language of this Section as stated in these current Terms, without any of the proposed amendments governing.  If you do not affirmatively opt-out of any future amendments, you will be deemed to have consented to any such future amendments.
(M)
Severability.
If any provision in this Section is found to be unenforceable, that provision shall be severed with the remainder of this Agreement remaining in full force and effect. The foregoing shall not apply to the prohibition against class or representative actions; if the prohibition against class or representative actions is found to be unenforceable, this entire Section shall be null and void. The terms of this Section shall otherwise survive any termination of this Agreement.
(N)
Exclusive Venue for Other Controversies.
GoDaddy and you agree that any controversy excluded from the dispute resolution procedure and class action waiver provisions in this Section (other than an individual action filed in small claims court) shall be filed only in the Superior Court of Maricopa County, Arizona, or the United States District Court for the District of Arizona, and each party hereby irrevocably and unconditionally consents and submits to the exclusive jurisdiction of such courts for any such controversy.  You also agree to waive the right to trial by jury in any such action or proceeding.
25. UNCLAIMED PROPERTY; MAINTENANCE CHARGES
Please be advised that if a customer has an outstanding account balance (a credit positive balance) whether in In-Store Credits, a Good as Gold Account or otherwise, for three (3) years or more for any reason, then GoDaddy shall turn over such account balance to the applicable U.S. state in accordance with state law.
You acknowledge and agree that we will deem In-Store Credits inactive if they are both 12 months old and have not been used to pay for a Service or fee. In the case of inactive In-Store Credits, GoDaddy may, as permitted by law, withhold a monthly maintenance charge from the available In-Store Credits in an amount equal to the lesser of $25.00 or the total In-Store Credits available on the date of the maintenance charge. If there are no In-Store Credits available we will not apply further maintenance charges. We may apply the maintenance charge to In-Store Credits without prior notice to you.
26. SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS
This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective heirs, successors and assigns.
27. NO THIRD-PARTY BENEFICIARIES
Nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed to confer any third-party rights or benefits.
28. U.S. EXPORT LAWS
This Site and the Services found at this Site are subject to the export laws, restrictions, regulations and administrative acts of the United States Department of Commerce, Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control (“
OFAC
”), State Department, and other United States authorities (collectively, “
U.S. Export Laws
”).  Users shall not use the Services found at this Site to collect, store or transmit any technical information or data that is controlled under U.S. Export Laws.  Users shall not export or re-export, or allow the export or re-export of, the Services found at this Site in violation of any U.S. Export Laws.  None of the Services found at this Site may be downloaded or otherwise exported or re-exported (i) into (or to a national or resident of) any country with which the United States has embargoed trade; or (ii) to anyone on the U.S. Treasury Department's list of Specially Designated Nationals or the U.S. Commerce Department's Denied Persons List, or any other denied parties lists under U.S. Export Laws.  By using this Site and the Services found at this Site, you agree to the foregoing and represent and warrant that you are not a national or resident of, located in, or under the control of, any restricted country; and you are not on any denied parties list; and you agree to comply with all U.S. Export Laws (including “anti-boycott”, “deemed export” and “deemed re-export” regulations).  If you access this Site or the Services found at this Site from other countries or jurisdictions, you do so on your own initiative and you are responsible for compliance with the local laws of that jurisdiction, if and to the extent those local laws are applicable and do not conflict with U.S. Export Laws.  If such laws conflict with U.S. Export Laws, you shall not access this Site or the Services found at this Site.  The obligations under this section shall survive any termination or expiration of this Agreement or your use of this Site or the Services found at this Site.
29. TITLES AND HEADINGS; INDEPENDENT COVENANTS; SEVERABILITY
The titles and headings of this Agreement are for convenience and ease of reference only and shall not be utilized in any way to construe or interpret the agreement of the parties as otherwise set forth herein.  Each covenant and agreement in this Agreement shall be construed for all purposes to be a separate and independent covenant or agreement.  If a court of competent jurisdiction holds any provision (or portion of a provision) of this Agreement to be illegal, invalid, or otherwise unenforceable, the remaining provisions (or portions of provisions) of this Agreement shall not be affected thereby and shall be found to be valid and enforceable to the fullest extent permitted by law.
30. ENGLISH LANGUAGE CONTROLS
This Agreement, along with all policies and the applicable product agreements identified above and incorporated herein by reference (collectively, the “
Agreement
”), is executed in the English language. To the extent any translation is provided to you, it is provided for convenience purposes only, and in the event of any conflict between the English and translated version, where permitted by law, the English version will control and prevail. Where the translated version is required to be provided to you and is to be considered binding by law (i) both language versions shall have equal validity, (ii) each party acknowledges that it has reviewed both language versions and that they are substantially the same in all material respects, and (iii) in the event of any discrepancy between these two versions, the translated version may prevail, provided that the intent of the Parties has been fully taken into consideration.
31. CONTACT INFORMATION
If you have any questions about this Agreement, please contact us by email or regular mail at the following address:
GoDaddy Legal Department
100 S. Mill Ave
Suite 1600
Tempe. AZ 85281 USA
legal@godaddy.com
View/Print Universal Terms of Service Agreement
Product Agreements
Account Access Terms of Service
Additional Terms for Renewals
AI Terms of Use
Airo Plus Terms of Service
Auctions Membership Agreement
Backup Services Agreement
CashParking® Service Agreement
Certificate Services Agreement
Change of Registrant Agreement
Domain Broker Service Agreement
Domain Name Proxy Agreement
Domain Name Registration Agreement
Domain Name Transfer Agreement
Email Marketing Services
GoDaddy API Terms of Use
Hosting Agreement
Marketing Applications Agreement
Microsoft 365 Terms of Use
Online Store/Quick Shopping Cart Agreement
Pro Program Agreement
Reseller Agreement
Website Services Agreement
Website Builder v7 Service Agreement
Website Security Terms of Use
Workspace Service Agreement
GoDaddy Poynt OS End User License Agreement
Policies and Other Documents
App Ratings, Reviews & Responses Policy
Brand Guidelines and Permissions
Data Processing Addendum
Digital Services Act Disclosure
Electronic Signature Disclosure
Dispute On Transfer Away Form
GoDaddy Anti-Slavery Statement
GoDaddy API Terms of Use
ICANN Registrant Rights
ICANN Registrar Transfer Dispute Resolution Policy
Online Safety Act Policy
Patent Notice
Global Privacy Notice
Data Privacy Framework Notice
European Supplemental Privacy Notice
Australia Supplemental Privacy Notice
Canada Supplemental Privacy Notice
United States Supplemental Privacy Notice
Refund Policy
Statement of Support
Subpoena Policy/Attorney Tips
Subprocessor List
Trademark/Copyright Infringement
Uniform Domain Name Dispute Resolution Policy
Employee and Candidate Notices
Applicant Privacy Notice
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Company Information
Corporate Headquarters
100 S. Mill Ave
Suite 1600
Tempe, AZ 85281 USA
Phone number: +353 1 653 5976
Email address: HQ@godaddy.com
Report Abuse
GoDaddy.com, LLC is a wholly-owned subsidiary of GoDaddy Inc.GoDaddy Legal Agreements and Policies
This page contains links to current corporate policies, agreements for the products and services available through GoDaddy, and notices for employees, candidates, and applicants. To view any of the documents presented on this page, click on the policy/agreement.
GoDaddy - UNIVERSAL TERMS OF SERVICE AGREEMENT
Last Revised: 19/03/2025
PLEASE READ THIS UNIVERSAL TERMS OF SERVICE AGREEMENT CAREFULLY, AS IT CONTAINS IMPORTANT INFORMATION REGARDING YOUR LEGAL RIGHTS AND REMEDIES.
1. OVERVIEW
This Universal Terms of Service Agreement (this “
Agreement
”) is entered into by and between GoDaddy.com, LLC, GoDaddy Payments, LLC (for any payment services) and Poynt, LLC (for any hardware services) ("
GoDaddy
") and you and is made effective as of the date of your use of this website ("
Site
") or the date of electronic acceptance.  This Agreement sets forth the general terms and conditions of your use of the Site and the products and services purchased or accessed through this Site (individually and collectively, the “
Services
”). Any agreements, arrangements and/or additional policies that apply to certain Services ("
Services Agreements
") and are in addition to (not in lieu of) this Agreement.  In the event of a conflict between the provisions of a Services Agreement and the provisions of this Agreement, the provisions of the applicable Services Agreement shall control.
The terms “we”, “us” or “our” shall refer to GoDaddy. The terms “you”, “your”, “User” or “customer” shall refer to any individual or entity who accepts this Agreement, has access to your account or uses the Site or the Services.  Nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed to confer any third-party rights or benefits.
2. MODIFICATION OF AGREEMENT, SITE OR SERVICES
GoDaddy may, in its sole and absolute discretion, change or modify this Agreement, and any policies or agreements which are incorporated herein, at any time, and such changes or modifications shall be effective immediately upon posting to this Site. Your use of this Site or the Services after such changes or modifications have been made shall constitute your acceptance of this Agreement as last revised. If you do not agree to be bound by this Agreement as last revised, do not use (or continue to use) this Site or the Services. In addition, GoDaddy may occasionally notify you of changes or modifications to this Agreement by email. It is therefore very important that you keep your shopper account (“
Account
”) information current.  GoDaddy assumes no liability or responsibility for your failure to receive an email notification if such failure results from an inaccurate email address.  In addition, GoDaddy may terminate Your use of Services for any violation or breach of any of the terms of this Agreement by You.
GoDaddy RESERVES THE RIGHT TO MODIFY, CHANGE, OR DISCONTINUE ANY ASPECT OF THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION PRICES AND FEES FOR THE SAME, AT ANY TIME.
3. ELIGIBILITY; AUTHORITY
This Site and the Services are available only to individuals or entities (“
Users
”) who can form legally binding contracts under applicable law.  By using this Site or the Services, you represent and warrant that you are (i) at least eighteen (18) years of age, (ii) otherwise recognized as being able to form legally binding contracts under applicable law, and/or (iii) are not a person barred from purchasing or receiving the Services found under the laws of the United States or other applicable jurisdiction.
If you are entering into this Agreement on behalf of a corporate entity, you represent and warrant that you have the legal authority to bind such corporate entity to the terms and conditions contained in this Agreement, in which case the terms "you", "your", "User" or "customer" shall refer to such corporate entity.  If, after your electronic acceptance of this Agreement, GoDaddy finds that you do not have the legal authority to bind such corporate entity, you will be personally responsible for the obligations contained in this Agreement, including, but not limited to, the payment obligations. GoDaddy shall not be liable for any loss or damage resulting from GoDaddy’s reliance on any instruction, notice, document or communication reasonably believed by GoDaddy to be genuine and originating from an authorized representative of your corporate entity. If there is reasonable doubt about the authenticity of any such instruction, notice, document or communication, GoDaddy reserves the right (but undertakes no duty) to require additional authentication from you.  You further agree to be bound by the terms of this Agreement for transactions entered into by you, anyone acting as your agent and anyone who uses your account or the Services, whether or not authorized by you.
4. YOUR ACCOUNT
In order to access some of the features of this Site or use some of the Services, you will have to create an Account. You represent and warrant to GoDaddy that all information you submit when you create your Account is accurate, current and complete, and that you will keep your Account information accurate, current and complete.  If GoDaddy has reason to believe that your Account information is untrue, inaccurate, out-of-date or incomplete, GoDaddy reserves the right, in its sole and absolute discretion, to suspend or terminate your Account.  You are solely responsible for the activity that occurs on your Account, whether authorized by you or not, and you must keep your Account information secure, including without limitation your customer number/login, password, Payment Method(s) (as defined below), and shopper PIN.  For security purposes, GoDaddy recommends that you change your password and shopper PIN at least once every six (6) months for each Account.  You must notify GoDaddy immediately of any breach of security or unauthorized use of your Account. GoDaddy will not be liable for any loss you incur due to any unauthorized use of your Account. You, however, may be liable for any loss GoDaddy or others incur caused by your Account, whether caused by you, or by an authorized person, or by an unauthorized person.
5. GENERAL RULES OF CONDUCT
You acknowledge and agree that:
Your use of this Site and the Services, including any content you submit, will comply with this Agreement, any applicable Services Agreement or policy that may apply to your Services and all applicable local, state, national and international laws, rules and regulations.
You will not collect or harvest (or permit anyone else to collect or harvest) any User Content (as defined below) or any non-public or personally identifiable information about another User or any other person or entity without their express prior written consent.
You will not use this Site or the Services in a manner (as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion) that:
Is illegal or harmful, or promotes or encourages illegal or harmful activity;
Promotes, encourages or engages in the exploitation of children, or any activity related to the proliferation of child sexual abuse material (CSAM);
Promotes or encourages self-harm or suicide;
Promotes, encourages or engages in terrorism,  or violence against people, animals, or property;
Promotes, encourages or engages in any spam or other unsolicited bulk email, or computer or network hacking or cracking;
Violates the Ryan Haight Online Pharmacy Consumer Protection Act of 2008 or similar legislation, or promotes, encourages or engages in the sale or distribution of prescription medication without a valid prescription;
Violates the Fight Online Sex Trafficking Act of 2017 or similar legislation, or promotes or facilitates prostitution and/or sex trafficking;
Infringes on the intellectual property rights of another User or any other person or entity;
Violates the privacy or publicity rights of another User or any other person or entity, or breaches any duty of confidentiality that you owe to another User or any other person or entity;
Interferes with the operation of this Site or the Services found at this Site;
Contains or installs any viruses, worms, bugs, Trojan horses or other code, files or programs designed to, or capable of, disrupting, damaging or limiting the functionality of any software or hardware; or
Contains false or deceptive language, or unsubstantiated or comparative claims, regarding GoDaddy or GoDaddy’s Services.
You will not perform any false, abusive or fraudulent activity. You will not perform any action that imposes, or may impose, in our discretion, an unreasonable or disproportionately large load on our infrastructure;
You will not copy or distribute in any medium any part of this Site or the Services , except where expressly authorized by GoDaddy.
You will not modify or alter any part of this Site or the Services found at this Site or any of its related technologies.
You will not access GoDaddy Content (as defined below) or User Content through any technology or means other than through this Site itself, or as GoDaddy may designate.
You agree to back-up all of your User Content so that you can access and use it when needed. GoDaddy does not warrant that it backs-up any Account or User Content, and you agree to accept as a risk the loss of any and all of your User Content.
You will not re-sell or provide the Services for a commercial purpose, including any of GoDaddy's related technologies, without GoDaddy's express prior written consent.
You will not circumvent, disable or otherwise interfere with the security-related features of this Site or the Services found at this Site (including without limitation those features that prevent or restrict use or copying of any GoDaddy Content or User Content) or enforce limitations on the use of this Site or the Services found at this Site, the GoDaddy Content or the User Content therein.
You agree to provide government-issued photo identification and/or government-issued business identification as required for verification of identity when requested.
You are aware that GoDaddy may from time-to-time call you about your account, and that, for the purposes of any and all such call(s), you may be subject to call recording and hereby consent to the same, subject to any applicable laws and our restrictions and obligations thereunder, including, where permissible, to record the entirety of such calls regardless of whether GoDaddy asks you on any particular call for consent to record such call.  You further acknowledge and agree that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, any such recording(s) may be submitted as evidence in any legal proceeding in which GoDaddy is a party. Further, by providing your telephone or mobile number, you consent to receive marketing telephone calls from or on behalf of GoDaddy that may be initiated by an automatic telephone dialing system and/or use an artificial or prerecorded voice. You understand that providing consent is not a condition of purchasing any good or service from GoDaddy.  Similarly, by providing your mobile number, you consent to receive marketing text messages from or on behalf of GoDaddy that may be sent by an automatic telephone dialing system. You understand that providing consent is not a condition of purchasing any good or service from GoDaddy. Message and data rates may apply.
Without limiting any of the rights set forth elsewhere in this Agreement, GoDaddy expressly reserves the right to deny, cancel, terminate, suspend, or limit future access to this Site or any Services (including but not limited to the right to cancel or transfer any domain name registration) to any User (i) whose Account or Services were previously terminated or suspended, whether due to breach of this or any other Agreement or any GoDaddy policy, or (ii) who otherwise engages or has engaged in inappropriate or unlawful activity while utilizing the Site or Services (as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion).
If your purchase or account activity shows signs of fraud, abuse or suspicious activity, GoDaddy may cancel any service associated with your name, email address or account and close any associated GoDaddy accounts. If GoDaddy, in its sole discretion, determines that any conducted activity is fraudulent, GoDaddy reserves the right to take any necessary legal action and you may be liable for monetary losses to GoDaddy including litigation costs and damages. To contest cancellation of Services or freezing or closure of an account, please contact GoDaddy Care.
6. PROTECTION OF YOUR PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION
GoDaddy may process personally identifiable information (“PII”) about you, your customers, and/or any individual using any services provided to you under this Agreement including any website You host with GoDaddy.  To the extent GoDaddy processes PII for its purposes in providing the Services, GoDaddy acts as the Data Controller and GoDaddy’s Global Privacy Notice applies to such processing.  To the extent GoDaddy processes PII on your behalf as part of the Services, GoDaddy acts as the Data Processor and the Data Processing Addendum applicable to the Services applies to such processing.
7. USER CONTENT
Some of the features of this Site or the Services, including those Services that are hosted with GoDaddy, may allow Users to view, post, publish, share, store, or manage (a) ideas, opinions, recommendations, or advice via forum posts, content submitted in connection with a contest, product reviews or recommendations, or photos to be incorporated into a social media event or activity (“
User Submissions
”), (b) literary, artistic, musical, or other content, including but not limited to photos and videos, or (c) other information about their business or customers (together with User Submissions, (“
User Content
”). All content submitted through your Account or processed on your behalf is considered User Content.
You must not post any User Content that is not compatible with or violates this Agreement (including without limitation this Section 7 and Sections 5 and 17 of this Agreement) or any applicable local, state, national and international laws, rules and regulations (“Prohibited Content”)
By posting, publishing, or processing User Content to this Site or to or via the Services, you represent and warrant to GoDaddy that (i) you have all necessary rights to process and distribute User Content via this Site or via the Services, either because you are the author of the User Content and have the right to distribute the same, or because you have the appropriate distribution rights, licenses, consents, and/or permissions to use, in writing, from the copyright or other owner of the User Content,  (ii) the User Content does not contain any Prohibited Content and does not violate the rights of any third party. You shall be solely responsible for any and all of your User Content or User Content that is submitted through your Account, and the consequences of, and requirements for, distributing it.
User Submissions.
You acknowledge and agree that your User Submissions are entirely voluntary, do not establish a confidential relationship or obligate GoDaddy to treat your User Submissions as confidential or secret, that GoDaddy has no obligation, either express or implied, to develop or use your User Submissions, and no compensation is due to you or to anyone else for any intentional or unintentional use of your User Submissions, and that GoDaddy may be working on the same or similar content, it may already know of such content from other sources, it may simply wish to develop this (or similar) content on its own, or it may have taken / will take some other action.
GoDaddy shall own exclusive rights (including all intellectual property and other proprietary rights) to any User Submissions posted to this Site, and shall be entitled to the unrestricted use and dissemination of any User Submissions posted to this Site for any purpose, commercial or otherwise, without acknowledgment or compensation to you or to anyone else.
User Content Other Than User Submissions.
By posting or publishing User Content to this Site or through the Services, you authorize GoDaddy to use the intellectual property and other proprietary rights in and to your User Content to enable inclusion and use of the User Content in the manner contemplated by this Site, this Agreement, and any Services Agreements applicable to the User Content.  You hereby grant GoDaddy a worldwide, non-exclusive, royalty-free, sublicensable (through multiple tiers), and transferable license to use, reproduce, distribute, prepare derivative works of, combine with other works, display, and perform your User Content in connection with this Site, the Services and GoDaddy's (and GoDaddy’s affiliates’) business(es), including without limitation for promoting and redistributing all or part of this Site in any media formats and through any media channels without restrictions of any kind and without payment or other consideration of any kind, or permission or notification, to you or any third party. You also hereby grant each User of this Site a non-exclusive license to access your User Content (with the exception of User Content that you designate “private” or “password protected”) through this Site, and to use, reproduce, distribute, prepare derivative works of, combine with other works, display, and perform your User Content as permitted through the functionality of this Site and under this Agreement. The above licenses granted by you in your User Content terminate within a commercially reasonable time after you remove or delete your User Content from this Site. You understand and agree, however, that GoDaddy may retain (but not distribute, display, or perform) server copies of your User Content that have been removed or deleted. The above licenses granted by you in your User Content are perpetual and irrevocable.  You also understand and agree that GoDaddy may retain and use any User Content that has been incorporated into any derivative works as allowed pursuant to any Services Agreements. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, GoDaddy shall not use any User Content that has been designated “private” or “password protected” by you for the purpose of promoting this Site or GoDaddy’s (or GoDaddy’s affiliates’) business(es). If you have a website or other content hosted by GoDaddy, you shall retain all of your ownership or licensed rights in User Content.
GoDaddy Data.  For the avoidance of doubt, User Content does not include “GoDaddy Data,” which means (a) all information relating to GoDaddy’s business and delivery of the Services, including but not limited to PII concerning You and (where applicable) your employees or representatives, (b) other data concerning or relating to Your account, transaction history, use of the Services and identity verification, and (c) subject to any restrictions under any applicable Data Protection Laws, any PII that has been aggregated, pseudonymized, or anonymized (collectively, “De-identified”) pursuant to the terms of any Services Agreement. You acknowledge and agree that you have no rights to GoDaddy Data under this or any Services Agreement.
8. AVAILABILITY OF WEBSITE/SERVICES
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and our other policies and procedures, we shall use commercially reasonable efforts to attempt to provide this Site and the Services on a twenty-four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week basis. You acknowledge and agree that from time to time this Site may be inaccessible or inoperable for any reason including, but not limited to, equipment malfunctions; periodic maintenance, repairs or replacements that we undertake from time to time; or causes beyond our reasonable control or that are not reasonably foreseeable including, but not limited to, interruption or failure of telecommunication or digital transmission links, hostile network attacks, network congestion or other failures. You acknowledge and agree that we have no control over the availability of this Site or the Service on a continuous or uninterrupted basis, and that we assume no liability to you or any other party with regard thereto.
9. PRODUCT CREDITS
In the event you are provided with a product credit (“
Credit
”), whether for redemption of the purchase of a specific product or for free with the purchase of another product (“
Purchased Product
”), you acknowledge and agree that such Credit is only valid for one (1) year and is only available with a valid purchase and may be terminated in the event the product purchased is deleted, cancelled, transferred or not renewed. The Credit will expire one (1) year from date of purchase of the Purchased Product if the Credit has not been redeemed.  In the event that the Credit is redeemed, after the initial subscription period, the product will automatically renew at the then-current renewal price until cancelled. If you wish to cancel the automatic renewal of the product, you may do so by visiting your Account or by contacting customer service.  In the event your Purchased Product includes a free domain name, if you cancel the Purchased Product, the list price for the domain name will be deducted from the refund amount. The list price is the price of the domain name listed on GoDaddy's website and is not subject to any promotion, discount, or other reduction in price. For Credits issued for free with another Purchased Product, you acknowledge and agree that we may swap your Credit for a similar product, in our sole discretion.
10. MONITORING AND MODERATION OF CONTENT; RESTRICTIONS POLICY
When using this Site and/or any Service, you will not provide, post, publish, share or otherwise make available or accessible any Prohibited Content.
GoDaddy generally does not pre-screen User Content (whether posted to a website hosted by GoDaddy or posted to this Site).  However, and subject to applicable laws, GoDaddy reserves the right (but undertakes no duty) to do so and decide whether any item of User Content is appropriate and/or complies with this Agreement. By way of example, GoDaddy may for instance voluntarily screen or pre-screen material for potential child sexual abuse material and act against any such material.
GoDaddy may remove any item of User Content (whether posted to a website hosted by GoDaddy or posted to this Site) and/or suspend or terminate a User’s access to this Site or the Services found at this Site for posting or publishing any Prohibited Content, or for otherwise violating this Agreement (as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion), at any time and without prior notice. GoDaddy may also suspend or terminate a User’s access to this Site or the Services found at this Site if GoDaddy has reason to believe the User is a repeat offender.
If GoDaddy terminates your access to this Site or the Services found at this Site, GoDaddy may, in its sole and absolute discretion, remove and destroy any data and files stored by you on its servers.
GoDaddy also reserves the right, but undertakes no duty, to review use of the Services and account activity for any activity that may pose a risk to GoDaddy and/or GoDaddy’s systems.  GoDaddy also may review, adjust the configurations of, and/or change the settings of any Services, including the settings of any hosted environment, that GoDaddy believes, in its sole and absolute discretion, may pose a risk to GoDaddy, GoDaddy’s systems, or any of its environments.
11. EUROPEAN UNION DIGITAL SERVICES ACT (“
DSA
”) SUPPLEMENTAL TERMS OF SERVICE
This section 11 applies as from February 17, 2024, which is the date of entry into effect of the EU Digital Services Act.
11.1	This Section 11 sets out provisions, processes and disclosures that supplement the rest of this Agreement, as required under the DSA, which regulates the provision of certain digital intermediary services provided in the European Union (“
EU
”) and notably sets out rules on the role of providers and imposes content moderation requirements and transparency obligations. These provisions only apply to you if you are in the EU and / or if you are using the Site or Services falling within the scope of the DSA. In the event of any conflict between the terms set out in this Section 11 and the other provisions of this Agreement, the terms of Section 11 shall prevail.
11.2	Rules of conduct. Users are prohibited from providing, publishing or transmitting Prohibited Content on this Site or in their use of the Services specifically including any User Content that is incompatible with or violates any applicable laws in the EU or any EU country.
11.3	Content moderation overview. GoDaddy may voluntarily take action against any Prohibited Content, in accordance with Section 10 above. In addition, GoDaddy may receive notices through the Notice and Action Mechanism (described below) and orders from EU authorities reporting the presence of alleged illegal content on (or transmitted through) this Site or any Service (including without limitation any website hosted by GoDaddy). GoDaddy will process these orders and notices, and take action based on the information provided. These actions may entail the restrictions mentioned in Section 11.5 below, or any other restrictions required by the relevant authority.
11.4	Notifying alleged illegal content – Notice and Action Mechanism. You may report to GoDaddy the presence, on this Site or on any Service, of content that you consider to be illegal in the EU or any EU country through the mechanism accessible in our
Support Center
(“
Notice and Action Mechanism
”). Depending on the nature of the Service concerned by the notice, the way GoDaddy processes and addresses such notice may differ.
11.5	Restrictions. GoDaddy may, at any time and in some cases, without prior notice, remove any Prohibited Content provided on (or through) this Site or any Service or suspend or terminate access to a whole Service (e.g., disabling a website hosted by GoDaddy).  In addition, with respect to “repeat offenders”, namely users frequently providing manifestly Prohibited Content, GoDaddy may suspend or terminate their access to this Site or to the Services found at this Site. GoDaddy will generally issue a prior warning before any suspension, other than in exceptional cases, or where GoDaddy is otherwise legally required to take immediate action. When deciding on and applying such restrictions, GoDaddy will act in a timely, diligent, non-arbitrary, objective and proportionate manner.
11.6	Unfounded Notices. If any user frequently provides manifestly unfounded notices through the Notice and Action Mechanism, GoDaddy may suspend the processing of its notices. GoDaddy will generally issue a prior warning before any suspension, save for exceptional cases (as determined by GoDaddy in its reasonable discretion) or where GoDaddy is legally required to take immediate action.
11.7	Measures and tools for review. Notices and orders are generally subject to human review. GoDaddy may also use a machine learning model that helps process certain claims and detect phishing on websites hosted by GoDaddy. Actions taken in response to notices and/or orders which relate to the provision of content by users of the Service or visitors of the Site, if any, are generally subject to human review.
11.8	Right to terminate the use of the Services. You have the right to terminate the use of the Services in accordance with Sections 9 and 15 of this Agreement.
11.9	Content Moderation Decisions.
This Section may apply to you if:
Your issue relates to a GoDaddy online platform in the EU (meaning either a Service involving the sale and purchase of aftermarket domain names, or GoDaddy Community to the extent provided in the EU); and
Your issue concerns: (y) a decision taken by GoDaddy further to a notice you submitted to GoDaddy regarding the presence of information considered to be illegal content on a GoDaddy EU online platform; and/or (z) a decision taken by GoDaddy to remove (or to not remove) content or to suspend, restrict or terminate (or to not suspend, restrict or terminate) access to a GoDaddy EU online platform on the ground that you or any user of the Service provided Prohibited Content,
(a “
Content Moderation Decision
”).
If you disagree with a Content Moderation Decision, you may lodge a complaint against it with GoDaddy. The complaint must be lodged within six (6) months from the date on which you are informed of the Content Moderation Decision. To lodge your complaint, you will need to respond to the email informing you of the Content Moderation Decision and provide any additional context or information for GoDaddy to reassess the Content Moderation Decision. GoDaddy will review your complaint and respond through its internal complaint-handling system (the “Internal Complaint-Handling System”).
If a user frequently provides manifestly unfounded complaints through the Internal Complaint-Handling System, GoDaddy may suspend the processing of its complaints, after a prior warning.
If you disagree with a Content Moderation Decision and/or the outcome of the Internal Complaint-Handling System, you may also engage with any out-of-court dispute settlement body certified by the relevant EU authority. For your information, decisions taken by these bodies are not binding. Also, GoDaddy may refuse to engage in such a procedure if the issue has already been resolved concerning the same content and the same grounds. The list of these certified bodies (if any) is expected to be published by the EU Commission shortly. We will update the terms of this Agreement once the relevant information becomes available.
In any case, you may also initiate judicial proceedings before a competent court, according to the applicable law, at any stage.
11.10	For the purposes of Sections 11.6 and 11.9, “frequently” means the submission of 2 or more unfounded notices or complaints (as relevant) over a period of 12 months. For the purposes of Sections 11.5, 11.6 and 11.9, when determining whether a specific behavior requires such a suspension or termination and the duration of the suspension or termination, GoDaddy takes into account the relevant facts and circumstances, which may include such things as the volume of manifestly unfounded notices or complaints submitted within the period referred to above, the seriousness and/or the impact of the behavior. A notice may for instance be considered as manifestly unfounded if it is evident that it does not relate to alleged illegal content and instead refers solely to personal and/or subjective considerations. Specifically as regards the provision of illegal content, these criteria also include the volume of illegal content provided, the extent of its impact and/or the gravity of the behavior (e.g., as regards the nature of the content concerned and its consequences) and the frequency of the behavior.
11.11	Search Engine: Recommender Systems Disclosure.
Our Site and certain of our Services include a search engine that enables you to search for domain name registrations based on your query, account search history, and location.
The search engine generates a list of results based on generic matching between the keywords or character sequences searched and the domain names available for purchase. If the exact domain name you searched for is unavailable, the search engine will display results for domain names that match your keywords and characters, potentially including alternative top-level domain names, which may take into account your location. For example, if you are located in Germany, the search engine may prioritize “.de” top-level domain names in order to present you more tailored results. Additionally, the search may feature partnerships labeled “Promoted” in the search results.
The keywords or sequences of characters that you searched are the most significant parameters used to determine the results, whereas search history and location are secondary parameters used to further refine the list of results. As currently designed, the search engine does not allow you to change these parameters.
11.12	DSA Point of Contact.
If you have any questions or queries about this Section 11 or any other DSA-related matters, you can contact us by email at
dsainquiries@godaddy.com.
12. ONLINE SAFETY ACT 2023 (“
OSA
”) SUPPLEMENTAL TERMS OF SERVICE FOR ONLINE CONTENT IN THE UK
12.1. This Section 12 sets out provisions, processes and disclosures that supplement the rest of this Agreement, as required under the OSA, which prohibits the uploading, sharing or making available of illegal or harmful content online in the UK. These provisions only apply to you if you are a UK User and you are using the Site or Services falling within the scope of the OSA. In the event of any conflict between the terms set out in this Section 12 and the other provisions of this Agreement, the terms of Section 12 shall prevail.
12.2 Rules of conduct. UK Users are prohibited from using, providing, publishing or transmitting Prohibited Content on this Site or in their use of the Services (specifically including any User Content that is incompatible with or violates the OSA). Further details regarding Prohibited Content and how GoDaddy implements measures to protect UK Users from accessing  Prohibited Content can be found in its OSA Policy which can be found here: GoDaddy OSA Policy.
12.3 Content moderation overview. GoDaddy may take action against any UK User Content, in accordance with Section 10 above. In addition, GoDaddy may receive notices through its OSA Reporting and Complaints Procedure (as described below), or regulatory orders requiring the suspension or termination of Services or User Content in breach of the OSA. GoDaddy will review, and may take action in accordance with its obligations under the OSA. These actions may entail the restrictions mentioned in this Section 12 below, or any other restrictions in accordance with this Agreement.
12.4 Notifying alleged illegal content and complaints. You may report to GoDaddy the presence on this Site of content that you consider to be illegal or prohibited under the OSA, or raise a complaint in relation to GoDaddy’s compliance with the OSA, through the mechanism accessible on our Support Center. GoDaddy’s processing and address of such complaints is dependent on the nature of the content concerned by the complaint.
12.5 Restrictions. GoDaddy may at any time, and without any liability or right to provide compensation, and in some cases without prior notice, remove any Prohibited Content provided on (or through) this Site or any Service, or suspend or terminate a Service (e.g., taking down a website hosted by GoDaddy), where required under the OSA or any regulatory orders, or where a User is otherwise in breach of this Agreement.
12.6 Rights. Under the OSA, UK Users  may have the right to bring a claim for breach of contract under this Agreement if: (a) regulated user-generated content which the UK User generates, uploads or shares is taken down, or access to it is restricted, by GoDaddy in breach of this Agreement, or (b) a UK User is suspended or banned from using the Services in breach of this Agreement. If a UK User considers that GoDaddy has breached this Section 12.6, then the UK User may make a complaint via the procedure outlined in Section 12.4.
12.7 OSA Point of Contact. If you have any questions or queries about this Section 12 or any other OSA-related matters, you can contact us by email at
osainquiries@godaddy.com
.
13. DISCONTINUED SERVICES; END OF LIFE POLICY
GoDaddy reserves the right to cease offering or providing any of the (i) Services or (ii) individual features, functionalities, or aspects of the Services at any time, for any or no reason, and without prior notice. Although GoDaddy makes great effort to maximize the lifespan of all its Services and features, functionalities, or aspects of the Services, there are times when a Service or specific feature, functionality, or aspect of a Service that we offer will be discontinued or reach its End-of-Life ("
EOL
"). If that is the case, those Services, or the specific feature, functionality, or aspect of that Service, will no longer be supported by GoDaddy, in any way, effective on the EOL date.
Notice and Migration.
In the event that any Service we offer has reached or will reach EOL, we will attempt to notify you thirty or more days in advance of the EOL date. It is your responsibility to take all necessary steps to replace the Service by migrating to a new Service before the EOL date, or by entirely ceasing reliance on said Service before the EOL date. In either case, GoDaddy will either offer a comparable Service for you to migrate to for the remainder of the term of your purchase, a prorated in-store credit, or a prorated refund, to be determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion. GoDaddy may, with or without notice to you, migrate you to the most up-to-date version of the Service, if available. You agree to take full responsibility for any and all loss or damage arising from any such migration. In the event that a feature, functionality, or aspect of any Service we offer has reached or will reach EOL, then we will attempt to notify you thirty or more days in advance of the EOL date.  However, if the Service maintains a least reasonably equivalent functionality without such feature, functionality, or aspect, as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion, GoDaddy will not be required to offer a comparable feature or functionality for the Service or a refund.
No Liability.
GoDaddy will not be liable to you or any third party for any modification, suspension, or discontinuance of any of the (i) Services or (ii) individual features, functionalities, or aspects of the Services we may offer, provide or facilitate access to.
14. BETA SERVICES
From time to time, GoDaddy may offer new Services (limited preview services or new features to existing Services) in a pre-release version. New Services, new features to existing Services or limited preview services shall be known, individually and collectively, as “
Beta Services
”. If you elect to use any Beta Services, then your use of the Beta Services is subject to the following terms and conditions: (i) You acknowledge and agree that the Beta Services are pre-release versions and may not work properly; (ii) You acknowledge and agree that your use of the Beta Services may expose you to unusual risks of operational failures; (iii) The Beta Services are provided as-is, so we do not recommend using them in production or mission critical environments; (iv) GoDaddy reserves the right to modify, change, or discontinue any aspect of the Beta Services at any time; (v) Commercially released versions of the Beta Services may change substantially, and programs that use or run with the Beta Services may not work with the commercially released versions or subsequent releases; (vi) GoDaddy may limit availability of customer service support time dedicated to support of the Beta Services; (vii) You acknowledge and agree to provide prompt feedback regarding your experience with the Beta Services in a form reasonably requested by us, including information necessary to enable us to duplicate errors or problems you experience; (viii) You acknowledge and agree that GoDaddy  may track your browsing behavior, links clicked, items purchased, your device type, and to collect various data, including analytics, about how you use and interact with our Beta Services; (ix) You acknowledge and agree that all information regarding your use of the Beta Services, including your experience with and opinions regarding the Beta Services, is confidential, and may not be disclosed to a third party or used for any purpose other than providing feedback to GoDaddy; (x) The Beta Services are provided “as is”, “as available”, and “with all faults”.
You acknowledge and agree that we may use your feedback for any purpose, including product development purposes. At our request you will provide us with comments that we may use publicly for press materials and marketing collateral. Any intellectual property inherent in your feedback or arising from your use of the Beta Services shall be owned exclusively by GoDaddy. To the fullest extent permitted by law, GoDaddy disclaims any and all warranties, statutory, express or implied, with respect to the Beta Services including, but not limited to, any implied warranties of title, merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose and non-infringement.
15. FEES AND PAYMENTS
You agree that your Payment Method may be charged by one of our affiliated entities. If, during your purchase, your payment was identified as being processed in the United States, your transaction will be processed by GoDaddy.com, LLC; if your payment was identified as being processed in Canada, your transaction will be processed by GoDaddy Domains Canada, Inc.; if your payment was identified as being processed in the United Kingdom, your transaction will be processed by GoDaddy Europe, Ltd.; if your payment was identified as being processed in India, your transaction will be processed by GoDaddy India Domains and Hosting Services India Pvt Ltd; if your payment was identified as being processed in Australia, your transaction will be process by GoDaddy Online Services Australia PTY Limited. If your payment was identified as being processed in the Netherlands, your transaction will be processed by GoDaddy Online Services Netherlands B.V. If, during your purchase, your payment was identified as being processed in a country or region that is not listed above, your transaction may be processed by an entity within the disclosed country that is affiliated with our local payment service provider, and subject to the provisions of our Privacy Policy.
(A) GENERAL TERMS, INCLUDING AUTOMATIC RENEWAL TERMS
Payment Due at Time of Order; Non-Refundable.
You agree to pay all amounts due for Services at the time you order them.  All amounts are non-refundable unless otherwise noted in the
Refund Policy
.
Price Changes.
GoDaddy reserves the right to change its prices and fees at any time, and such changes shall either be posted online at this Site and effective immediately without need for further notice to you or notice shall be provided to you by email. If you have purchased or obtained Services for a period of months or years, changes in prices and fees shall be effective when the Services in question come up for renewal as further described below.
Payment Types.
Except as prohibited in any product-specific agreement, you may pay for Services by using any of the following “
Payment Methods
”: (i)  valid credit card; (ii) “Good As Gold Prepaid Services” (defined below); (iii) electronic payment from your personal or business checking account, as appropriate (and as defined below); (iv) PayPal; (v) International Payment Option (as defined below); (vi) via In-Store Credit balances, if applicable (and as defined below); or (vii) any other method you use to pay for Services as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion, each a “Payment Method”. You acknowledge and agree that we may store your successful Payment Methods, as determined by us, used to pay for a Service as a Payment Method that we may use for payment for future purchases or renewals, including where a renewal is executed for a different subscription term and/or price as described herein. You can manage your stored Payment Methods and view or change your automatic renewal settings at any time by logging into your GoDaddy account.  The “Express Checkout” feature automatically places an order for the applicable Service and charges the designated Express Checkout Payment Method for your Account. Confirmation of that order will be sent to the email address on file for your Account. Your Payment Method on file must be kept valid if you have any active Services in your Account. In addition, you agree that the location for the processing of your payments may change for any reason, including the type of Payment Method chosen, the currency selected, or changes or updates made to your Payment Method.
Refunds Issued.
You agree that where refunds are issued to your Payment Method, GoDaddy's issuance of a refund receipt is only confirmation that GoDaddy has submitted your refund to the Payment Method charged at the time of the original sale, and that GoDaddy has no control over when the refund will be applied towards your Payment Method’s available balance. You further acknowledge and agree that the payment provider and/or individual issuing bank associated with your Payment Method establish and regulate the time frames for posting your refund, and that such refund posting time frames may range from five (5) business days to a full billing cycle, or longer.
In the event a refund is issued to your Payment Method and the payment provider, payment processor or individual issuing bank associated with your Payment Method imposes any limitations on refunds, including but not limited to, limitations as to the timing of the refund or the number of refunds allowed, then GoDaddy, in its sole and absolute discretion, reserves the right to issue the refund either (i) in the form of an In-Store Credit; (ii) via issuance of a GoDaddy check, which will be sent to the mailing address on file for your Account; or (iii) in some jurisdictions, as a bank transfer, when the payment processor cannot refund back to the Payment Method.  GoDaddy also has the right to offer an In-Store Credit for customers seeking refunds, even if there are no limitations on refunds imposed by the Payment Method.
Monthly Billing Date.
If you are being billed on a monthly basis, your monthly billing date will be based on the date of the month you purchased the Services, unless that date falls after the 28th of the month, in which case your billing date will be the 28th of each month.
Auto-Renewal Terms.
Other than as required by applicable law, GoDaddy does not retain hard copies or electronic versions of mandate, standing order or standing instruction forms and/or any signed consents relating to your usage of our automatic renewal services, and we are therefore unable to provide any such document upon request. You may view or change your automatic renewal settings at any time by logging into your GoDaddy account.
IN ORDER TO ENSURE THAT YOU DO NOT EXPERIENCE ANY INTERRUPTION OR LOSS OF SERVICES, ALL SERVICES ARE OFFERED ON AUTOMATIC RENEWAL UNLESS OTHERWISE SPECIFIED ON THIS SITE
(AND SUBJECT TO ANY OPT-OUT OR TERMINATION RIGHT YOU MAY INVOKE)
.
EXCEPT FOR REASONS DESCRIBED BELOW IN THIS SECTION (SEE SECTION TITLED “REDUCED TERM PAYMENT ATTEMPTS”), SERVICES SHALL AUTOMATICALLY RENEW AT THE END OF EACH SERVICE PERIOD FOR A SUBSEQUENT SERVICE PERIOD OF EQUAL LENGTH (EXCEPT FOR DOMAIN NAMES WHICH MAY RENEW FOR THE ORIGINAL SERVICE PERIOD). FOR EXAMPLE, IF YOUR LAST SERVICE PERIOD IS FOR ONE YEAR, YOUR RENEWAL PERIOD WILL TYPICALLY BE FOR ONE YEAR.
UNLESS YOU DISABLE THE AUTOMATIC RENEWAL OPTION, GoDaddy WILL AUTOMATICALLY RENEW THE APPLICABLE SERVICE WHEN IT COMES UP FOR RENEWAL AND WILL, SUBJECT TO SECTION 14(F) BELOW, ATTEMPT TO TAKE PAYMENT FIRST FROM THE PAYMENT METHOD ASSOCIATED WITH THE SERVICE(S) IN YOUR ACCOUNT ("PRIMARY PAYMENT METHOD"). IF THE PRIMARY PAYMENT METHOD FAILS, WE MAY ATTEMPT PAYMENT FROM YOUR DESIGNATED BACKUP PAYMENT METHOD(S) ON FILE WITH GoDaddy ("DESIGNATED BACKUP PAYMENT METHODS”). IF THERE IS NO PRIMARY PAYMENT METHOD OR A DESIGNATED BACKUP PAYMENT METHOD ASSOCIATED WITH A SERVICE, OR A DESIGNATED BACKUP PAYMENT METHOD FAILS, YOU AGREE THAT WE MAY ATTEMPT TO CHARGE ANY OTHER PAYMENT METHODS ON FILE IN YOUR ACCOUNT ("ALTERNATE PAYMENT METHODS"). RENEWALS WILL BE CHARGED AT GoDaddy’S THEN CURRENT RATES, WHICH YOU ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE MAY BE HIGHER OR LOWER THAN THE RATES FOR THE ORIGINAL SERVICE PERIOD. YOU MAY ALSO MANUALLY RENEW A SERVICE FOR AN ALTERNATIVE SERVICE PERIOD, WHICH SHALL THEREAFTER BECOME THE DEFAULT SERVICE PERIOD FOR ALL SUBSEQUENT RENEWALS (UNLESS YOU EXPRESSLY OPT OTHERWISE). IN ORDER TO SEE THE RENEWAL SETTINGS APPLICABLE TO YOU AND YOUR SERVICES, SIMPLY LOG INTO YOUR ACCOUNT MANAGER FROM THIS SITE AND FOLLOW THE STEPS FOUND
HERE
.
REDUCED TERM PAYMENT ATTEMPTS
: IN THE EVENT RENEWAL WITH THE PRIMARY PAYMENT METHOD, DESIGNATED BACKUP PAYMENT METHOD(S) AND ALTERNATE PAYMENT METHOD(S) ALL FAIL, GoDaddy SHALL BE ENTITLED TO ATTEMPT TO RENEW THE APPLICABLE SERVICE FOR THE SHORTEST SERVICE PERIOD THE APPLICABLE SERVICE IS CURRENTLY BEING MADE AVAILABLE FOR PURCHASE . SUCH RENEWALS SHALL BE CHARGED AT OUR THEN CURRENT RATE, DETAILS OF WHICH WILL BE AVAILABLE ON OUR WEBSITE (AND SUCH RATES MAY BE HIGHER OR LOWER THAN THE RATE FOR YOUR ORIGINAL PURCHASE).  IF RENEWAL OF THE APPLICABLE SERVICE IS SUCCESSFUL FOR THE SHORTER SERVICE PERIOD, THIS SHORTER SERVICE PERIOD SHALL BECOME YOUR DEFAULT SERVICE PERIOD FOR THE PURPOSES OF ALL FUTURE RENEWALS (UNLESS WE AGREE OR INFORM YOU OTHERWISE). FOR EXAMPLE, IF YOUR CURRENT SERVICE PERIOD IS TWO YEARS, BUT ALL PAYMENT ATTEMPTS FOR A FURTHER TWO-YEAR SERVICE PERIOD FAIL, YOUR SERVICE MAY BE RENEWED FOR ONE YEAR INSTEAD, AND ALL FUTURE RENEWALS WILL THEN IN TURN CONTINUE TO BE ONE YEAR (UNLESS WE AGREE OR INFORM YOU OTHERWISE).
IF YOU DO NOT WISH FOR ANY SERVICE TO AUTOMATICALLY RENEW, YOU MAY ELECT TO CANCEL YOUR RENEWAL, IN WHICH CASE, YOUR SERVICE WILL TERMINATE UPON EXPIRATION OF THE THEN CURRENT TERM, UNLESS YOU MANUALLY RENEW YOUR SERVICE PRIOR TO THAT DATE. IN OTHER WORDS, SHOULD YOU ELECT TO CANCEL YOUR AUTOMATIC RENEWAL AND FAIL TO MANUALLY RENEW IT BEFORE IT EXPIRES, YOU MAY EXPERIENCE AN INTERRUPTION OR LOSS OF SERVICE, AND GoDaddy SHALL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU OR ANY THIRD PARTY REGARDING THE SAME.
IN ADDITION, GoDaddy MAY PARTICIPATE IN “RECURRING BILLING PROGRAMS” OR “ACCOUNT UPDATER SERVICES” SUPPORTED BY YOUR CREDIT CARD PROVIDER (AND ULTIMATELY DEPENDENT ON YOUR BANK’S PARTICIPATION).  IF WE ARE UNABLE TO SUCCESSFULLY CHARGE YOUR EXISTING PAYMENT METHOD, YOUR CREDIT CARD PROVIDER (OR YOUR BANK) MAY NOTIFY US OF UPDATES TO YOUR CREDIT CARD NUMBER AND/OR EXPIRATION DATE, OR THEY MAY AUTOMATICALLY CHARGE YOUR NEW CREDIT CARD ON OUR BEHALF WITHOUT NOTIFICATION TO US.  IN ACCORDANCE WITH RECURRING BILLING PROGRAM REQUIREMENTS, IN THE EVENT THAT WE ARE NOTIFIED OF AN UPDATE TO YOUR CREDIT CARD NUMBER AND/OR EXPIRATION DATE, GoDaddy WILL AUTOMATICALLY UPDATE YOUR PAYMENT PROFILE ON YOUR BEHALF. GoDaddy MAKES NO GUARANTEES THAT WE WILL REQUEST OR RECEIVE UPDATED CREDIT CARD INFORMATION. YOU ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT IT IS YOUR SOLE RESPONSIBILITY TO MODIFY AND MAINTAIN YOUR ACCOUNT SETTINGS, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO (I) CANCELLING PRODUCTS AND (II) ENSURING YOUR ASSOCIATED PAYMENT METHOD(S) ARE CURRENT AND VALID.  FURTHER, YOU ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT YOUR FAILURE TO DO SO, MAY RESULT IN THE INTERRUPTION OR LOSS OF SERVICES, AND GoDaddy SHALL NOT BE LIABLE TO YOU OR ANY THIRD PARTY REGARDING THE SAME.
If for any reason GoDaddy is unable to charge your Payment Method for the full amount owed, or if GoDaddy receives notification of a chargeback, reversal, payment dispute, or is charged a penalty for any fee it previously charged to your Payment Method, you agree that GoDaddy may pursue all available lawful remedies in order to obtain payment, including but not limited to, immediate cancellation, without notice to you, of any domain names or Services registered or renewed on your behalf.  GoDaddy also reserves the right to charge you reasonable “
administrative fees
" for (i) tasks GoDaddy may perform outside the normal scope of its Services, (ii) additional time and/or costs GoDaddy may incur in providing its Services, and/or (iii) your noncompliance with this Agreement (as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion). Typical administrative or processing fee scenarios include, but are not limited to (i) customer service issues that require additional personal time or attention; (ii) UDRP actions(s) in connection with your domain name(s) and/or disputes that require accounting or legal services, whether performed by GoDaddy staff or by outside firms retained by GoDaddy; (iii) recouping any and all costs and fees, including the cost of Services, incurred by GoDaddy as the results of chargebacks or other payment disputes brought by you, your bank or Payment Method processor. These administrative fees or processing fees will be billed to the Payment Method you have on file with GoDaddy.
GoDaddy may offer product-level pricing in various currencies. The transaction will be processed in the selected currency and the pricing displayed during the checkout process will be the actual amount submitted for payment.  For certain Payment Methods, the issuer of your Payment Method may charge you a foreign transaction fee or other charge, which may be added to the final amount that appears on your bank statement or post as a separate amount. Please check with the issuer of your Payment Method for details. In addition, regardless of the selected currency, you acknowledge and agree that you may be charged Value Added Tax ("
VAT
"), Goods and Services Tax ("
GST
"), or other localized fees and/or taxes, based on your bank and/or the country indicated in your billing address section.
(B) REFUND POLICY
Products and Services available for refunds are described in our
Refund Policy
.
(C) GOOD AS GOLD PREPAID SERVICES
Service Details. By using Good As Gold Prepaid Services, you may transfer funds to GoDaddy to fund your Good As Gold Prepaid Services account (“
Good As Gold Account
”). You may then use your Good As Gold Account to purchase any Services. You may fund your Good As Gold Account by wire transfer.
You acknowledge that funds transferred to your Good As Gold Account will be held by GoDaddy and will not accrue or pay interest for your benefit. To the extent any interest may accrue, you agree that GoDaddy shall be entitled to receive and keep any such amounts to cover costs associated with Good As Gold Prepaid Services.
You agree that all transactions using Good As Gold Prepaid Services will be conducted in U.S. dollars.
Your Good As Gold Account must be funded on an initial basis with no less than funds equivalent to $1,000.00 U.S. dollars.
All payments must be for the full amount required at purchase.
Wire Transfer Details.
Wire transfers may be initiated in foreign currency to fund your Good As Gold Account, however the natural currency of the GoDaddy bank account is U.S. Dollars. Foreign currency wires will be automatically converted and deposited in U.S. Dollars. Please note that exchange rate fees may apply.
You are responsible for all wire transfer fees, both incoming and outgoing, associated with your Good As Gold Account. Any non-U.S. wire transfers may be subject to fees by your bank, intermediary banks, or GoDaddy’s bank, which may reduce the amount of the money received by GoDaddy’s bank and subsequently funded into your Good As Gold Account. You hereby expressly authorize GoDaddy (i) to reduce your Good As Gold Account by the amount of wire transfer fees GoDaddy incurs in order to receive your funds; and/or (ii) to charge a twenty-dollar ($20.00) service fee (“
Service Fee
”) in connection with the termination of your Good As Gold Account.  All fees are subject to change at any time, and such changes shall be posted online and effective immediately without need for further notice to you.
You can verify the remaining funds in your Good As Gold Account at any time through your  Account or the shopping cart. Should you decide to terminate your Good As Gold Account (or should GoDaddy opt to terminate your Good As Gold Account because you have breached an obligation under the Good As Gold Service Agreement), then the balance in your Good As Gold Account will be refunded, net the Service Fee.
Additional funds may be added to your Good As Gold Account at any time.
Your Use of Good As Gold Prepaid Services.
Use of funds in your Good As Gold Account can only be made through the GoDaddy purchase process at GoDaddy’s website. Purchases may not be made unless there are sufficient, available funds in your Good As Gold Account at the time of purchase to cover the entire purchase amount, including any related fees as set forth herein or in other relevant agreements.
(D) PAY BY CHECK (ELECTRONIC PAYMENT)
By using GoDaddy’s pay by check option (“
Pay By Check
”), you can purchase GoDaddy Services using an electronic payment (from your personal or business checking account (“
Checking Account
”), as appropriate). In connection, you agree to allow a third-party check services provider, Certegy Check Services, Inc., (“
Check Services Provider
”) to debit the full amount of your purchase from your Checking Account, which is non-refundable. Check Services Provider will create an electronic funds transfer (“
EFT
”) or bank draft, which will be presented to your bank or financial institution for payment from your Checking Account. The Checking Account must be at a financial institution in the United States, and payment must be in U.S. Dollars.
It is your responsibility to keep your Checking Account current and funded. You agree that (i) Check Services Provider or GoDaddy reserve the right to decline a transaction for any reason (including, but not limited to, payments that fail to go through as a result of your Checking Account no longer existing or not holding available/sufficient funds) and (ii) in such event, neither Check Services Provider nor GoDaddy shall be liable to you or any third party regarding the same. If for any reason Check Services Provider is unable to withdraw the full amount owed for the Services provided, you agree that Check Services Provider and GoDaddy may pursue all available lawful remedies in order to obtain payment (plus any applicable fees).  GoDaddy is not responsible for the actions of Check Services Provider. You agree that if the EFT or bank draft is returned unpaid, you will pay a service charge in accordance with the fees permitted by law for each U.S. State. A help article describing the Check Services Provider and outlining the service charges referenced above can be found
here
. These fees may be debited from your Checking Account using an EFT or bank draft. All fees are in U.S. Dollars.
GoDaddy and its service providers, including but not limited to Check Services Provider  and Complete Payment Recovery Services, Inc., may provide you with notices, including by email, regular mail, SMS, MMS, text message, postings on the services, or other reasonable means now known or hereafter developed. Such notices may not be received if you violate these terms of service by accessing the services in an unauthorized manner. Your agreement to these terms of service constitutes your agreement that you are deemed to have received any and all notices that would have been delivered had you accessed the services in an authorized manner. Failure to receive such notices for any reason shall not excuse any payment or other obligation to GoDaddy and Check Services Provider. You further expressly authorize GoDaddy and its service providers, including but not limited to Check Services Provider and Complete Payment Recovery Services, Inc., and their affiliates to contact you, via auto-dialer, pre-recorded messages, or any other method, on any of your mobile phone numbers or emails. You further acknowledge that email addresses you provide are not shared, accessed by others and are not employer-related email addresses.
(E) INTERNATIONAL PAYMENT OPTIONS
GoDaddy offers a variety of alternative international payment options through a variety of International Payment Providers (“
IPP
”). In the event you select an IPP, you represent that you have already agreed to any and all of the IPP’s applicable customer service agreements in advance of completing your transaction at GoDaddy.  You also agree to allow the IPP to debit the full amount of your purchase from the selected account or payment method, collectively “Funding Sources”. In addition, you agree to allow the selected IPP to debit, if applicable, an “Exchange Rate Conversion Fee”, as well as any other fees or charges applicable to your agreement with the IPP (collectively, the “
IPP Fees
”), from your Funding Sources. You understand and agree that IPP Fees are subject to change at any time by the IPP without notice to you by GoDaddy.
It is your responsibility to keep your Funding Sources current and funded. You agree that (i) the IPP or GoDaddy reserve the right to decline a transaction for any reason and (ii) neither the IPP nor GoDaddy shall be liable to you or any third party regarding the same. You acknowledge that GoDaddy will not attempt to fulfill the Services purchased by you until GoDaddy receives confirmation of payment from the IPP through its associated payment processor. You acknowledge there may be a gap of several hours or days between the time you place an order and the time the IPP confirms payment through its associated payment processor. If GoDaddy does not receive confirmation of payment from the IPP through its associated payment processor within thirty (30) days from when the order is placed, your order may be cancelled, at which time you will need to commence the purchase process again. In the event that you would like to cancel payment for a pending transaction, you may cancel the order through your GoDaddy account. Payments received on previously cancelled orders will be automatically refunded to the original Payment Method when possible.
If, at the time GoDaddy receives confirmation of payment from the IPP (through its associated payment processor), either (i) the Services (including domain names) are no longer available for purchase; or (ii) a pending order has been cancelled in our systems; or (iii) the confirmation of payment does not match the dollar amount of the pending order, and as a result your purchase is either over-funded or under-funded, GoDaddy may automatically issue a partial refund (in the case of over-funding) or a full refund (in the case of under-funding) to your Funding Source. If the IPP (or its associated payment processor) imposes refund limitations of any kind, GoDaddy reserves the right to issue refunds to an In-Store Credit balance or as a bank transfer, when the payment processor cannot refund back to the Payment Method.  If you receive a full refund, you will need to begin the purchase process again. You agree that the IPP reserves the right not to refund IPP Fees associated with a refunded transaction. Accordingly, any refunds issued by GoDaddy will be net of the IPP Fees unless otherwise specified.
(F) IN-STORE CREDIT BALANCES
In the event that your Account contains a credit issued by us, it may only be applied to the purchase of a Service (each an "
In-Store-Credit
") subject to the following terms: (1) you may apply any available In-Store Credit to any future purchase of Services in your Account; and (2)  you authorize GoDaddy to apply any available In-Store Credits to any upcoming product renewals, outstanding administrative fees, chargebacks, or other fees related to your Account, including partial payments. Regardless of the amount of In-Store Credit available in your account, GoDaddy is not responsible for the loss of products resulting from an inability to collect funds from your Payment Methods or the In-Store Credit. In-Store Credits will be applied based on the currency selected in the shopping cart at the time of purchase (or renewal). If you have more than one In-Store Credit, then the credits will be processed according to the age of the credit, with the oldest In-Store Credit being applied first. If additional funds are required to complete the purchase or renewal, In-Store Credits held in a non-selected currency will be converted using GoDaddy’s daily exchange rate based on the age of the In-Store Credit (oldest to newest) until (i) enough funds are allocated to complete the transaction, or (ii) there is no available balance left in your account. You understand and agree that at the time of conversion, GoDaddy may also impose an additional administrative fee.
You acknowledge that In-Store Credits are non-transferable, may only be used in the Account in which they were acquired and may expire in accordance with applicable law. Complimentary In-Store Credits will expire two years after issuance or within any other time period GoDaddy may specify in your Account. Log into your account to view your In-Store Credit balance and any applicable expiration dates. In the event that GoDaddy terminates your Account, you acknowledge and agree that any remaining available In-Store Credits will be forfeited.
You also acknowledge that funds associated with your In-Store Credits will be held by GoDaddy and will not accrue or pay interest for your behalf. To the extent any interest may accrue, you agree that GoDaddy is entitled to receive and keep any such amounts to cover costs associated with supporting the In-Store Credits functionality.
(G) EXPIRED DOMAIN NAME PURCHASES
For expired domain names purchased through your account, you agree that you are responsible for payment within forty-eight (48) hours of auction close for the successful bid amount plus the one (1) year renewal or transfer fee (from the end of the domain name’s previous registration period), plus ICANN fee, if applicable, or any valid payment method associated with the account, will be charged on the third day following the auction close. If we are unable to collect payment, you may lose the rights to purchase the domain name.
(H) ROUND UP FOR CHARITY
If you participate in Round Up for Charity, you hereby authorize GoDaddy to either 1) donate an amount selected by you, or 2) round up your transaction to the nearest dollar and donate 100% of the difference, to a small business relief fund (“
Donation
*”). GoDaddy will take reasonable steps to ensure your Donation is properly disbursed, in our sole discretion, to qualifying small businesses negatively impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic and will not withhold any Donation made by you through Round Up For Charity. You understand your Donation is not eligible for a refund or in-store credit.
(I) BUY NOW PAY LATER OPTIONS
Use of a “
buy now pay later
” option such as an installment payment or financing is subject to the following terms and conditions. You acknowledge and agree that GoDaddy shall not be liable to you or any third party regarding any interest, late fee, other amount, collection effort, or change in credit score that arises out of or relates to the buy now pay later option. You further agree that repayment of a buy now pay later option may be governed by your agreement with a third party. Any representation that GoDaddy makes regarding a repayment term related to a buy now pay later option is for convenience only. A repayment term such as a required down payment, late fee, or interest might vary or be subject to change, and is in the control of a third party. Notwithstanding the foregoing, GoDaddy shall not be responsible or otherwise liable to you or any third party for disclosing or failing to disclose any repayment term, which you are responsible for determining.
Certain installment payment options will only apply to a selected Service term, which may auto-renew for the full amount unless you manually renew the Service term with a subsequent installment payment.
(J) GENERAL TERMS REGARDING PAYOUTS FROM
GoDaddy
GoDaddy will make any payment(s) owed to you to the payment method of your choice, subject to the terms below (“
Payout(s)
”). In order to receive a Payout from GoDaddy, you will need to set up a payee, assign it to your account, and provide GoDaddy with all information and documentation require by us to set up a Payout account. We may delay, withhold, or suspend Payout(s) to comply with applicable laws, court orders, or request from government authorities (including but not limited to tax-related compliance) or in cases where you have not provided, or provided incomplete, required information.
Set up a Payee Account
Fees. A list of supported payment methods, applicable fees, and minimum payment thresholds are published here:
Payee Account Information
If for any reason GoDaddy is unable to process your Payout for the full amount owed, or if GoDaddy receives notification of a reversal or payment dispute, or is charged a penalty for any Payout, you agree that GoDaddy may pursue all available lawful remedies regarding such fees. Typical administrative or processing fee scenarios include, but are not limited to recouping any and all costs and fees, including the cost of Services, incurred by GoDaddy as the result of failed Payouts or other payment disputes brought by you, your bank or Payout processor. These administrative fees or processing fees will be deducted from any amounts due or directly debited from your Payout account.
Fee Changes. GoDaddy reserves the right to change its prices and fees at any time, and such changes shall be posted online at this Site and effective immediately without need for further notice to you.
(K) GENERAL TERMS REGARDING SUBSCRIPTIONS
For subscription bundles purchased through your account, you agree to a 12-month commitment on your monthly subscription. Cancellations within the first 180 days of each 12- month commitment for your monthly subscription are subject to an
early cancellation fee
and you are responsible for the applicable early cancellation fee.
16. ADDITIONAL RESERVATION OF RIGHTS
GoDaddy expressly reserves the right to access any Account and any data hosted by You through the services, as well as the right to deny, cancel, terminate, suspend, lock, or modify access to (or control of) any Account or Services (including the right to cancel or transfer any domain name registration) for any reason (as determined by GoDaddy in its sole and absolute discretion), including but not limited to the following: (i) to correct mistakes made by GoDaddy in offering or delivering any Services (including any domain name registration), (ii) to protect the integrity and stability of, and correct mistakes made by, any domain name registry or registrar, (iii) to assist with our fraud and abuse detection and prevention efforts, (iv) to comply with court orders against you and/or your domain name or website and applicable local, state, national and international laws, rules and regulations, (v) to comply with requests of law enforcement, including subpoena requests, (vi) to comply with any dispute resolution process, (vii) to defend any legal action or threatened legal action without consideration for whether such legal action or threatened legal action is eventually determined to be with or without merit, (viii) to avoid any civil or criminal liability on the part of GoDaddy, its officers, directors, employees and agents, as well as GoDaddy's affiliates, including, but not limited to, instances where you have sued or threatened to sue GoDaddy, or (ix) to respond to an excessive amount of complaints related in any way to your Account, domain name(s), or content on your website that could result in damage to GoDaddy’s business, operations, reputation or shareholders.
GoDaddy expressly reserves the right to review every Account for excessive space and bandwidth utilization, and to terminate or apply additional fees to those Accounts that exceed allowed levels.
GoDaddy expressly reserves the right to terminate, without notice to you, any and all Services where, in GoDaddy's sole discretion, you are harassing or threatening GoDaddy and/or any of GoDaddy's employees.
GoDaddy Content.
Except for User Content, the content on this Site and within the Services, including without limitation GoDaddy data and the text, software, scripts, source code, API, graphics, photos, sounds, music, videos and interactive features and the trademarks, service marks, logos contained on this Site and within the Services (“
GoDaddy Content
”), are owned by or licensed to GoDaddy in perpetuity, and are subject to copyright, trademark, and/or patent protection in the United States and foreign countries, and other intellectual property rights under United States and foreign laws. GoDaddy Content is provided to you “as is”, “as available” and “with all faults” for your information and personal, non-commercial use only and may not be downloaded, copied, reproduced, distributed, transmitted, broadcast, displayed, sold, licensed, or otherwise exploited for any purposes whatsoever without the express prior written consent of GoDaddy. No right or license under any copyright, trademark, patent, or other proprietary right or license is granted by this Agreement. GoDaddy reserves all rights not expressly granted in and to the GoDaddy Content, this Site and the Services, and this Agreement does not transfer ownership of any of these rights.
17. NO SPAM; LIQUIDATED DAMAGES
No Spam.
We do not tolerate the transmission of spam. We monitor all traffic to and from our web servers for indications of spamming and maintain a spam abuse complaint center to register allegations of spam abuse.
We define spam as the sending of Unsolicited Commercial Email (UCE), Unsolicited Bulk Email (UBE) or Unsolicited Facsimiles (Fax), which is email or facsimile sent to recipients as an advertisement or otherwise, without first obtaining prior confirmed consent to receive these communications. This can include, but is not limited to, the following:
Email Messages
Newsgroup postings
Windows system messages
Pop-up messages (aka "adware" or "spyware" messages)
Instant messages (using AOL, MSN, Yahoo or other instant messenger programs)
Online chat room advertisements
Guestbook or Website Forum postings
Facsimile Solicitations
Text/SMS Messages
We will not allow our servers and services to be used for the purposes described above. In order to use our products and services, you must abide by all applicable laws and regulations in the geographic regions in which you use and or direct the use of the Site and Services, which include but are not limited to the CAN-SPAM Act of 2003 and the Telephone Consumer Protection Act in the United States. You must also abide by this no spam policy.
Commercial advertising and/or bulk emails or faxes may only be sent to recipients who have "opted-in" to receive messages. They must include a legitimate return address and reply-to address, the sender's physical address, and an opt-out method in the footer of the email or fax. Upon request by us, conclusive proof of opt-in may be required for an email address or fax number.
If we determine the account, products, or services in question are being used in association with spam, we may re-direct, suspend, or cancel any account, web site hosting, domain registration, email boxes, or other applicable products or services. In such event, at our election, we may require you to respond by email to us stating that you will cease to send spam and/or have spam sent on your behalf and to require a non-refundable reactivation fee to be paid before the site, email boxes, and/or services are reactivated.
We encourage all customers and recipients of email generated from our products and services to report suspected spam. Suspected abuse can be reported by email or through our
Spam Abuse Complaint Center
.
Liquidated Damages.
You agree that we may immediately terminate any Account which we believe, in our sole and absolute discretion, is transmitting or is otherwise connected with any spam or other unsolicited bulk email. In addition, if actual damages cannot be reasonably calculated then you agree to pay us liquidated damages in the amount of $1.00 for each piece of spam or unsolicited bulk email transmitted from or otherwise connected with your Account.
18. TRADEMARK AND/OR COPYRIGHT CLAIMS
GoDaddy supports the protection of intellectual property.  If you would like to submit (i) a trademark claim for violation of a mark on which you hold a valid, registered trademark or service mark, or (ii) a copyright claim for material on which you hold a bona fide copyright, please refer to GoDaddy’s
Trademark and/or Copyright Infringement Policy
referenced above.
19. LINKS TO THIRD-PARTY WEBSITES
This Site and the Services found at this Site may contain links to third-party websites that are not owned or controlled by GoDaddy. GoDaddy assumes no responsibility for the content, terms and conditions, privacy policies, or practices of any third-party websites. In addition, GoDaddy does not censor or edit the content of any third-party websites. By using this Site or the Services found at this Site, you expressly release GoDaddy from any and all liability arising from your use of any third-party website. Accordingly, GoDaddy encourages you to be aware when you leave this Site or the Services found at this Site and to review the terms and conditions, privacy policies, and other governing documents of each other website that you may visit.
20. DISCLAIMER OF REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES
YOU SPECIFICALLY ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT YOUR USE OF THIS SITE AND THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE SHALL BE AT YOUR OWN RISK AND THAT THIS SITE AND THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE ARE PROVIDED “AS IS”, “AS AVAILABLE” AND “WITH ALL FAULTS”. GoDaddy, ITS OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, EMPLOYEES, AGENTS, AND ALL THIRD PARTY SERVICE PROVIDERS DISCLAIM ALL WARRANTIES, STATUTORY, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, ANY IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF TITLE, MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NON-INFRINGEMENT. GoDaddy, ITS OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, EMPLOYEES, AND AGENTS MAKE NO REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES ABOUT (I) THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS, OR CONTENT OF THIS SITE, (II) THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS, OR CONTENT OF ANY SITES LINKED (THROUGH HYPERLINKS, BANNER ADVERTISING OR OTHERWISE) TO THIS SITE, (III) THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE OR ANY SITES LINKED (THROUGH HYPERLINKS, BANNER ADVERTISING OR OTHERWISE) TO THIS SITE, AND/OR (IV) ANY ACTION OR FAILURE TO ACT BY GoDaddy CONSISTENT WITH THE TERMS OF THIS AGREEMENT, AND GoDaddy ASSUMES NO LIABILITY OR RESPONSIBILITY FOR THE SAME.
IN ADDITION, YOU SPECIFICALLY ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT AUTO-GENERATED OUTPUTS INCLUDING TEXT, LOGOS, NAMES, SLOGANS, ETC. HAVE NOT BEEN REVIEWED FOR ACCURACY OR INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY CLEARANCE. GoDaddy MAKES NO REPRESENTATION, WARRANTY OR GUARANTEE AS TO THE ACCURACY, RELIABILITY, WHETHER OUTPUTS MAY INFRINGE ON THIRD-PARTY INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS, ETC. YOU SHOULD SEEK INDEPENDENT PROFESSIONAL LEGAL ADVICE BEFORE YOU RELY ON ANY AUTO-GENERATE OUTPUT.
YOU SPECIFICALLY ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT NO ORAL OR WRITTEN INFORMATION OR ADVICE PROVIDED BY GoDaddy, ITS OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, EMPLOYEES, OR AGENTS (INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION ITS CALL CENTER OR CUSTOMER SERVICE REPRESENTATIVES), AND THIRD PARTY SERVICE PROVIDERS  WILL (I) CONSTITUTE LEGAL OR FINANCIAL ADVICE OR (II) CREATE A WARRANTY OF ANY KIND WITH RESPECT TO THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE, AND USERS SHOULD NOT RELY ON ANY SUCH INFORMATION OR ADVICE.
THE FOREGOING DISCLAIMER OF REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES SHALL APPLY TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, AND SHALL SURVIVE ANY TERMINATION OR EXPIRATION OF THIS AGREEMENT OR YOUR USE OF THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE.
21. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
IN NO EVENT SHALL GoDaddy, ITS OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, EMPLOYEES,  AGENTS, AND ALL THIRD PARTY SERVICE PROVIDERS, BE LIABLE TO YOU OR ANY OTHER PERSON OR ENTITY FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES WHATSOEVER, INCLUDING ANY THAT MAY RESULT FROM (I) THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS, OR CONTENT OF THIS SITE, (II) THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS, OR CONTENT OF ANY SITES LINKED (THROUGH HYPERLINKS, BANNER ADVERTISING OR OTHERWISE) TO THIS SITE, (III) THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE OR ANY SITES LINKED (THROUGH HYPERLINKS, BANNER ADVERTISING OR OTHERWISE) TO THIS SITE, (IV) PERSONAL INJURY OR PROPERTY DAMAGE OF ANY NATURE WHATSOEVER, (V) THIRD-PARTY CONDUCT OF ANY NATURE WHATSOEVER, (VI) ANY UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO OR USE OF OUR SERVERS AND/OR ANY AND ALL CONTENT, PERSONAL INFORMATION, FINANCIAL INFORMATION OR OTHER INFORMATION AND DATA STORED THEREIN, (VII) ANY INTERRUPTION OR CESSATION OF SERVICES TO OR FROM THIS SITE OR ANY SITES LINKED (THROUGH HYPERLINKS, BANNER ADVERTISING OR OTHERWISE) TO THIS SITE, (VIII) ANY VIRUSES, WORMS, BUGS, TROJAN HORSES, OR THE LIKE, WHICH MAY BE TRANSMITTED TO, FROM, OR THROUGH, THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES (INCLUDING ANY SITES OR SERVICES LINKED TO THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES (WHETHER THROUGH HYPERLINKS, BANNER ADVERTISING OR OTHERWISE) AND/OR ANY REMOVAL OR ATTEMPTED REMOVAL THEREOF, (IX) ANY REVIEW, SCANNING, ACCESS TO, AND/OR MODIFICATION OF THE SERVICES USED BY YOU, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO ANY HOSTED ENVIRONMENT, (X) ANY USER CONTENT OR CONTENT THAT IS DEFAMATORY, HARASSING, ABUSIVE, HARMFUL TO MINORS OR ANY PROTECTED CLASS, PORNOGRAPHIC, “X-RATED”, OBSCENE OR OTHERWISE OBJECTIONABLE, (XI) ANY LOSS OR DAMAGE OF ANY KIND INCURRED AS A RESULT OF YOUR USE OF THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE, WHETHER BASED ON WARRANTY, CONTRACT, TORT, OR ANY OTHER LEGAL OR EQUITABLE THEORY, AND WHETHER OR NOT GoDaddy IS ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES,  AND/OR (XII) ANY AUTO-GENERATED OUTPUTS CREATED USING THE SERVICES.
IN ADDITION, YOU SPECIFICALLY ACKNOWLEDGE AND AGREE THAT IN NO EVENT SHALL GoDaddy’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY EXCEED $10,000.00 U.S. DOLLARS.
THE FOREGOING LIMITATION OF LIABILITY SHALL APPLY TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, AND SHALL SURVIVE ANY TERMINATION OR EXPIRATION OF THIS AGREEMENT OR YOUR USE OF THIS SITE OR THE SERVICES FOUND AT THIS SITE.
22. INDEMNITY
You agree to protect, defend, indemnify and hold harmless GoDaddy and its officers, directors, employees, agents, and third party service providers from and against any and all claims, demands, costs, expenses, losses, liabilities and damages of every kind and nature (including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys’ fees) imposed upon or incurred by GoDaddy directly or indirectly arising from (i) your use of and access to this Site or the Services found at this Site; (ii) your violation of any provision of this Agreement or the policies or agreements which are incorporated herein; and/or (iii) your violation of any third-party right, including without limitation any intellectual property or other proprietary right.  The indemnification obligations under this section shall survive any termination or expiration of this Agreement or your use of this Site or the Services found at this Site.
23. COMPLIANCE WITH LOCAL LAWS
GoDaddy makes no representation or warranty that the content available on this Site or the Services found at this Site are appropriate in every country or jurisdiction, and access to this Site or the Services found at this Site from countries or jurisdictions where its content is illegal is prohibited.  Users who choose to access this Site or the Services found at this Site are responsible for compliance with all local laws, rules and regulations.
24. DISPUTES, BINDING INDIVIDUAL ARBITRATION AND WAIVER OF CLASS ACTIONS AND CLASS ARBITRATIONS
PLEASE READ THIS SECTION CAREFULLY.  FOLLOW THE INSTRUCTIONS BELOW IF YOU WISH TO OPT OUT OF THE PROVISIONS REQUIRING YOU TO RESOLVE DISPUTES THROUGH INDIVIDUAL ARBITRATION.
(A)
Disputes.
The terms of this Section shall apply to all Disputes between you and GoDaddy, except for disputes governed by the
Uniform Domain Name Dispute Resolution Policy
referenced above.  For the purposes of this Section, “Dispute” shall mean any dispute, claim, or action between you and GoDaddy arising under or relating to any GoDaddy Services or Products, GoDaddy’s websites, this Agreement, or any other transaction involving you and GoDaddy, whether in contract, warranty, misrepresentation, fraud, tort, intentional tort, statute, regulation, ordinance, or any other legal or equitable basis, and shall be interpreted to be given the broadest meaning allowable under law.
YOU AND GoDaddy AGREE THAT “DISPUTE” AS DEFINED IN THIS AGREEMENT SHALL NOT INCLUDE ANY CLAIM OR CAUSE OF ACTION BY YOU OR GoDaddy FOR (i) TRADE SECRET MISAPPROPRIATION, (ii) PATENT INFRINGEMENT, (iii) COPYRIGHT INFRINGEMENT OR MISUSE, AND (iv) TRADEMARK INFRINGEMENT OR DILUTION.
Moreover, notwithstanding anything else in this Agreement, you agree that a court, not the arbitrator, may decide if a claim falls within one of these four exceptions.
(B)
Binding Arbitration.
You and GoDaddy further agree: (i) to arbitrate all Disputes between the parties pursuant to the provisions in this Agreement; (ii) this Agreement memorializes a transaction in interstate commerce; (iii) the Federal Arbitration Act (9 U.S.C. §1, et seq.) governs the interpretation and enforcement of this Section; and (iv) this Section shall survive termination of this Agreement. ARBITRATION MEANS THAT YOU WAIVE YOUR RIGHT TO A JUDGE OR JURY IN A COURT PROCEEDING AND YOUR GROUNDS FOR APPEAL ARE LIMITED. The arbitrator may award you the same damages as a court sitting in proper jurisdiction, as limited by the Limitation of Liability set forth in Section 21 of this Agreement and may award declaratory or injunctive relief only in favor of the individual party seeking relief and only to the extent necessary to provide relief warranted by that party’s individual claim. In addition, in some instances, the costs of arbitration could exceed the costs of litigation and the right to discovery may be more limited in arbitration than in court. The decision of the arbitrator shall be final and enforceable by any court with jurisdiction over the parties.
(C)
Small Claims Court.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, you may bring an individual action in the small claims court of your state or municipality if the action is within that court’s jurisdiction and is pending only in that court.
(D)
Dispute Notice.
In the event of a Dispute, you or GoDaddy must first send to the other party a notice of the Dispute that shall include a written statement that sets forth the name, address and contact information of the party giving it, the facts giving rise to the Dispute, and the relief requested (the “
Dispute Notice
”). The Dispute Notice to GoDaddy must be addressed to: GoDaddy, 100 S. Mill Ave, Tempe, AZ 85281, Attn.: Legal Department (the “
GoDaddy Notice Address
”). The Dispute Notice to you will be sent by certified mail to the most recent address we have on file or otherwise in our records for you.  If GoDaddy and you do not reach an agreement to resolve the Dispute within sixty (60) days after the Dispute Notice is received, you or GoDaddy may commence an arbitration proceeding pursuant to this Section. Following submission and receipt of the Dispute Notice, each of us agrees to act in good faith to seek to resolve the Dispute before commencing arbitration.
(E)
WAIVER OF CLASS ACTIONS AND CLASS ARBITRATIONS.
YOU AND GoDaddy AGREE THAT EACH PARTY MAY BRING DISPUTES AGAINST THE OTHER PARTY ONLY IN AN INDIVIDUAL CAPACITY, AND NOT AS A PLAINTIFF OR CLASS MEMBER IN ANY PURPORTED CLASS OR REPRESENTATIVE PROCEEDING, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION FEDERAL OR STATE CLASS ACTIONS, OR CLASS ARBITRATIONS.  NEITHER YOU NOR GoDaddy WILL SEEK TO HAVE ANY DISPUTE HEARD AS A CLASS ACTION, PRIVATE ATTORNEY GENERAL ACTION, OR IN ANY OTHER PROCEEDING IN WHICH EITHER PARTY ACTS OR PROPOSES TO ACT IN A REPRESENTATIVE CAPACITY.  NO ARBITRATION OR OTHER PROCEEDING WILL BE COMBINED WITH ANOTHER WITHOUT THE PRIOR WRITTEN CONSENT OF ALL PARTIES TO ALL AFFECTED ARBITRATIONS OR PROCEEDINGS.
(F)
Arbitration Procedure.
If a party elects to commence arbitration, the arbitration will be administered by the American Arbitration Association (“
AAA
”) and governed by the Consumer Arbitration Rules of the AAA (“
AAA Rules
”) in conjunction with the rules set forth in this Agreement, except that AAA may not administer any multiple claimant or class arbitration, as the parties agree that the arbitration shall be limited to the resolution only of individual claims.  The AAA Rules are at
www.adr.org
or by calling 1-800-778-7879. If there is a conflict between the AAA Rules and the rules set forth in this Agreement, the rules set forth in this Agreement shall govern. You may, in arbitration, seek any and all remedies otherwise available to you pursuant to federal, state, or local laws, as limited by the Limitation of Liability set forth in Section 21 of this Agreement. All Disputes shall be resolved by a single neutral arbitrator, and both parties shall have a reasonable opportunity to participate in the selection of the arbitrator. The arbitrator is bound by this Agreement. The arbitrator, and not any federal, state or local court or agency, shall have exclusive authority to resolve all disputes arising out of or relating to the interpretation, applicability, enforceability or formation of this Agreement, including, but not limited to, any claim that all or any part of this Agreement is void or voidable.  The arbitrator shall also have exclusive authority to rule on his or her own jurisdiction, including any objections with respect to the existence, scope, or validity of the arbitration agreement or to the arbitrability of any claim or counterclaim.  Notwithstanding this broad delegation of authority to the arbitrator, a court may determine the limited question of whether a claim or cause of action is for (i) trade secret misappropriation, (ii) patent infringement, (iii) copyright infringement or misuse, or (iv) trademark infringement or dilution, which are excluded from the definition of “Disputes” as stated above. The arbitrator shall be empowered to grant whatever relief would be available in a court under law or in equity. The arbitrator’s award shall be binding on the parties and may be entered as a judgment in any court of competent jurisdiction. You may choose to engage in arbitration hearings by telephone. Arbitration hearings not conducted by telephone shall take place in a location reasonably accessible from your primary residence (or principal place of business if you are a small business), or in Maricopa County, Arizona, at your option.
(G)
Initiation of Arbitration Proceeding.
If either you or GoDaddy decide to arbitrate a Dispute, we agree to the following procedure:
Write a Demand for Arbitration. The demand must include a description of the Dispute and the amount of damages sought to be recovered. You can find a copy of a Demand for Arbitration at
www.adr.org
(“Demand for Arbitration: Consumer Arbitration Rules”).
Send one copy of the Demand for Arbitration to AAA by mail at American Arbitration Association Case Filing Services 1101 Laurel Oak Road, Suite 100 Voorhees, NJ 08043.
Send one copy of the Demand for Arbitration to the other party at the same address as the Dispute Notice, or as otherwise agreed to by the parties.
(H)
Hearing Format.
In all hearing formats, the arbitrator shall issue a written decision that explains the essential findings and conclusions on which an award, if any, is based. During the arbitration, the amount of any settlement offer made by GoDaddy or you shall not be disclosed to the arbitrator until after the arbitrator determines the amount, if any, to which you or GoDaddy is entitled. The discovery or exchange of non-privileged information relevant to the Dispute may be allowed during the arbitration.
(I)
Arbitration Fees and Payments.
Disputes involving $75,000.00 or less. GoDaddy will promptly reimburse your filing fees and pay the AAA’s and arbitrator’s fees and expenses. If you reject GoDaddy’s last written settlement offer made before the arbitrator was appointed (“GoDaddy’s last written offer”), your dispute goes all the way to an arbitrator’s decision (called an “award”), and the arbitrator awards you more than GoDaddy’s last written offer, GoDaddy will: (i) pay the greater of the award or $1,000.00; (ii) pay twice your reasonable attorney’s fees, if any; and (iii) reimburse any expenses (including expert witness fees and costs) that your attorney reasonably accrues for investigating, preparing, and pursuing your claim in arbitration. The arbitrator will determine the amount of fees, costs, and expenses unless you and GoDaddy agree on them.
Disputes involving more than $75,000.00. The AAA rules will govern payment of filing fees and the AAA’s and arbitrator’s fees and expenses.
Disputes involving any amount. In any arbitration you commence, GoDaddy will seek its AAA or arbitrator’s fees and expenses, or your filing fees it reimbursed, only if the arbitrator finds the arbitration frivolous or brought for an improper purpose. In any arbitration GoDaddy commences, GoDaddy will pay all filing, AAA, and arbitrator’s fees and expenses.  GoDaddy will not seek its attorney’s fees or expenses from you in any arbitration.  Fees and expenses are not included in determining the amount in dispute.
(J)
Claims or Disputes Must be Filed Within One Year.
To the extent permitted by law, any claim or dispute to which this Section applies must be filed within one year in small claims or in arbitration. The one-year period begins when the claim or Notice of Dispute first could be filed.  If not filed within one year, the claim or dispute will be permanently barred.
(K)
30-Day Opt-out Period.
IF YOU DO NOT WISH TO BE BOUND BY THE ARBITRATION PROVISION IN THIS DISPUTES SECTION, YOU MUST NOTIFY GoDaddy BY E-MAILING LEGALOPTOUT@GODADDY.COM WITHIN 30 DAYS OF THE DATE THAT YOU ACCEPT THE TERMS OF THIS AGREEMENT (UNLESS A LONGER PERIOD IS REQUIRED BY APPLICABLE LAW).
In the e-mail, you must provide your (a) first name, (b) last name, (c) address, (d) phone number, and (e) account number(s) and state the following: “I wish to opt out of the arbitration provision contained in GoDaddy’s Universal Terms of Service Agreement.” By providing your information in the method above, you are opting out of the agreement to arbitrate contained in GoDaddy's Universal Terms of Service. Your opt-out request will only be valid if made within thirty (30) days of first accepting the Universal Terms of Service. In the event that you opt-out consistent with the procedure set forth above, all other terms contained herein shall continue to apply, including those related to the applicable governing law and the court(s) in which legal disputes may be brought.
(L)
Amendments to this Section.
Notwithstanding any provision in this Agreement to the contrary, you and GoDaddy agree that if GoDaddy makes any future amendments to the dispute resolution procedure and class action waiver provisions (other than a change to GoDaddy’s address) in this Agreement, GoDaddy will notify you and you will have thirty (30) days from the date of notice to affirmatively opt-out of any such amendments.  If you affirmatively opt-out of any future amendments, you are agreeing that you will arbitrate any Dispute between us in accordance with the language of this Section as stated in these current Terms, without any of the proposed amendments governing.  If you do not affirmatively opt-out of any future amendments, you will be deemed to have consented to any such future amendments.
(M)
Severability.
If any provision in this Section is found to be unenforceable, that provision shall be severed with the remainder of this Agreement remaining in full force and effect. The foregoing shall not apply to the prohibition against class or representative actions; if the prohibition against class or representative actions is found to be unenforceable, this entire Section shall be null and void. The terms of this Section shall otherwise survive any termination of this Agreement.
(N)
Exclusive Venue for Other Controversies.
GoDaddy and you agree that any controversy excluded from the dispute resolution procedure and class action waiver provisions in this Section (other than an individual action filed in small claims court) shall be filed only in the Superior Court of Maricopa County, Arizona, or the United States District Court for the District of Arizona, and each party hereby irrevocably and unconditionally consents and submits to the exclusive jurisdiction of such courts for any such controversy.  You also agree to waive the right to trial by jury in any such action or proceeding.
25. UNCLAIMED PROPERTY; MAINTENANCE CHARGES
Please be advised that if a customer has an outstanding account balance (a credit positive balance) whether in In-Store Credits, a Good as Gold Account or otherwise, for three (3) years or more for any reason, then GoDaddy shall turn over such account balance to the applicable U.S. state in accordance with state law.
You acknowledge and agree that we will deem In-Store Credits inactive if they are both 12 months old and have not been used to pay for a Service or fee. In the case of inactive In-Store Credits, GoDaddy may, as permitted by law, withhold a monthly maintenance charge from the available In-Store Credits in an amount equal to the lesser of $25.00 or the total In-Store Credits available on the date of the maintenance charge. If there are no In-Store Credits available we will not apply further maintenance charges. We may apply the maintenance charge to In-Store Credits without prior notice to you.
26. SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS
This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective heirs, successors and assigns.
27. NO THIRD-PARTY BENEFICIARIES
Nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed to confer any third-party rights or benefits.
28. U.S. EXPORT LAWS
This Site and the Services found at this Site are subject to the export laws, restrictions, regulations and administrative acts of the United States Department of Commerce, Department of Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control (“
OFAC
”), State Department, and other United States authorities (collectively, “
U.S. Export Laws
”).  Users shall not use the Services found at this Site to collect, store or transmit any technical information or data that is controlled under U.S. Export Laws.  Users shall not export or re-export, or allow the export or re-export of, the Services found at this Site in violation of any U.S. Export Laws.  None of the Services found at this Site may be downloaded or otherwise exported or re-exported (i) into (or to a national or resident of) any country with which the United States has embargoed trade; or (ii) to anyone on the U.S. Treasury Department's list of Specially Designated Nationals or the U.S. Commerce Department's Denied Persons List, or any other denied parties lists under U.S. Export Laws.  By using this Site and the Services found at this Site, you agree to the foregoing and represent and warrant that you are not a national or resident of, located in, or under the control of, any restricted country; and you are not on any denied parties list; and you agree to comply with all U.S. Export Laws (including “anti-boycott”, “deemed export” and “deemed re-export” regulations).  If you access this Site or the Services found at this Site from other countries or jurisdictions, you do so on your own initiative and you are responsible for compliance with the local laws of that jurisdiction, if and to the extent those local laws are applicable and do not conflict with U.S. Export Laws.  If such laws conflict with U.S. Export Laws, you shall not access this Site or the Services found at this Site.  The obligations under this section shall survive any termination or expiration of this Agreement or your use of this Site or the Services found at this Site.
29. TITLES AND HEADINGS; INDEPENDENT COVENANTS; SEVERABILITY
The titles and headings of this Agreement are for convenience and ease of reference only and shall not be utilized in any way to construe or interpret the agreement of the parties as otherwise set forth herein.  Each covenant and agreement in this Agreement shall be construed for all purposes to be a separate and independent covenant or agreement.  If a court of competent jurisdiction holds any provision (or portion of a provision) of this Agreement to be illegal, invalid, or otherwise unenforceable, the remaining provisions (or portions of provisions) of this Agreement shall not be affected thereby and shall be found to be valid and enforceable to the fullest extent permitted by law.
30. ENGLISH LANGUAGE CONTROLS
This Agreement, along with all policies and the applicable product agreements identified above and incorporated herein by reference (collectively, the “
Agreement
”), is executed in the English language. To the extent any translation is provided to you, it is provided for convenience purposes only, and in the event of any conflict between the English and translated version, where permitted by law, the English version will control and prevail. Where the translated version is required to be provided to you and is to be considered binding by law (i) both language versions shall have equal validity, (ii) each party acknowledges that it has reviewed both language versions and that they are substantially the same in all material respects, and (iii) in the event of any discrepancy between these two versions, the translated version may prevail, provided that the intent of the Parties has been fully taken into consideration.
31. CONTACT INFORMATION
If you have any questions about this Agreement, please contact us by email or regular mail at the following address:
GoDaddy Legal Department
100 S. Mill Ave
Suite 1600
Tempe. AZ 85281 USA
legal@godaddy.com
View/Print Universal Terms of Service Agreement
Product Agreements
Account Access Terms of Service
Additional Terms for Renewals
AI Terms of Use
Airo Plus Terms of Service
Auctions Membership Agreement
Backup Services Agreement
CashParking® Service Agreement
Certificate Services Agreement
Change of Registrant Agreement
Domain Broker Service Agreement
Domain Name Proxy Agreement
Domain Name Registration Agreement
Domain Name Transfer Agreement
Email Marketing Services
GoDaddy API Terms of Use
Hosting Agreement
Marketing Applications Agreement
Microsoft 365 Terms of Use
Online Store/Quick Shopping Cart Agreement
Pro Program Agreement
Reseller Agreement
Website Services Agreement
Website Builder v7 Service Agreement
Website Security Terms of Use
Workspace Service Agreement
GoDaddy Poynt OS End User License Agreement
Policies and Other Documents
App Ratings, Reviews & Responses Policy
Brand Guidelines and Permissions
Data Processing Addendum
Digital Services Act Disclosure
Electronic Signature Disclosure
Dispute On Transfer Away Form
GoDaddy Anti-Slavery Statement
GoDaddy API Terms of Use
ICANN Registrant Rights
ICANN Registrar Transfer Dispute Resolution Policy
Online Safety Act Policy
Patent Notice
Global Privacy Notice
Data Privacy Framework Notice
European Supplemental Privacy Notice
Australia Supplemental Privacy Notice
Canada Supplemental Privacy Notice
United States Supplemental Privacy Notice
Refund Policy
Statement of Support
Subpoena Policy/Attorney Tips
Subprocessor List
Trademark/Copyright Infringement
Uniform Domain Name Dispute Resolution Policy
Employee and Candidate Notices
Applicant Privacy Notice
Equal Employment Opportunity Statement
Company Information
Corporate Headquarters
100 S. Mill Ave
Suite 1600
Tempe, AZ 85281 USA
Phone number: +353 1 653 5976
Email address: HQ@godaddy.com
Report Abuse
GoDaddy.com, LLC is a wholly-owned subsidiary of GoDaddy Inc.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.godaddy.com/en/legal/agreements/privacy-policy:
GoDaddy - Global Privacy Notice
Last Revised: 17/12/2024
View our Archived Privacy Notice
.
GoDaddy empowers entrepreneurs everywhere, making opportunity more inclusive for all. We also empower you to manage your privacy preferences and exercise your privacy rights when visiting our website, using our services, and communicating with us.
As described below,
website visitors can manage their privacy preferences by visiting
Manage Privacy Settings
customers can manage their privacy preferences in their
Account Settings
page, and
you can always reach us at
privacy@godaddy.com
or by mail at the addresses listed in
Contact Us
to exercise your privacy rights.
This Global Privacy Notice describes the core privacy practices of GoDaddy Operating Company, LLC and certain of its subsidiaries, affiliates and brands, including GoDaddy.com, LLC, Afternic.com, Inc., Blue Razor Domains, LLC, CallCatchers, Inc. d/b/a Freedom Voice, GoDaddy Payments, LLC, GoDaddy Media Temple, Inc. d/b/a Sucuri, GoDaddy Sellbrite, Inc., Lantirn, Inc. d/b/a re:Amaze, Pagely, LLC, and Poynt, LLC (collectively herein, “GoDaddy”) and applies to all individuals regardless of where they live. Other GoDaddy companies maintain separate privacy policies and procedures, notices of which are available on those companies’ websites and/or mobile applications. We also maintain customized local privacy notices for certain jurisdictions with unique privacy notice requirements, which can be access through the following links:
Australia
Canada
Europe (EU/EEA, UK, and Switzerland)
United States (California and other States)
We encourage you to review your local customized notice if you live in one of these areas.
Data Covered by this Privacy Notice
This global privacy notice covers personal data when we act as the data controller.
Personal data includes data that identifies or could be used to identify a specific person, and any data about that person. For example, your name, address, and payment details are personal data.
We act as a controller when we process personal data for our own use. For example, we act as a controller when you provide your personal data to open an account.
This notice does not apply when our customers or another person processes personal data for their own benefit. For example, when a customer sends email for their own business purposes that includes personal data, the customer is acting as the “controller”. When our customer acts as the controller, we act as the “processor” and process personal data only in accordance with our customer's instructions or as required by law.
This notice does not apply to third-party applications offered through our services or linked through our website, such as Microsoft 365 and similar offerings. For information about the privacy practices of any third-party offerings, please review the privacy notice applicable to that offering before using it.
Core Privacy Rights
We recognize several core privacy rights for all individuals:
the right to know what personal data we hold about you
the right to access, correct, or delete your personal data
the right to transfer your personal data (data portability)
the right to set your individual marketing and advertising preferences
Where technically feasible and appropriate, we provide self-service and automated mechanisms to allow individuals to exercise their privacy rights.
We also manually review requests to exercise privacy rights where self-service is not possible or appropriate. We promptly review such requests to exercise privacy rights.  If we need more information to process a request, we will contact the requestor by email or, if we do not have an email address on file for the requestor, by the same method the request was made.
If we do not honor a request for legal or other reasons, we will explain why we did not honor the request, the right to appeal, and any right to file a complaint (if available where the requestor lives).
PII We Collect
Personal Data Individuals Provide
We collect personal data when a customer or another person sets up an account, uses our services, or contacts us.  Examples of personal data we may collect include a person's name, email address, phone number, physical address, and payment method.
Personal Data We Collect Automatically
We collect personal data automatically when you visit our websites, use our services, contact us, open our emails, or view our advertising.  Examples of personal data we may collect include your device ID, your IP address, information about web pages and other websites you visit, and other similar details.
Personal Data from Other Sources
We may collect personal data  about you from other sources.  Examples of personal data obtained from other sources include publicly available data, social media information, and information lawfully gathered by third party data providers.
Personal Data We Generate
We process data in connection with our business and services to generate inferences and insights that may be linked to a specific person, including through the use of data analytics and artificial intelligence.
Use of Personal Data
We use personal data to operate and improve our business and services.  Examples of how we use personal data include:
Managing customer accounts
Processing purchase requests
Registering domains
Provisioning products and services
Providing customer support
Securing, updating, and improving our services
Detecting DNS abuse, fraud and other illegal activity
Marketing and advertising of our services
Contacting customers, prospective customers, and others by telephone, text or messaging applications to offer you our services
Website traffic measurement
Other uses consistent with the purposes for which the personal data was collected or provided to us
No Sale of Personal Data
We do not sell, lease, rent, or transfer personal data to third parties for monetary or other consideration.
Disclosures to Others
We disclose personal data:
to processors to operate our business and provide services, including but not limited to providing security services, payment processing and customer support; conducting contests and surveys; generating data insights; and performing other activities related to our business and services.
to business partners to offer some services, such as email and payment processing.
to marketers and advertisers, including for the purpose of creating and delivering personalized marketing and advertising messages.
to comply with law enforcement and other legal requests, protect our legal rights, prevent harm to us or others, and enforce our policies and contracts.
in addition, if we sell some or all of our assets or merge with a third-party we may transfer relevant personal data to the buyer or new company.
Cookies, Web Beacons, and Other Online Identifiers
We use three main types of online identifiers on our website and in our services: cookies, web beacons, and scripts.
Cookies
are text files placed on a device when a person visits our webpages or view messages from us.  Some cookies are “session cookies” that expire at the end of a browser session, while others are “persistent cookies” that allow us to remember user preferences and settings over multiple visits and across other websites.
Web Beacons
are image files placed in our web pages and emails that we use for such purposes as determining if an email has been opened or an advertisement has been viewed.
Scripts
are small pieces of computer code that power customer service tools, deliver video, provide interactive experiences, and help us measure service use.
We manage some identifiers directly.  Other identifiers are managed by third parties.  For example, we use Google Analytics to monitor website performance and visitor engagement.
We use identifiers to provide customized services, measure website performance, provide customer support, deliver personalized advertising, and generate data insights, including through the use of artificial intelligence. Specific examples of how we use identifiers include, but are not limited to:
Setting your service preferences
Managing your shopping cart
Guarding against fraud
Delivering relevant advertisements
Measuring website use
Conducting research on use of product featuresto improve our services
Identifier Management
We use optional and mandatory identifiers. Optional identifiers are used for support, website performance, and advertising. Mandatory identifiers are used for account, verification, service continuity, security, and other essential functions necessary to provide our website and services.
We offer several methods for managing optional identifier settings.  Individuals using our websites can manage identifier settings by clicking on
Manage Privacy Settings
through the link in this notice. Customers can also manage their identifier settings for our websites and our services through their customer account settings. We do not offer the ability to manage mandatory identifiers, because such identifiers are essential to providing our products and services.
In addition to our
Manage Privacy Settings
options, many web browsers allow users to block cookies (directly or through plugins and extensions). Some cookies, however, are essential for our website and services to function.  If you set your browser to block all cookies, you may not be able to use our services.
"Do Not Track" and other Preference Signals
Some web browsers provide a “Do Not Track” feature.  There are no generally accepted standards for this feature and we do not respond to “Do Not Track” signals.
We recognize universal opt-out mechanisms, such as the Global Privacy Control, where required by applicable law.
Marketing and Advertising Preferences
You can manage your marketing and advertising preferences, including whether you wish to receive customized marketing and advertising:
Through this notice by clicking
Manage Privacy Settings
If you are a customer, through your
Account Settings
Storage
We store personal data on our own systems and with trusted service providers, including Amazon Web Services.
International Transfers
We transfer personal data internationally to operate our business and provide services.  We comply with applicable law when making international transfers.
For transfers of personal data from the European Union/European Economic Area, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom, we have certified our compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF), the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, collectively (the “DPF”).  Please see our
Data Privacy Framework Notice
for more information on our participation in the DPF Program.
Please see our
European Data Protection Disclosures
for more information regarding the other transfer mechanisms we use to transfer personal data from the EU/EEA, Switzerland, and the UK.
Please see our Australian and Canadian supplemental privacy notices for information on international data transfers from those countries.
Length of Retention
We retain personal data for our business needs and to comply with law.  If we no longer need personal data, we may delete it or de-identify it so that it no longer identifies a specific person.  Factors we consider when deciding when to delete or de-identify your personal data include: (1) if you still have an account, (2) if we are required to retain personal data to comply with law, or (3) if the personal data is needed for tax other business purposes.
Security
We use risk-based measures to protect personal data, including appropriate security controls and employee training.  We also require that our service providers, business partners, and advertisers use appropriate risk-based controls to protect personal data.
No Collection of Personal Data about Children
We do not knowingly collect personal data about anyone under 18 without permission from their legal guardian.  Please contact us at
privacy@godaddy.com
if you believe we have collected information from a child without permission from their legal guardian.
Legal Basis for Processing
We process personal data upon a person's request, with a person's consent, to fulfill our contracts, based on our legitimate interest, or other lawful bases. The specific basis of processing depends on the services you are using, the data being processed, the place where the processing occurs, and the place where you live. If you have questions about our basis for processing your personal data, please contact us at
privacy@godaddy.com
.
Non-Discrimination
We will not discriminate against you for exercising your privacy rights.
No Financial Incentives
We do not provide any financial incentives for providing personal data to us.
Policy Changes
We may revise this global privacy notice by posting a revised statement at the same location as this Notice, on another location on our website, or by contacting customers directly.  If we change this global privacy notice, it will apply to personal data collected prior to adoption of the new statement only to the extent as the new statement does not reduce the rights of affected data subjects.
Contact Us
If you have any questions, you can contact us at privacy@godaddy.com or by mail at:
United States: Attn: Office of the Data Privacy Officer, 100 S. Mill Ave, Suite 1600, Tempe, AZ 85281 USA
United Kingdom: Attn: Legal, Office of the Data Privacy Officer, 5th Floor, The Shipping Building, Old Vinyl Factory, 252-254 Blyth Road, Hayes, UB3 1HA.
European Union (EEA) / Switzerland: Attn: Legal, Office of the Data Privacy Officer, GoDaddy c/o WeWork, Friesenplatz 4, 50672 Köln, Germany
Asia: Attn: Office of the Data Privacy Officer, 80 Robinson Road #02-00 Singapore 068898
We respond to all questions or concerns within 30 days.
Legal
Agreements
Privacy Policy
Sub-policy 1
https://www.godaddy.com/en/legal/agreements/data-privacy-framework-notice:
GoDaddy - Data Privacy Framework Notice
Last Revised: 16/01/2025
GoDaddy Operating Company, LLC has self-certified its compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF (“UK Extension”), and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”), collectively (the “DPF”).
Several other GoDaddy Operating Company, LLC affiliates also have certified their compliance with the DPF Principles, including:
GoDaddy.com, LLC, GoDaddy Media Temple, Inc. d/b/a Sucuri, Lantirn, Inc. d/b/a re:Amaze, GoDaddy Corporate Domains LLC, GoDaddy Sellbrite, Inc., Starfield Technologies, LLC, Domains by Proxy, LLC, Poynt LLC, Pagely LLC, CallCatchers, Inc. d/b/a Freedom Voice, GoDaddy Payments, LLC, and Blue Razor Domains, LLC (collectively, together with GoDaddy Operating Company, LLC, “GoDaddy”).
This DPF Notice describes GoDaddy's compliance with the specific requirements of the DPF.  For a complete statement of our privacy practices, please see our
Global Privacy Notice
.
Certifications
We comply with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. We have certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that we adhere to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (“EU-U.S. DPF Principles”) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension. We have certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that we adhere to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (“Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles”) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this notice and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the DPF program please visit
www.dataprivacyframework.gov
.
To view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/list
.
Scope
This DPF Notice applies to our processing of personal data transferred to the United States from the European Union/European Economic Area (“EU/EEA”), Switzerland, and the United Kingdom ("UK") in reliance upon the DPF.  If there is any conflict between this notice and the DPF Principles, the DPF Principles govern.
We process personal data as a controller (who determines the purpose and means of processing) or as a processor (who acts upon the written instructions of the controller)
Notice of Privacy Practices: Controller
Our privacy practices when we act as a data controller are set forth in our Global Privacy Notice, including:
the types of personal data collected
the purposes for which we collect personal data
the type of third parties to whom we disclose personal data,
our practices relating to the collection and use of personal data,
the right of individuals to access their personal data
the choices and means we offer for limiting use and disclosure of personal data.
Notice of Privacy Practices: Processor
When we act as a data processor, the controller determines the types of personal data collected, and the practices relating to the collection and use of personal data collected.
Our rights and obligations as a processor are defined by a written data processing addendum (“DPA”) executed between us and the controller. In general, we process personal data according to applicable law and the instructions provided by the data controller. The data controller is responsible for ensuring it:
has a lawful basis for collecting the personal data provided to us
has provided appropriate notices and disclosures to data subjects as required under applicable law
has the right to allow transfer of personal data to the United States
has otherwise complied with all applicable laws relating to the collection and processing of personal data
provides responses to requests from individuals to access their personal data, and
provides appropriate choices and means to individuals to limit the use and disclosure of their personal data.
When acting as a processor, we disclose personal data:
to our affiliates and subprocessors for the purpose of operating our business and/or providing our services
to third parties at the controller's request
when required to make disclosures pursuant to law or in response to lawful requests from governmental authorities, including in response to national security, government interests, or law enforcement requests.
Onward Transfers of Personal Data
When transferring personal data to a processor (or subprocessor) (an “Onward Transfer”), we:
require the processor or subprocessor to enter into a written DPA
require the processor or subprocessor to process the personal data for only limited and specific purposes defined in the agreement
take reasonable and appropriate steps to ensure that the personal data is processed in a manner consistent with the DPF Principles,
require the processor or subprocessor to notify us if the processor determines that it can no longer meet its obligations under the DPF Principles,
take reasonable and appropriate steps to stop and remediate unauthorized processing, and
will provide a summary or representative copy of the relevant privacy protections in our agreements with our processors to the Department of Commerce upon request.
We remain liable under the DPF Principles if our processor or any other person or entity to whom our processor transfers personal data processes personal data in a manner not consistent with the DPF Principles, unless we demonstrate that we are not responsible for the unauthorized processing.
Other Disclosures
We also disclose personal data (a) for the purpose of operating our business and providing our Services as described in our Global Privacy Notice and related privacy policies, (b) to third parties at the controller's request, (c) if required to make disclosures pursuant to law, or (d) in response to lawful requests from governmental authorities, including in response to national security, government interest, or law enforcement requests.
Data Subject Right – Access
Individuals in the European Union, United Kingdom (and Gibraltar), and Switzerland generally have the right to access, correct, amend, or delete their personal data. Where GoDaddy acts as a Controller, to access, correct, amend, or delete any general information you have provided to us as a customer, you can log into your account for self-service; or send a request to privacy@godaddy.com. Where GoDaddy acts as a processor processing personal data on behalf of its customers in the course of providing our services, GoDaddy does not own or control such data and does not have a direct relationship with the users whose personal data may be processed in connection with providing the service. Since each customer is in control of what information, including any personal data, it collects from its users, how that information is used and disclosed, and how that information can be changed, users of our services should contact the applicable customer administrator with any inquiries about how to access, correct, amend, or delete personal data contained in customer data. To the extent a user makes an access, correction, amendment, or deletion request to GoDaddy, we will refer the request to the appropriate GoDaddy customer and will support such customer as needed in responding to any request.
Data Subject Choice - Secondary Purposes
If personal data covered by this Data Privacy Framework Notice is to be used for a new purpose that is materially different from that for which the personal data was originally collected or subsequently authorized, or is to be disclosed to a non-agent third party in a manner not specified in this Policy, GoDaddy will provide you with an opportunity to choose whether to have your personal data so used or disclosed. Requests to opt out of such uses or disclosures of personal data should be sent to privacy@godaddy.com.
Certain personal data, such as information about medical or health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, is considered “sensitive information”. GoDaddy will not use sensitive information for a purpose other than the purpose for which it was originally collected or subsequently authorized by the individual unless GoDaddy has received your affirmative and explicit consent (opt-in).
Human Resources Personal Data
We transfer human resources data pursuant to the DPF. A copy of our employee privacy policy governing the processing of employee personal data is available to employees on our internal network or by emailing us at
privacy@godaddy.com
. Employment candidates are invited to review our
Applicant Privacy Policy
.
Data Security
Our Global Privacy Notice contains a description of the measures we employ to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and availability of personal data we process.
Recourse, Enforcement, and Liablity
We have established internal mechanisms to verify our ongoing adherence to the DPF Principles and the other requirements described in this notice and our Global Privacy Notice.  We also are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission (“FTC”).
We have committed to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of personal information.  Individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the DPF should first contact us at
privacy@godaddy.com
or at the address below:
Office of the Data Privacy Officer
GoDaddy Operating Company, LLC
100 S. Mill Ave
Suite 1600
Tempe. AZ 85281 USA
We respond to inquiries and complaints within 45 days.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, GoDaddy commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs), the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
If we are unable to resolve a complaint through the independent dispute resolution panel appliable to you, you may be able to invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not otherwise resolved by other recourse mechanisms.  This binding arbitration mechanism is administered by the International Centre for Dispute Resolution -American Arbitration Association (ICDR-AAA).  For more information about binding arbitration, please visit the
Data Privacy Framework's Annex regarding Arbitration
.
Changes to this Statement
We may revise this Data Privacy Framework Notice by posting a revised statement at the same location as this notice, on another location on our website, or by direct notice to you. If we change this notice, it will apply to personal data collected prior to adoption of the new statement only to the extent as the new statement does not reduce the rights of affected data subjects. As long as we continue to participate in the DPF program, we will not change our statement in a way that is inconsistent with our obligations under the DPF program or the DPF Principles.
Legal
Agreements
Data Privacy Framework Notice
Sub-policy 2
https://www.godaddy.com/en/legal/agreements/european-supplemental-privacy-notice:
GoDaddy - European Supplemental Privacy Notice
Last Revised: 01/07/2024
GoDaddy and certain of its affiliates (collectively "GoDaddy") maintains a global privacy and data protection program as described in our
Global Privacy Notice
.
This European Data Protection Notice supplements our Global Privacy Notice by providing additional disclosures required by law in the European Union/European Economic Area (EU/EEA), Switzerland, and the United Kingdom.
When you use services offered by GoDaddy in the EU/EEA, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom, the data controller will be the legal entity with whom you have entered into a contract and/or that is identified as the legal owner of the website you visited, as follows:
GoDaddy.com – GoDaddy.com, LLC
Sucuri.net – GoDaddy Media Temple, Inc. d/b/a Sucuri
Poynt.com – Poynt, LLC
Blue Razor Domains, LLC – GoDaddy.com, LLC
CallCatchers Inc. d/b/a FreedomVoice – CallCatchers, Inc.
GoDaddy Sellbrite, Inc. – GoDaddy Sellbrite, Inc.
Controller
Legal Basis for Individual Processing Activities
We use personal data to operate our business and provide the services requested by our customers as described in our Global Privacy Notices. We also use personal data to comply with our legal obligations and protect our legitimate interests, including communicating with customers and others, improving our services, customizing and personalizing our services, and detecting fraudulent and illegal activity.  With your prior consent, we also may use your personal data to send you marketing materials and offers.
Cookies and Other Online Identifiers
We use optional and mandatory (essential) cookies and other online identifiers ("Identifiers") as part of our services. Please see our
Global Privacy Notice
section on identifiers for more information. Please note that in cases where our optional identifiers involve processing of personal data of data subjects in the EU/EEA, Switzerland, and the UK, we collect your consent before using those cookies.
International Data Transfers
We operate a global business and personal data you provide may be transferred from your country to the United States or to another country where we do business.  We make these transfers when necessary to provide our services, to perform our contract with you, or when we have your consent to transfer your personal data to another country.
We transfer personal data outside the EU/EEA, Switzerland, and the UK to countries that have been determined by the European Commission to offer an adequate level of data protection. Such transfers are made pursuant to the requirements of applicable adequacy decisions.
For transfers from the EU/EEA and Switzerland to countries that have not been deemed to offer an adequate level of data protection, we transfer personal data pursuant to a data protection addendum with standard contractual clauses and appropriate supplementary measures including, appropriate technical and organizational measures.
For transfers from the UK to countries that have not been deemed to offer an adequate level of data protection, we transfer personal data pursuant to a data protection addendum consistent with the requirements of the UK International Data Transfer Agreement issued by the UK Information Commissioner, Version B1.0.
Transfers to the United States
For transfers to the United States, we transfer personal data pursuant to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and/or the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.
We have certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that we adhere to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (“EU-U.S. DPF Principles”) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  We have certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that we adhere to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (“Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles”) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in our privacy notices and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (“DPF”) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search/
.
For transfers to the United States where transfers via the DPF are not available, we transfer personal data pursuant to a data protection addendum with standard contractual clauses and appropriate supplementary measures including, appropriate technical and organizational measures.
Please see our
Data Privacy Framework Notice
for more information on our compliance with the DPF's requirements.
EU Article 27 Representative
Our EU Article 27 Representative is:
GoDaddy Deutschland GmbH
c/o WeWork
Friesenplatz 4
50672 Cologne, Germany
UK Article 27 Representative
Our UK Article 27 Representative is:
GoDaddy Europe Ltd.
Attn: Legal, Office of the Data Privacy Officer
5th Floor, The Shipping Building, Old Vinyl Factory
252-254 Blyth Road
Hayes, UB3 1HA
Complaints to Data Protection Authorities
In the EU/EEA, you have the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection supervisory authority.
In Switzerland, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the Federal Data Protection Information Commissioner.
In the UK, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the Information Commissioner's Office.
Legal
Agreements
European Supplemental Privacy Notice
Sub-policy 3
https://www.godaddy.com/en/legal/agreements/au-supplemental-privacy-notice:
GoDaddy - Australia Supplemental Privacy Notice
Last Revised: 01/07/2024
GoDaddy Operating Company, LLC and certain of its affiliates (collectively "GoDaddy" maintains a global privacy program as described in our
Global Privacy Notice
. This Australian Privacy Notice supplements our Global Privacy Notice by providing additional disclosures required by the federal, state, and territorial laws of Australia.
Definition of Personal Information
The Privacy Act of 1988 defines “Personal Information” as information or an opinion about an identified individual, or an individual who is reasonably identifiable: (a) whether the information or opinion is true or not; and (b) whether the information or opinion is recorded in material form or not.  For the purposes of GoDaddy's Global Privacy Notice and this supplement, the term “Personal Data” also includes “Personal Information” as defined by the Privacy Act.
Transfer of Personal Data
GoDaddy operates an international business and transfers Personal Data internationally to the extent needed to operate our business and provide our products and services. Personal Data you provide to us may be transferred from Australia to another jurisdiction, including but not limited to the United States. When we transfer Personal Data internationally, we take steps to ensure that the information is protected in accordance with all material requirements of Australian law and that Personal Data is only used by recipients for the purpose for which it is provided by us.
Contact Us
If you have any questions, you can contact us at
privacy@godaddy.com
or by mail at:
Office of the Data Privacy Officer
Suite 1600
100 S. Mill Ave.
Tempe, Arizona 85281
Complaints
If you believe that applicable federal or provincial privacy and data protection laws have been violated, you may send us a complaint at the addresses set forth above. You also have the right to complain directly to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Legal
Agreements
Au Supplemental Privacy Notice
Sub-policy 4
https://www.godaddy.com/en/legal/agreements/ca-supplemental-privacy-notice:
GoDaddy - Canada Supplemental Privacy Notice
Last Revised: 01/07/2024
GoDaddy Operating Company, LLC and certain of its affiliates (collectively "GoDaddy") maintains a global privacy program as described in our
Global Privacy Notice
. This Canadian Privacy Notice supplements our Global Privacy Notice by providing additional disclosures required by the Canadian federal and provincial privacy laws applicable to private sector companies.
Transfer of Personal Data
GoDaddy operates an international business and transfers Personal Data internationally to the extent needed to operate our business and provide our products and services. Personal Data you provide to us may be transferred from Canada to another jurisdiction, including but not limited to the United States. If you are a resident of Quebec, Personal Data you provide to us may be transferred to other provinces in Canada or to other countries, including but not limited to the United States.
Contact Us
If you have any questions, you can contact us at
privacy@godaddy.com
or by mail at:
Office of the Data Privacy Officer
Suite 1600
100 S. Mill Ave.
Tempe, Arizona 85281
Complaints
If you believe that applicable federal or provincial privacy and data protection laws have been violated, you may send us a complaint at the addresses set forth above. You also have the right to complain directly to the Office of the Privacy Commissioner of Canada or the appropriate provincial data protection authority where you reside.
Legal
Agreements
Ca Supplemental Privacy Notice
Sub-policy 5
https://www.godaddy.com/en/legal/agreements/us-supplemental-privacy-notice:
GoDaddy - United States Supplemental Privacy Notice
Last Revised: 01/07/2024
GoDaddy and certain of its affiliates ("GoDaddy") maintains a global privacy program as described in our
Global Privacy Notice
. This US Privacy Notice supplements our Global Privacy Notice by providing additional disclosures required by US state law. For disclosures specific to your state, please click the relevant link below:
California
Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, and Virginia
If your state is not listed above, please see our
Global Privacy Notice
for a description of your rights.
Additional California Disclosures
Our Global Privacy Notice applies to all California residents. If you a resident of California and applying for a job with us, our
Applicant Privacy Notice
also applies to you.
The following additional California-specific disclosures are required by California law and relate to both our online and offline practices for handling “Personal Information” (as defined below) of California residents.
The California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) regulates the processing of Personal Information, which is defined as “information that identifies, relates to, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly with a particular consumer or household.”  For purposes of honoring rights of California residents, all references to "Personal Data" in our Global Privacy Notice include personal information as defined in the CCPA.
Categories of Personal Information Collected
In the last 12 months, we have collected the following categories of personal information for the business purposes described below.
Category
Examples
Business Purpose
Identifiers
Name, postal address, telephone number, email address, IP address, driver’s license number, passport number, or other similar identifiers
Managing accounts, processing purchase requests, security, detecting fraud, marketing, advertising, and employment
Personal Information Categories listed in California Consumer Records Statute
Name, postal address, telephone number, financial information (e.g., account number or card number), employment information
Managing accounts, processing purchase requests, security, detecting fraud, marketing, advertising, and employment
Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
Age (40 years or older), marital status, sex (including gender, gender identity, gender expression), veteran or military status
Employment
Commercial Information
Services purchased and other information about our customers’ enterprises
Managing accounts, processing purchase requests, security, detecting fraud, marketing, and advertising
Internet or other similar network activity
Information about the use of our website and services, interaction with advertising, IP address, and similar information
Managing accounts, processing purchase requests, security, detecting fraud, marketing and advertising
Professional or employment related information
Information about our employees, job applicants, and our customers’ employer(s), position, and job responsibilities
Managing accounts, employment
Inferences drawn from other personal information
Inferences regarding our customers’ businesses and interests
Marketing, advertising, product customization, and customer support
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information
Recordings of customer support calls, voice messages, SMS and text messages, and security video
Managing accounts, customer support, and security
Biometric information
Access to company computer systems and facilities
Security
Education information
Education information relating to job applicants and employees
Employment
Categories of Sensitive Personal Information Collected
Users of some services are required by applicable laws, contracts, and other requirements (including requirements imposed by ICANN) to supply certain information that is defined as "Sensitive Personal Information" under California law.
In the past 12 months, we have collected the following categories of Sensitive Personal Information from some individuals:
Identifiers: Social security numbers, driver’s license numbers, state identification card numbers, or passport numbers
Personal Information Categories listed in California Consumer Records Statute
Financial and Account Information: account log-in, financial account, debit card, or credit card number in combination with any required security or access code, password or credentials allowing access to an account
Employment Information: health, sexual orientation, and racial or ethnic origin
Categories of Personal Information Disclosed
In the past 12 months, we have disclosed the following categories of Personal Information regarding one or more specific infdividuals for the business purposes described above (see, Categories of Personal Information Collected) to the following categories of third parties:
Category
Examples
Identifiers
Service providers
Business partners
Courts, government officials, attorneys, and law enforcement
Personal Information Categories listed in California Consumer Records Statute
Service providers
Business partners
Courts, government officials, attorneys, and law enforcement
Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
Service providers
Business partners
Courts, government officials, attorneys, and law enforcement
Commercial Information
Service providers
Business partners
Courts, government officials, attorneys, and law enforcement
Internet or other similar network activity
Service providers
Business partners
Courts, government officials, attorneys, and law enforcement
Professional or employment related information
Service providers
Courts, government officials, attorneys, and law enforcement
Inferences drawn from other personal information
Service providers
Business Partners
Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information
Service providers
Biometric information
Service providers
Education information
Service providers
No Sale of Personal Information
We do not sell, lease, rent, or transfer personal information for monetary or other consideration.
Sharing of Personal Information
The CCPA defines “sharing” personal information to include providing personal information to third parties for certain online behavioral advertising purposes.  Pursuant to this CCPA definition, we “shared” personal information with third parties for customized and personalized marketing and advertising in the past 12 months, including identifiers, internet or other similar network activity, and inferences drawn from other personal information.  The recipients of this personal information are prohibited from using this shared personal information except to provide services to us or as otherwise required by law.
We recognize the right for California residents (and all other individuals regardless of where they live) to opt-out of the “sharing” of personal information by clicking on the
Do Not Share My Personal Information
link in this notice and on our website.  You can also request that we not share your personal information by emailing us at
privacy@godaddy.com
.
Use of Sensitive Personal Information
GoDaddy does not use sensitive personal information, as defined in the CCPA, for any purpose other than:
providing the services or goods requested by our customers
preventing, detecting, and investigating security incidents
detecting and responding to malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal actions
to ensure the physical safety of natural persons
for short term, transient use, including but not limited to, nonpersonalized advertising shown as part of a consumer’s interaction with us
to service accounts
to verify or maintain the quality or safety of products, services, and/or devices that are owned, manufactured, manufactured for, or controlled by us
for employment purposes
As a result, the right to limit use of sensitive personal information under the CCPA does not apply to our activities.
How to Exercise Your Rights
You can make a request to exercise your rights to know, access, correct, delete, transfer (portability), opt-out of marketing, or restrict sharing of your personal information by emailing us at
privacy@godaddy.com
.  You also can send your request by mail to:
Attn: Legal – Privacy
100 S. Mill Ave
Suite 1600
Tempe. AZ 85281 USA
If we require additional information to process your request, we will contact you by email or mail.
Use of Authorized Agents
The CCPA allows authorized agents to make requests on behalf of California residents to exercise their personal information rights.  To exercise rights on behalf of a California resident, authorized agents must provide us with evidence they are authorized to make the request.
To make an authorized request, please email us at
privacy@godaddy.com
.  Authorized agents can also send their requests to Attn: Legal – Privacy, 100 S. Mill Ave, Suite 1600, Tempe, AZ 85281 USA.
Please note that we will confirm the authorized agent’s authority and send any personal information directly to the California resident on whose behalf the agent is acting.  No personal information will be provided to the authorized agent.
Time To Respond
We will acknowledge your request to exercise your rights within 10 business days after receiving the request.  Under California law, we have 45 days to respond to your inquiry and may add an additional 45 days depending on the complexity of your request.  Please note, however, that as a general rule we normally respond to requests within 30 days as set forth in our global privacy notice.
Supplemental Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, and Virginia Disclosures
Our
Global Privacy Notice
applies to all residents of Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, and Virginia.  The following supplemental disclosures are specifically required by state law.
We recognize all requests to exercise state privacy rights as including personal data, personal information, and personally identifiable information ("PII") under applicable state law and as defined in our Global Privacy Notice.
Mandatory Disclosures
We process the following categories of personal data: identifiers/contact information, demographic information (including gender and age), payment card information, commercial information (such as information about your business), internet activity, audio and electronic information, and inferences.
The purposes for processing your personal data are described in our global privacy notice.
We may disclose all of the categories of personal data described above to the third parties described in our Global Privacy Notice.
We process the following categories of personal data for targeted advertising purposes: identifiers, demographic information, commercial information, internet activity, and inferences.
The Right to Opt-Out of Marketing and Advertising
We recognize the right to opt-out of targeted marketing and advertising communications. If you are a customer, you can also opt-out of targeted marketing and advertising communications by setting your advertising and marketing preferences in your account. You can also exercise this right by sending your request to via email to
privacy@godaddy.com
or by mail to: Attn: Legal – Privacy, 100 S. Mill Ave, Suite 1600 Tempe, Arizona 85281.
Where available under applicable state law, we also recognize the right to opt-out of the processing of personal data for targeted advertising through a third party authorized by you to act on your behalf.  We reserve the right to use commercially reasonable methods to authenticate your identity and the authorized agent’s authority to act your behalf.  Authorized agents may make such requests by sending us an email, or mailing the request to Attn: Legal – Privacy, 100 S. Mill Ave, Suite 1600 Tempe, Arizona 85281.
How to Exercise Your Rights
You, or an authorized agent, may make a request to exercise your rights to know, access, correct, delete, transfer (portability), or opt-out of marketing by emailing us at
privacy@godaddy.com
.  You, or an authorized agent, can also send your request by mail to:
Attn: Legal – Privacy
100 S. Mill Ave
Suite 1600
Tempe. AZ 85281 USA
We reserve the right to use commercially reasonable methods to verify your identity and the authority of any authorized agent to act on your behalf.
Time To Respond
Under state law, we have 45 days to respond to your inquiry and may add an additional 45 days depending on the complexity of your request.  Please note, however, that as a general rule we normally respond to requests within 30 days as set forth in our Global Privacy Notice.
Right of Appeal
If we reject your request, you have the right to appeal that denial by notifying us that you disagree with our decision by email at
privacy@godaddy.com
or by mail at: Attn: Legal – Privacy, 100 S. Mill Ave, Suite 1600, Tempe, AZ 85281.
If you choose to appeal, please explain why you believe you are entitled to receive the information requested despite our denial.  We will respond to any appeal within 45 days.
Right to Complain to Attorney General
If we deny any request you made under our Global Privacy Notice or this state supplemental notice, you may file a complaint with your state’s attorney general.
Legal
Agreements
Us Supplemental Privacy Notice
Sub-policy 6
https://www.godaddy.com/en/legal/agreements/applicant-privacy-notice:
GoDaddy - Applicant Privacy Notice
Last Revised: 10/10/2023
This notice describes the categories of personal information collected by GoDaddy.com, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company and/or its affiliated entities (“GoDaddy”) and the purposes for which such information may be collected and used. It also provides information concerning GoDaddy’s record retention practices and rights you may have under the applicable laws.
We retain your personal information for as long as necessary to process your application for employment and in accordance with GoDaddy’s data retention schedule. We may retain your personal information for longer if it is necessary to comply with our legal obligations or reporting obligations, resolving disputes or as permitted or required by applicable law. We may also retain your personal information in a deidentified or aggregated form so that it can no longer be associated with you. To determine the appropriate retention period for your personal information, we consider various factors such as the amount, nature, and sensitivity of your information; the potential risk of unauthorized access, use or disclosure; the purposes for which we collect or process your personal information; and applicable legal requirements.
Categories of Personal Information Collected
Identifiers and Contact Information
. This category includes names, addresses, telephone numbers, mobile numbers, email addresses, signature, account name, dates of birth, and other similar contact information and identifiers.
Internet or other electronic network activity information
. This category includes, without limitation:
activities on communications systems including text messages, chat logs, and app usage data.
Professional and employment-related information
. This category includes without limitation:
data submitted with employment applications including employment history, recommendations, etc...,
background check and criminal history,
work authorization, and
fitness for duty data and reports
Education Information
. This category includes education history.
Sensitive Personal Information
. This category includes information such as:
social security, driver's license, state identification card, or passport number
Inferences drawn from the Applicant Personal Information in the categories above
. This category includes engaging in human capital analytics, including but not limited to, identifying certain correlations about individuals and success on their jobs, analyzing data to improve retention, and analyzing preferences to inform HR Policies, Programs and Procedures.
Purposes for which Personal Information, Including Sensitive Personal Information, is Used
Collect and process employment applications, including confirming eligibility for employment, background and related checks, onboarding, and related recruiting efforts.
Maintaining personnel records and record retention requirements.
Communicate with you about your application.
Complying with applicable state and federal health, labor, employment, disability, equal employment opportunity, and related laws, guidance, or recommendations.
Investigating complaints, grievances, and suspected violations of Company policy.
Protect the legal rights, privacy, safety or property of Company or its employees, agents, contractors, customers or the public.
Protect against fraud or other illegal activity or for risk management purposes.
Enforce GoDaddy’s website’s terms of use.
Design, implement, and promote GoDaddy’s diversity and inclusion programs.
Facilitate the efficient and secure use of GoDaddy’s information systems.
Evaluate an individual’s appropriateness for a participation position at GoDaddy, or promotion to a new position.
To respond to and manage any legal claims against GoDaddy and/or its personnel, including civil discovery in litigation.
Who Has Access to Your Data
To carry out the purposes outlined above, GoDaddy may disclose information with third parties or service providers, such as background check vendors, third-party staffing vendors and information technology vendors, and state or federal governmental agencies.
The information which you give to us may be transferred to countries outside of the jurisdiction of your residence or employment. For example, some of our third-party providers may be located outside of the European Union (“EU”). Where this is the case, we will take steps to make sure standard contractual clauses are in place, and adequate technical and organizational measures are implemented so that your privacy rights will continue to be protected as outlined in this policy. By submitting your personal data, you are agreeing to this transfer, storing or processing.
GoDaddy does not sell or share, as those terms are defined under applicable law, the above categories of personal information. GoDaddy may add to the categories of personal information it collects and the purposes it uses personal information. In that case, GoDaddy will inform you.
How Does GoDaddy Protect Your Data?
GoDaddy has internal policies and controls in place to try to ensure that your data is not lost, accidentally destroyed, misused or disclosed, and is not accessed except by its employees in the performance of their duties. Where GoDaddy engages third parties to process data on its behalf, they do so on the basis of written instructions, are under a duty of confidentiality and are obliged to implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to ensure the security of data.
Your Rights: Access, Correction, Deletion
Right To Know About Personal Information Collected or Disclosed
. You have the right to request more information regarding the following topics, to the extent applicable:
the categories of personal information,
the categories of sources from which the personal information is collected,
the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing personal information, if applicable,
the categories of third parties to whom the business discloses personal information, and
the specific pieces of personal information the business has collected about you.
Right to Access
. You have the right to access your personal information by logging into GoDaddy's applicant portal or by submitting a request to recruiting@godaddy.com.
Right To Request Deletion of Your Personal Information
. You have the right to request that we delete the personal information we collected or maintained about you. Once we receive your request, we will let you know what, if any, personal information we can delete from our records. There may be circumstances where we cannot delete your personal information or direct service providers or contractors to delete your personal information from their records. Such instances include, but are not limited to, enabling solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with your expectations based on your relationship with GoDaddy and compatible with the context in which you provided the information or to comply with a legal obligation.
Right to Request Correction
. You have the right to request that GoDaddy correct any inaccurate personal information we maintain about you, taking into account the nature of that information and purpose for processing it.
Right to Non-Discrimination for the Exercise of Your Privacy Rights
. We will not discriminate or retaliate against you for exercising any of your rights as described above.
International Transfers of Personal Information
We transfer personal information internationally to operate our business and provide services. We comply with applicable law when making international transfers.
For transfers of personal information from the European Union/European Economic Area, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom, we have certified our compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF), the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, collectively (the “DPF”).  Please see our
Data Privacy Framework Notice
for more information on our participation in the DPF Program.
Please see our
European Data Protection Disclosures
for more information on transfers pursuant to the DPF and other transfer mechanisms we used to transfer PII from the EU/EEA, Switzerland, and the UK.
We reserve the right to amend this Notice at any time without advance notice.
CONTACT US
.
If you have any questions, concerns, or complaints about our Privacy Notice, or how we handle your personal data, you may contact our Office of the Data Protection Officer by email at privacy@godaddy.com.
We will respond to all requests, inquiries or concerns within thirty (30) days.
If you are not satisfied with our response, you may direct privacy complaints to your local data protection authority. GoDaddy.com LLC is the data controller for www.godaddy.com.
Legal
Agreements
Applicant Privacy Notice